1000
537,nd he humbled thee, and suffered thee to hunger, and fed thee with manna, which thou knewest not, neither did thy fathers know; that he might make thee know that man doth not live by bread only, but by every word that proceedeth out of the mouth of the LORD doth man live. 
Thy raiment waxed not old upon thee, neither did thy foot swell, these forty years. 
Thou shalt also consider in thine heart, that, as a man chasteneth his son, so the LORD thy God chasteneth thee. 
Therefore thou shalt keep the commandments of the LORD thy God, 
484,ble, by the comfort wherewith we ourselves are comforted of God. 
For as the sufferings of Christ abound in us, so our consolation also aboundeth by Christ. 
And whether we be afflicted, it is for your consolation and salvation, which is effectual in the enduring of the same sufferings which we also suffer: or whether we be comforted, it is for your consolation and salvation. 
And our hope of you is stedfast, knowing, that as ye are partakers of the sufferings, so shall ye be als
452,eived seed, and born a man child: then she shall be unclean seven days; according to the days of the separation for her infirmity shall she be unclean. 
And in the eighth day the flesh of his foreskin shall be circumcised. 
And she shall then continue in the blood of her purifying three and thirty days; she shall touch no hallowed thing, nor come into the sanctuary, until the days of her purifying be fulfilled. 
But if she bear a maid child, then s
542,one shall shut the gate. 
Thou shalt daily prepare a burnt offering unto the LORD of a lamb of the first year without blemish: thou shalt prepare it every morning. 
And thou shalt prepare a meat offering for it every morning, the sixth part of an ephah, and the third part of an hin of oil, to temper with the fine flour; a meat offering continually by a perpetual ordinance unto the LORD. 
Thus shall they prepare the lamb, and the meat offering, and the oil, every morning for a continual burnt offering. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; If the pr
556,Moses the servant of the LORD, and of the congregation of Israel, for the tabernacle of witness? 
For the sons of Athaliah, that wicked woman, had broken up the house of God; and also all the dedicated things of the house of the LORD did they bestow upon Baalim. 
And at the king's commandment they made a chest, and set it without at the gate of the house of the LORD. 
And they made a proclamation through Judah and Jerusalem, to bring in to the LORD the collection that Moses the servant of God laid upon Israel in the wilderness. 
And all the princes a
479,daily rising up early and sending them: 
Yet they hearkened not unto me, nor inclined their ear, but hardened their neck: they did worse than their fathers. 
Therefore thou shalt speak all these words unto them; but they will not hearken to thee: thou shalt also call unto them; but they will not answer thee. 
But thou shalt say unto them, This is a nation that obeyeth not the voice of the LORD their God, nor receiveth correction: truth is perished, and is cut off from their 
575, 
And this is the record, that God hath given to us eternal life, and this life is in his Son. 
He that hath the Son hath life; and he that hath not the Son of God hath not life. 
These things have I written unto you that believe on the name of the Son of God; that ye may know that ye have eternal life, and that ye may believe on the name of the Son of God. 
And this is the confidence that we have in him, that, if we ask any thing according to his will, he heareth us: 
And if we know that he hear us, whatsoever we ask, we know that we have the petitions that we desired
558,uth worketh ruin. 
Boast not thyself of to morrow; for thou knowest not what a day may bring forth. 
Let another man praise thee, and not thine own mouth; a stranger, and not thine own lips. 
A stone is heavy, and the sand weighty; but a fool's wrath is heavier than them both. 
Wrath is cruel, and anger is outrageous; but who is able to stand before envy? 
Open rebuke is better than secret love. 
Faithful are the wounds of a friend; but the kisses of an enemy are deceitful. 
The full soul loatheth an honeycomb; but to the hungry soul every bitter thing
519,te. 
I will lay thy cities waste, and thou shalt be desolate, and thou shalt know that I am the LORD. 
Because thou hast had a perpetual hatred, and hast shed the blood of the children of Israel by the force of the sword in the time of their calamity, in the time that their iniquity had an end: 
Therefore, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, I will prepare thee unto blood, and blood shall pursue thee: sith thou hast not hated blood, even blood shall pursue thee. 
Thus will I make mount Seir most desolate, and cut off f
547,And thine elder sister is Samaria, she and her daughters that dwell at thy left hand: and thy younger sister, that dwelleth at thy right hand, is Sodom and her daughters. 
Yet hast thou not walked after their ways, nor done after their abominations: but, as if that were a very little thing, thou wast corrupted more than they in all thy ways. 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, Sodom thy sister hath not done, she nor her daughters, as thou hast done, thou and thy daughters. 
Behold, this was the iniquity of thy sister Sodom, pride, fulness of bre
513,. 
And the wall of the city had twelve foundations, and in them the names of the twelve apostles of the Lamb. 
And he that talked with me had a golden reed to measure the city, and the gates thereof, and the wall thereof. 
And the city lieth foursquare, and the length is as large as the breadth: and he measured the city with the reed, twelve thousand furlongs. The length and the breadth and the height of it are equal. 
And he measured the wall thereof, an hundred and forty and four cubits, according to the m
587,ording to the law: and if I perish, I perish. 
So Mordecai went his way, and did according to all that Esther had commanded him. 
Now it came to pass on the third day, that Esther put on her royal apparel, and stood in the inner court of the king's house, over against the king's house: and the king sat upon his royal throne in the royal house, over against the gate of the house. 
And it was so, when the king saw Esther the queen standing in the court, that she obtained favour in his sight: and the king held out to Esther the golden sceptre that was in his hand. So Esther drew near
476,d set up. 
Wherefore at that time certain Chaldeans came near, and accused the Jews. 
They spake and said to the king Nebuchadnezzar, O king, live for ever. 
Thou, O king, hast made a decree, that every man that shall hear the sound of the cornet, flute, harp, sackbut, psaltery, and dulcimer, and all kinds of musick, shall fall down and worship the golden image: 
And whoso falleth not down and worshippeth, that he should be cast into the midst of a burning fiery furnace. 
568, long as we were conversant with them, when we were in the fields: 
They were a wall unto us both by night and day, all the while we were with them keeping the sheep. 
Now therefore know and consider what thou wilt do; for evil is determined against our master, and against all his household: for he is such a son of Belial, that a man cannot speak to him. 
Then Abigail made haste, and took two hundred loaves, and two bottles of wine, and five sheep ready dressed, and five measures of parched corn, and an hundred clusters of raisins, and two hundred cakes of figs,
515,urn with fire. 
And thus shall ye eat it; with your loins girded, your shoes on your feet, and your staff in your hand; and ye shall eat it in haste: it is the LORD's passover. 
For I will pass through the land of Egypt this night, and will smite all the firstborn in the land of Egypt, both man and beast; and against all the gods of Egypt I will execute judgment: I am the LORD. 
And the blood shall be to you for a token upon the houses where ye are: and when I see the blood, I will pass over you, and the plagu
471,ut Jesus beheld them, and said unto them, With men this is impossible; but with God all things are possible. 
Then answered Peter and said unto him, Behold, we have forsaken all, and followed thee; what shall we have therefore? 
And Jesus said unto them, Verily I say unto you, That ye which have followed me, in the regeneration when the Son of man shall sit in the throne of his glory, ye also shall sit upon twelve thrones, judging the twelve tribes of Israel. 
And ev
562,the LORD hath caused the solemn feasts and sabbaths to be forgotten in Zion, and hath despised in the indignation of his anger the king and the priest. 
The LORD hath cast off his altar, he hath abhorred his sanctuary, he hath given up into the hand of the enemy the walls of her palaces; they have made a noise in the house of the LORD, as in the day of a solemn feast. 
The LORD hath purposed to destroy the wall of the daughter of Zion: he hath stretched out a line, he hath not withdrawn his hand from destroying: therefore he made the rampart and the wall t
446,of men: let them all be gathered together, let them stand up; yet they shall fear, and they shall be ashamed together. 
The smith with the tongs both worketh in the coals, and fashioneth it with hammers, and worketh it with the strength of his arms: yea, he is hungry, and his strength faileth: he drinketh no water, and is faint. 
The carpenter stretcheth out his rule; he marketh it out with a line; he fitteth it with planes, and he marketh it
488,ts of Jerusalem to err, and to do worse than the heathen, whom the LORD had destroyed before the children of Israel. 
And the LORD spake to Manasseh, and to his people: but they would not hearken. 
Wherefore the LORD brought upon them the captains of the host of the king of Assyria, which took Manasseh among the thorns, and bound him with fetters, and carried him to Babylon. 
And when he was in affliction, he besought the LORD his God, and humbled himself greatly before the God of hi
561,ron, that the Ekronites cried out, saying, They have brought about the ark of the God of Israel to us, to slay us and our people. 
So they sent and gathered together all the lords of the Philistines, and said, Send away the ark of the God of Israel, and let it go again to his own place, that it slay us not, and our people: for there was a deadly destruction throughout all the city; the hand of God was very heavy there. 
And the men that died not were smitten with the emerods: and the cry of the city went up to heaven. 
And the ark of the LORD was in the c
546,ord of Jesus, which said unto him, Before the cock crow, thou shalt deny me thrice. And he went out, and wept bitterly. 
When the morning was come, all the chief priests and elders of the people took counsel against Jesus to put him to death: 
And when they had bound him, they led him away, and delivered him to Pontius Pilate the governor. 
Then Judas, which had betrayed him, when he saw that he was condemned, repented himself, and brought again the thirty pieces of silver to the chief priests and elders, 
Saying, I have sinned in that I ha
503, set thy servant among them that did eat at thine own table. What right therefore have I yet to cry any more unto the king? 
And the king said unto him, Why speakest thou any more of thy matters? I have said, Thou and Ziba divide the land. 
And Mephibosheth said unto the king, Yea, let him take all, forasmuch as my lord the king is come again in peace unto his own house. 
And Barzillai the Gileadite came down from Rogelim, and went over Jordan with the king, to conduct him over Jordan. 
Now Barzill
436,e. 
For yet a little while, and he that shall come will come, and will not tarry. 
Now the just shall live by faith: but if any man draw back, my soul shall have no pleasure in him. 
But we are not of them who draw back unto perdition; but of them that believe to the saving of the soul. 
Now faith is the substance of things hoped for, the evidence of things not seen. 
For by it the elders obtained a good report. 
Through faith we un
508,. And no man after that durst ask him any question. 
And Jesus answered and said, while he taught in the temple, How say the scribes that Christ is the son of David? 
For David himself said by the Holy Ghost, The LORD said to my Lord, Sit thou on my right hand, till I make thine enemies thy footstool. 
David therefore himself calleth him Lord; and whence is he then his son? And the common people heard him gladly. 
And he said unto them in his doctrine, Beware of the scribes, which love to go in long clo
447,n those sacrifices there is a remembrance again made of sins every year. 
For it is not possible that the blood of bulls and of goats should take away sins. 
Wherefore when he cometh into the world, he saith, Sacrifice and offering thou wouldest not, but a body hast thou prepared me: 
In burnt offerings and sacrifices for sin thou hast had no pleasure. 
Then said I, Lo, I come (in the volume of the book it is written of me,) to do thy will, O 
560,kedness, or peril, or sword? 
As it is written, For thy sake we are killed all the day long; we are accounted as sheep for the slaughter. 
Nay, in all these things we are more than conquerors through him that loved us. 
For I am persuaded, that neither death, nor life, nor angels, nor principalities, nor powers, nor things present, nor things to come, 
Nor height, nor depth, nor any other creature, shall be able to separate us from the love of God, which is in Christ Jesus our Lord. 
I say the truth in Christ, I lie not, my conscience also bearing me wit
489,hy whoredoms, to provoke me to anger. 
Behold, therefore I have stretched out my hand over thee, and have diminished thine ordinary food, and delivered thee unto the will of them that hate thee, the daughters of the Philistines, which are ashamed of thy lewd way. 
Thou hast played the whore also with the Assyrians, because thou wast unsatiable; yea, thou hast played the harlot with them, and yet couldest not be satisfied. 
Thou hast moreover multiplied thy fornication in the land of C
430,the presidents and princes, because an excellent spirit was in him; and the king thought to set him over the whole realm. 
Then the presidents and princes sought to find occasion against Daniel concerning the kingdom; but they could find none occasion nor fault; forasmuch as he was faithful, neither was there any error or fault found in him. 
Then said these men, We shall not find any occasion against this Daniel, except we fi
502, narrow is the way, which leadeth unto life, and few there be that find it. 
Beware of false prophets, which come to you in sheep's clothing, but inwardly they are ravening wolves. 
Ye shall know them by their fruits. Do men gather grapes of thorns, or figs of thistles? 
Even so every good tree bringeth forth good fruit; but a corrupt tree bringeth forth evil fruit. 
A good tree cannot bring forth evil fruit, neither can a corrupt tree bring forth good fruit. 
Every tree that bringeth not forth go
591,hus with us, to carry us forth out of Egypt? 
Is not this the word that we did tell thee in Egypt, saying, Let us alone, that we may serve the Egyptians? For it had been better for us to serve the Egyptians, than that we should die in the wilderness. 
And Moses said unto the people, Fear ye not, stand still, and see the salvation of the LORD, which he will shew to you to day: for the Egyptians whom ye have seen to day, ye shall see them again no more for ever. 
The LORD shall fight for you, and ye shall hold your peace. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Wherefore criest thou unto me? spe
453,ons of my head troubled me. 
Therefore made I a decree to bring in all the wise men of Babylon before me, that they might make known unto me the interpretation of the dream. 
Then came in the magicians, the astrologers, the Chaldeans, and the soothsayers: and I told the dream before them; but they did not make known unto me the interpretation thereof. 
But at the last Daniel came in before me, whose name was Belteshazzar, according to the name of my
467,en to the ends of the earth. 
As for thee also, by the blood of thy covenant I have sent forth thy prisoners out of the pit wherein is no water. 
Turn you to the strong hold, ye prisoners of hope: even to day do I declare that I will render double unto thee; 
When I have bent Judah for me, filled the bow with Ephraim, and raised up thy sons, O Zion, against thy sons, O Greece, and made thee as the sword of a mighty man. 
And the LORD shall be seen over them, and 
517,n broken pieces of the ship. And so it came to pass, that they escaped all safe to land. 
And when they were escaped, then they knew that the island was called Melita. 
And the barbarous people shewed us no little kindness: for they kindled a fire, and received us every one, because of the present rain, and because of the cold. 
And when Paul had gathered a bundle of sticks, and laid them on the fire, there came a viper out of the heat, and fastened on his hand. 
And when the barbarians saw the venomous beast ha
529,and brake, and gave to the disciples to set before the multitude. 
And they did eat, and were all filled: and there was taken up of fragments that remained to them twelve baskets. 
And it came to pass, as he was alone praying, his disciples were with him: and he asked them, saying, Whom say the people that I am? 
They answering said, John the Baptist; but some say, Elias; and others say, that one of the old prophets is risen again. 
He said unto them, But whom say ye that I am? Peter answering said, The Christ of God. 
And 
401,est that there is one God; thou doest well: the devils also believe, and tremble. 
But wilt thou know, O vain man, that faith without works is dead? 
Was not Abraham our father justified by works, when he had offered Isaac his son upon the altar? 
Seest thou how faith wrought with his works, and by works was faith made perfect? 
And the scripture was fulfilled which saith, Abraham believed God, and
548, his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And he that sitteth on any thing whereon he sat that hath the issue shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And he that toucheth the flesh of him that hath the issue shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And if he that hath the issue spit upon him that is clean; then he shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And what saddle soever he rid
579,e wilt thou run, my son, seeing that thou hast no tidings ready? 
But howsoever, said he, let me run. And he said unto him, Run. Then Ahimaaz ran by the way of the plain, and overran Cushi. 
And David sat between the two gates: and the watchman went up to the roof over the gate unto the wall, and lifted up his eyes, and looked, and behold a man running alone. 
And the watchman cried, and told the king. And the king said, If he be alone, there is tidings in his mouth. And he came apace, and drew near. 
And the watchman saw another man running: and the watchman called unto t
569, messengers again unto the king of the children of Ammon: 
And said unto him, Thus saith Jephthah, Israel took not away the land of Moab, nor the land of the children of Ammon: 
But when Israel came up from Egypt, and walked through the wilderness unto the Red sea, and came to Kadesh; 
Then Israel sent messengers unto the king of Edom, saying, Let me, I pray thee, pass through thy land: but the king of Edom would not hearken thereto. And in like manner they sent unto the king of Moab: but he would not consent: and Israel abode in Kadesh. 
Then they went along thr
460, and for wood brass, and for stones iron: I will also make thy officers peace, and thine exactors righteousness. 
Violence shall no more be heard in thy land, wasting nor destruction within thy borders; but thou shalt call thy walls Salvation, and thy gates Praise. 
The sun shall be no more thy light by day; neither for brightness shall the moon give light unto thee: but the LORD shall be unto thee an everlasting light, and thy God thy glory. 
Thy sun shal
519,rgalsharezer, Samgarnebo, Sarsechim, Rabsaris, Nergalsharezer, Rabmag, with all the residue of the princes of the king of Babylon. 
And it came to pass, that when Zedekiah the king of Judah saw them, and all the men of war, then they fled, and went forth out of the city by night, by the way of the king's garden, by the gate betwixt the two walls: and he went out the way of the plain. 
But the Chaldeans' army pursued after them, and overtook Zedekiah in the plains of Jericho: and when they had taken him, they broug
481,Issachar according to their families. 
And their border was toward Jezreel, and Chesulloth, and Shunem, 
And Haphraim, and Shihon, and Anaharath, 
And Rabbith, and Kishion, and Abez, 
And Remeth, and Engannim, and Enhaddah, and Bethpazzez; 
And the coast reacheth to Tabor, and Shahazimah, and Bethshemesh; and the outgoings of their border were at Jordan: sixteen cities with their villages. 
This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Issachar according to their fam
416,d, that it may give seed to the sower, and bread to the eater: 
So shall my word be that goeth forth out of my mouth: it shall not return unto me void, but it shall accomplish that which I please, and it shall prosper in the thing whereto I sent it. 
For ye shall go out with joy, and be led forth with peace: the mountains and the hills shall break forth before you into singing, and all the trees of the field shal
524,will plant in the wilderness the cedar, the shittah tree, and the myrtle, and the oil tree; I will set in the desert the fir tree, and the pine, and the box tree together: 
That they may see, and know, and consider, and understand together, that the hand of the LORD hath done this, and the Holy One of Israel hath created it. 
Produce your cause, saith the LORD; bring forth your strong reasons, saith the King of Jacob. 
Let them bring them forth, and shew us what shall happen: let them shew the former things, what they 
434,refore then didst thou not obey the voice of the LORD, but didst fly upon the spoil, and didst evil in the sight of the LORD? 
And Saul said unto Samuel, Yea, I have obeyed the voice of the LORD, and have gone the way which the LORD sent me, and have brought Agag the king of Amalek, and have utterly destroyed the Amalekites. 
But the people took of the spoil, sheep and oxen, the chief of the things which should have been utterly d
545,harvest, and found mandrakes in the field, and brought them unto his mother Leah. Then Rachel said to Leah, Give me, I pray thee, of thy son's mandrakes. 
And she said unto her, Is it a small matter that thou hast taken my husband? and wouldest thou take away my son's mandrakes also? And Rachel said, Therefore he shall lie with thee to night for thy son's mandrakes. 
And Jacob came out of the field in the evening, and Leah went out to meet him, and said, Thou must come in unto me; for surely I have hired thee with my son's mandrakes. And h
592,eir own company, and reported all that the chief priests and elders had said unto them. 
And when they heard that, they lifted up their voice to God with one accord, and said, Lord, thou art God, which hast made heaven, and earth, and the sea, and all that in them is: 
Who by the mouth of thy servant David hast said, Why did the heathen rage, and the people imagine vain things? 
The kings of the earth stood up, and the rulers were gathered together against the Lord, and against his Christ. 
For of a truth against thy holy child Jesus, whom thou hast anointed, both Herod, and Pontius Pi
436,clothes lying; yet went he not in. 
Then cometh Simon Peter following him, and went into the sepulchre, and seeth the linen clothes lie, 
And the napkin, that was about his head, not lying with the linen clothes, but wrapped together in a place by itself. 
Then went in also that other disciple, which came first to the sepulchre, and he saw, and believed. 
For as yet they knew not the scripture, that he must rise again from the dead.
513,nd Pilate answered and said again unto them, What will ye then that I shall do unto him whom ye call the King of the Jews? 
And they cried out again, Crucify him. 
Then Pilate said unto them, Why, what evil hath he done? And they cried out the more exceedingly, Crucify him. 
And so Pilate, willing to content the people, released Barabbas unto them, and delivered Jesus, when he had scourged him, to be crucified. 
And the soldiers led him away into the hall, called Praetorium; and they call together the whole 
473,h he offered unto the LORD, two and twenty thousand oxen, and an hundred and twenty thousand sheep. So the king and all the children of Israel dedicated the house of the LORD. 
The same day did the king hallow the middle of the court that was before the house of the LORD: for there he offered burnt offerings, and meat offerings, and the fat of the peace offerings: because the brasen altar that was before the LORD was too little to receive the burnt offerings, and meat 
507,oked after Moses, until he was gone into the tabernacle. 
And it came to pass, as Moses entered into the tabernacle, the cloudy pillar descended, and stood at the door of the tabernacle, and the Lord talked with Moses. 
And all the people saw the cloudy pillar stand at the tabernacle door: and all the people rose up and worshipped, every man in his tent door. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses face to face, as a man speaketh unto his friend. And he turned again into the camp: but his servant Joshua, the so
431,alt not bow down to their gods, nor serve them, nor do after their works: but thou shalt utterly overthrow them, and quite break down their images. 
And ye shall serve the LORD your God, and he shall bless thy bread, and thy water; and I will take sickness away from the midst of thee. 
There shall nothing cast their young, nor be barren, in thy land: the number of thy days I will fulfil. 
I will send my fear before thee, and wi
572,soever will save his life shall lose it: and whosoever will lose his life for my sake shall find it. 
For what is a man profited, if he shall gain the whole world, and lose his own soul? or what shall a man give in exchange for his soul? 
For the Son of man shall come in the glory of his Father with his angels; and then he shall reward every man according to his works. 
Verily I say unto you, There be some standing here, which shall not taste of death, till they see the Son of man coming in his kingdom. 
And after six days Jesus taketh Peter, James, and John his bro
455, fall upon him. And he smote him that he died. 
And David said unto him, Thy blood be upon thy head; for thy mouth hath testified against thee, saying, I have slain the LORD's anointed. 
And David lamented with this lamentation over Saul and over Jonathan his son: 
(Also he bade them teach the children of Judah the use of the bow: behold, it is written in the book of Jasher.) 
The beauty of Israel is slain upon thy high places: how are the mighty fall
575,red and thirty years: and he died. 
And Seth lived an hundred and five years, and begat Enos: 
And Seth lived after he begat Enos eight hundred and seven years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Seth were nine hundred and twelve years: and he died. 
And Enos lived ninety years, and begat Cainan: 
And Enos lived after he begat Cainan eight hundred and fifteen years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Enos were nine hundred and five years: and he died. 
And Cainan lived seventy years and begat Mahalaleel: 
And Cainan lived after he begat 
567,th the LORD. 
And the word of the LORD of hosts came unto me, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; The fast of the fourth month, and the fast of the fifth, and the fast of the seventh, and the fast of the tenth, shall be to the house of Judah joy and gladness, and cheerful feasts; therefore love the truth and peace. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; It shall yet come to pass, that there shall come people, and the inhabitants of many cities: 
And the inhabitants of one city shall go to another, saying, Let us go speedily to pray before the LORD, and to seek the L
573,every one that is greedy of gain; which taketh away the life of the owners thereof. 
Wisdom crieth without; she uttereth her voice in the streets: 
She crieth in the chief place of concourse, in the openings of the gates: in the city she uttereth her words, saying, 
How long, ye simple ones, will ye love simplicity? and the scorners delight in their scorning, and fools hate knowledge? 
Turn you at my reproof: behold, I will pour out my spirit unto you, I will make known my words unto you. 
Because I have called, and ye refused; I have stretched out my hand, and no ma
472,he shewed unto them his hands and his side. Then were the disciples glad, when they saw the LORD. 
Then said Jesus to them again, Peace be unto you: as my Father hath sent me, even so send I you. 
And when he had said this, he breathed on them, and saith unto them, Receive ye the Holy Ghost: 
Whose soever sins ye remit, they are remitted unto them; and whose soever sins ye retain, they are retained. 
But Thomas, one of the twelve, called Didymus, was not with them whe
517,
He saith unto him the third time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me? Peter was grieved because he said unto him the third time, Lovest thou me? And he said unto him, Lord, thou knowest all things; thou knowest that I love thee. Jesus saith unto him, Feed my sheep. 
Verily, verily, I say unto thee, When thou wast young, thou girdest thyself, and walkedst whither thou wouldest: but when thou shalt be old, thou shalt stretch forth thy hands, and another shall gird thee, and carry thee whither thou wouldest not. 
586,e of the father of the families of Merari was Zuriel the son of Abihail: these shall pitch on the side of the tabernacle northward. 
And under the custody and charge of the sons of Merari shall be the boards of the tabernacle, and the bars thereof, and the pillars thereof, and the sockets thereof, and all the vessels thereof, and all that serveth thereto, 
And the pillars of the court round about, and their sockets, and their pins, and their cords. 
But those that encamp before the tabernacle toward the east, even before the tabernacle of the congregation eastward, shall be Moses
572,f Zippor was king of the Moabites at that time. 
He sent messengers therefore unto Balaam the son of Beor to Pethor, which is by the river of the land of the children of his people, to call him, saying, Behold, there is a people come out from Egypt: behold, they cover the face of the earth, and they abide over against me: 
Come now therefore, I pray thee, curse me this people; for they are too mighty for me: peradventure I shall prevail, that we may smite them, and that I may drive them out of the land: for I wot that he whom thou blessest is blessed, and he whom th
525,his kind, 
And every raven after his kind, 
And the owl, and the night hawk, and the cuckow, and the hawk after his kind, 
The little owl, and the great owl, and the swan, 
And the pelican, and the gier eagle, and the cormorant, 
And the stork, and the heron after her kind, and the lapwing, and the bat. 
And every creeping thing that flieth is unclean unto you: they shall not be eaten. 
But of all clean fowls ye may eat. 
Ye shall not eat of anything that dieth of itself: thou shalt give it unto the stranger that is in 
427,ing: if he be a god, let him plead for himself, because one hath cast down his altar. 
Therefore on that day he called him Jerubbaal, saying, Let Baal plead against him, because he hath thrown down his altar. 
Then all the Midianites and the Amalekites and the children of the east were gathered together, and went over, and pitched in the valley of Jezreel. 
But the Spirit of the LORD came upon Gideon, and he blew a trumpet;
523,ion to generation. 
Wherefore dost thou forget us for ever, and forsake us so long time? 
Turn thou us unto thee, O LORD, and we shall be turned; renew our days as of old. 
But thou hast utterly rejected us; thou art very wroth against us. 
Now it came to pass in the thirtieth year, in the fourth month, in the fifth day of the month, as I was among the captives by the river of Chebar, that the heavens were opened, and I saw visions of God. 
In the fifth day of the month, which was the fifth year of king Jehoiachin's c
463, thy neighbour's. 
These words the LORD spake unto all your assembly in the mount out of the midst of the fire, of the cloud, and of the thick darkness, with a great voice: and he added no more. And he wrote them in two tables of stone, and delivered them unto me. 
And it came to pass, when ye heard the voice out of the midst of the darkness, (for the mountain did burn with fire,) that ye came near unto me, even all the heads of your tribes, and your elders; 
533,are the sons of Bilhah, which Laban gave unto Rachel his daughter, and she bare these unto Jacob: all the souls were seven. 
All the souls that came with Jacob into Egypt, which came out of his loins, besides Jacob's sons' wives, all the souls were threescore and six; 
And the sons of Joseph, which were born him in Egypt, were two souls: all the souls of the house of Jacob, which came into Egypt, were threescore and ten. 
And he sent Judah before him unto Joseph, to direct his face unto Goshen; and they came into the land of Go
419,, had heard out of the book all the words of the LORD, 
Then he went down into the king's house, into the scribe's chamber: and, lo, all the princes sat there, even Elishama the scribe, and Delaiah the son of Shemaiah, and Elnathan the son of Achbor, and Gemariah the son of Shaphan, and Zedekiah the son of Hananiah, and all the princes. 
Then Michaiah declared unto them all the words that he had heard, when Baruch r
575,re not known. 
Thou leddest thy people like a flock by the hand of Moses and Aaron. 
Give ear, O my people, to my law: incline your ears to the words of my mouth. 
I will open my mouth in a parable: I will utter dark sayings of old: 
Which we have heard and known, and our fathers have told us. 
We will not hide them from their children, shewing to the generation to come the praises of the LORD, and his strength, and his wonderful works that he hath done. 
For he established a testimony in Jacob, and appointed a law in Israel, which he commanded our fathers, that they s
474,to him, Lord, let it alone this year also, till I shall dig about it, and dung it: 
And if it bear fruit, well: and if not, then after that thou shalt cut it down. 
And he was teaching in one of the synagogues on the sabbath. 
And, behold, there was a woman which had a spirit of infirmity eighteen years, and was bowed together, and could in no wise lift up herself. 
And when Jesus saw her, he called her to him, and said unto her, Woman, thou art loosed from thine infirm
481, unto them, When it is evening, ye say, It will be fair weather: for the sky is red. 
And in the morning, It will be foul weather to day: for the sky is red and lowering. O ye hypocrites, ye can discern the face of the sky; but can ye not discern the signs of the times? 
A wicked and adulterous generation seeketh after a sign; and there shall no sign be given unto it, but the sign of the prophet Jonas. And he left them, and departed. 
And when his disciples were come to the ot
444,and two at Parbar. 
These are the divisions of the porters among the sons of Kore, and among the sons of Merari. 
And of the Levites, Ahijah was over the treasures of the house of God, and over the treasures of the dedicated things. 
As concerning the sons of Laadan; the sons of the Gershonite Laadan, chief fathers, even of Laadan the Gershonite, were Jehieli. 
The sons of Jehieli; Zetham, and Joel his brother, which were over the treasures
443,h throughout the months of the year. 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering unto the LORD shall be offered, beside the continual burnt offering, and his drink offering. 
And in the fourteenth day of the first month is the passover of the LORD. 
And in the fifteenth day of this month is the feast: seven days shall unleavened bread be eaten. 
In the first day shall be an holy convocation; ye shall do no manner of servile work therein: 
545,ringeth forth much fruit: for without me ye can do nothing. 
If a man abide not in me, he is cast forth as a branch, and is withered; and men gather them, and cast them into the fire, and they are burned. 
If ye abide in me, and my words abide in you, ye shall ask what ye will, and it shall be done unto you. 
Herein is my Father glorified, that ye bear much fruit; so shall ye be my disciples. 
As the Father hath loved me, so have I loved you: continue ye in my love. 
If ye keep my commandments, ye shall abide in my love; even as I have kep
405,It came to pass also in the twelfth year, in the fifteenth day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, wail for the multitude of Egypt, and cast them down, even her, and the daughters of the famous nations, unto the nether parts of the earth, with them that go down into the pit. 
Whom dost thou pass in beauty? go down, and be thou laid with the uncircumcised. 
They sh
411,Zacharias which perished between the altar and the temple: verily I say unto you, It shall be required of this generation. 
Woe unto you, lawyers! for ye have taken away the key of knowledge: ye entered not in yourselves, and them that were entering in ye hindered. 
And as he said these things unto them, the scribes and the Pharisees began to urge him vehemently, and to provoke him to speak of many things: 

512,redeemed thee, I have called thee by thy name; thou art mine. 
When thou passest through the waters, I will be with thee; and through the rivers, they shall not overflow thee: when thou walkest through the fire, thou shalt not be burned; neither shall the flame kindle upon thee. 
For I am the LORD thy God, the Holy One of Israel, thy Saviour: I gave Egypt for thy ransom, Ethiopia and Seba for thee. 
Since thou wast precious in my sight, thou hast been honourable, and I have loved thee: therefore will I give
420, 
Otherwise it shall come to pass, when my lord the king shall sleep with his fathers, that I and my son Solomon shall be counted offenders. 
And, lo, while she yet talked with the king, Nathan the prophet also came in. 
And they told the king, saying, Behold Nathan the prophet. And when he was come in before the king, he bowed himself before the king with his face to the ground. 
And Nathan said, My lord, O king, ha
497,undred and five years, and begat Enos: 
And Seth lived after he begat Enos eight hundred and seven years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Seth were nine hundred and twelve years: and he died. 
And Enos lived ninety years, and begat Cainan: 
And Enos lived after he begat Cainan eight hundred and fifteen years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Enos were nine hundred and five years: and he died. 
And Cainan lived seventy years and begat Mahalaleel: 
And Caina
548,f, my honour is nothing: it is my Father that honoureth me; of whom ye say, that he is your God: 
Yet ye have not known him; but I know him: and if I should say, I know him not, I shall be a liar like unto you: but I know him, and keep his saying. 
Your father Abraham rejoiced to see my day: and he saw it, and was glad. 
Then said the Jews unto him, Thou art not yet fifty years old, and hast thou seen Abraham? 
Jesus said unto them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Before Abraham was, I am. 
Then took they up stones to cast at him: but Jesus h
538,more evident: for that after the similitude of Melchisedec there ariseth another priest, 
Who is made, not after the law of a carnal commandment, but after the power of an endless life. 
For he testifieth, Thou art a priest for ever after the order of Melchisedec. 
For there is verily a disannulling of the commandment going before for the weakness and unprofitableness thereof. 
For the law made nothing perfect, but the bringing in of a better hope did; by the which we draw nigh unto God. 
And inasmuch as not without an oath he was m
565,e king's hand. 
And the messenger that was gone to call Micaiah spake unto him, saying, Behold now, the words of the prophets declare good unto the king with one mouth: let thy word, I pray thee, be like the word of one of them, and speak that which is good. 
And Micaiah said, As the LORD liveth, what the LORD saith unto me, that will I speak. 
So he came to the king. And the king said unto him, Micaiah, shall we go against Ramothgilead to battle, or shall we forbear? And he answered him, Go, and prosper: for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand of the kin
531, a king over them, which is the angel of the bottomless pit, whose name in the Hebrew tongue is Abaddon, but in the Greek tongue hath his name Apollyon. 
One woe is past; and, behold, there come two woes more hereafter. 
And the sixth angel sounded, and I heard a voice from the four horns of the golden altar which is before God, 
Saying to the sixth angel which had the trumpet, Loose the four angels which are bound in the great river Euphrates. 
And the four angels were loosed, which were prepared for an hour, and a day, and 
535,pare ye the way of the Lord, make his paths straight. 
Every valley shall be filled, and every mountain and hill shall be brought low; and the crooked shall be made straight, and the rough ways shall be made smooth; 
And all flesh shall see the salvation of God. 
Then said he to the multitude that came forth to be baptized of him, O generation of vipers, who hath warned you to flee from the wrath to come? 
Bring forth therefore fruits worthy of repentance, and begin not to say within yourselves, We have Abraham to our father: for
475,e LORD's right hand shall be turned unto thee, and shameful spewing shall be on thy glory. 
For the violence of Lebanon shall cover thee, and the spoil of beasts, which made them afraid, because of men's blood, and for the violence of the land, of the city, and of all that dwell therein. 
What profiteth the graven image that the maker thereof hath graven it; the molten image, and a teacher of lies, that the maker of his work trusteth therein, to make dumb idols? 
Woe unt
585,iots and on horses, they, and their princes, the men of Judah, and the inhabitants of Jerusalem: and this city shall remain for ever. 
And they shall come from the cities of Judah, and from the places about Jerusalem, and from the land of Benjamin, and from the plain, and from the mountains, and from the south, bringing burnt offerings, and sacrifices, and meat offerings, and incense, and bringing sacrifices of praise, unto the house of the LORD. 
But if ye will not hearken unto me to hallow the sabbath day, and not to bear a burden, even entering in at the gates of Jerusalem on
508,his voice, and ye shall serve him, and cleave unto him. 
And that prophet, or that dreamer of dreams, shall be put to death; because he hath spoken to turn you away from the LORD your God, which brought you out of the land of Egypt, and redeemed you out of the house of bondage, to thrust thee out of the way which the LORD thy God commanded thee to walk in. So shalt thou put the evil away from the midst of thee. 
If thy brother, the son of thy mother, or thy son, or thy daughter, or the wife of thy bosom
504,the corners of the streets, that they may be seen of men. Verily I say unto you, They have their reward. 
But thou, when thou prayest, enter into thy closet, and when thou hast shut thy door, pray to thy Father which is in secret; and thy Father which seeth in secret shall reward thee openly. 
But when ye pray, use not vain repetitions, as the heathen do: for they think that they shall be heard for their much speaking. 
Be not ye therefore like unto them: for your Father knoweth what things ye have 
596,ll I be equal? saith the Holy One. 
Lift up your eyes on high, and behold who hath created these things, that bringeth out their host by number: he calleth them all by names by the greatness of his might, for that he is strong in power; not one faileth. 
Why sayest thou, O Jacob, and speakest, O Israel, My way is hid from the LORD, and my judgment is passed over from my God? 
Hast thou not known? hast thou not heard, that the everlasting God, the LORD, the Creator of the ends of the earth, fainteth not, neither is weary? there is no searching of his understanding. 
He giveth power to the f
567,their sockets three. 
And on the other side shall be hangings fifteen cubits: their pillars three, and their sockets three. 
And for the gate of the court shall be an hanging of twenty cubits, of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen, wrought with needlework: and their pillars shall be four, and their sockets four. 
All the pillars round about the court shall be filleted with silver; their hooks shall be of silver, and their sockets of brass. 
The length of the court shall be an hundred cubits, and the breadth fifty every where, and the height fi
410,r houses to smite you. 
And ye shall observe this thing for an ordinance to thee and to thy sons for ever. 
And it shall come to pass, when ye be come to the land which the LORD will give you, according as he hath promised, that ye shall keep this service. 
And it shall come to pass, when your children shall say unto you, What mean ye by this service? 
That ye shall say, It is the sacrifice of the LORD's pa
491, Haman was fallen upon the bed whereon Esther was. Then said the king, Will he force the queen also before me in the house? As the word went out of king's mouth, they covered Haman's face. 
And Harbonah, one of the chamberlains, said before the king, Behold also, the gallows fifty cubits high, which Haman had made for Mordecai, who spoken good for the king, standeth in the house of Haman. Then the king said, Hang him thereon. 
So they hanged Haman on the gallows that he had prepared for
461,rs, what was become of Peter. 
And when Herod had sought for him, and found him not, he examined the keepers, and commanded that they should be put to death. And he went down from Judaea to Caesarea, and there abode. 
And Herod was highly displeased with them of Tyre and Sidon: but they came with one accord to him, and, having made Blastus the king's chamberlain their friend, desired peace; because their country was nourished by the king's country. 
And upo
460,e shall shake off his unripe grape as the vine, and shall cast off his flower as the olive. 
For the congregation of hypocrites shall be desolate, and fire shall consume the tabernacles of bribery. 
They conceive mischief, and bring forth vanity, and their belly prepareth deceit. 
Then Job answered and said, 
I have heard many such things: miserable comforters are ye all. 
Shall vain words have an end? or what emboldeneth thee that thou answerest? 
I also 
509,a day: from time to time shalt thou eat it. 
Thou shalt drink also water by measure, the sixth part of an hin: from time to time shalt thou drink. 
And thou shalt eat it as barley cakes, and thou shalt bake it with dung that cometh out of man, in their sight. 
And the LORD said, Even thus shall the children of Israel eat their defiled bread among the Gentiles, whither I will drive them. 
Then said I, Ah Lord GOD! behold, my soul hath not been polluted: for from my youth up even till now have I not eaten 
477, all the country of the inheritance of Israel: for they have committed lewdness and folly in Israel. 
Behold, ye are all children of Israel; give here your advice and counsel. 
And all the people arose as one man, saying, We will not any of us go to his tent, neither will we any of us turn into his house. 
But now this shall be the thing which we will do to Gibeah; we will go up by lot against it; 
And we will take ten men of an hundred throughout all the tribes of Israel,
519, Aphek, into the city; and there a wall fell upon twenty and seven thousand of the men that were left. And Benhadad fled, and came into the city, into an inner chamber. 
And his servants said unto him, Behold now, we have heard that the kings of the house of Israel are merciful kings: let us, I pray thee, put sackcloth on our loins, and ropes upon our heads, and go out to the king of Israel: peradventure he will save thy life. 
So they girded sackcloth on their loins, and put ropes on their heads, and came to the 
417, said, Wherefore is my lord the king come to his servant? And David said, To buy the threshingfloor of thee, to build an altar unto the LORD, that the plague may be stayed from the people. 
And Araunah said unto David, Let my lord the king take and offer up what seemeth good unto him: behold, here be oxen for burnt sacrifice, and threshing instruments and other instruments of the oxen for wood. 
All these things d
576,lace toward the south, and fell on his face to the ground, and bowed himself three times: and they kissed one another, and wept one with another, until David exceeded. 
And Jonathan said to David, Go in peace, forasmuch as we have sworn both of us in the name of the LORD, saying, The LORD be between me and thee, and between my seed and thy seed for ever. And he arose and departed: and Jonathan went into the city. 
Then came David to Nob to Ahimelech the priest: and Ahimelech was afraid at the meeting of David, and said unto him, Why art thou alone, and no man with thee?
455, to sit on my right hand and on my left hand is not mine to give; but it shall be given to them for whom it is prepared. 
And when the ten heard it, they began to be much displeased with James and John. 
But Jesus called them to him, and saith unto them, Ye know that they which are accounted to rule over the Gentiles exercise lordship over them; and their great ones exercise authority upon them. 
But so shall it not be among you: but whosoever will be
460,mercy. 
O God, thou hast cast us off, thou hast scattered us, thou hast been displeased; O turn thyself to us again. 
Thou hast made the earth to tremble; thou hast broken it: heal the breaches thereof; for it shaketh. 
Thou hast shewed thy people hard things: thou hast made us to drink the wine of astonishment. 
Thou hast given a banner to them that fear thee, that it may be displayed because of the truth. Selah. 
That thy beloved may be delivered; save w
557,ed of him a king. 
And he said, This will be the manner of the king that shall reign over you: He will take your sons, and appoint them for himself, for his chariots, and to be his horsemen; and some shall run before his chariots. 
And he will appoint him captains over thousands, and captains over fifties; and will set them to ear his ground, and to reap his harvest, and to make his instruments of war, and instruments of his chariots. 
And he will take your daughters to be confectionaries, and to be cooks, and to be bakers. 
And he will take your fiel
419,; Tyrus, and Zidon, though it be very wise. 
And Tyrus did build herself a strong hold, and heaped up silver as the dust, and fine gold as the mire of the streets. 
Behold, the LORD will cast her out, and he will smite her power in the sea; and she shall be devoured with fire. 
Ashkelon shall see it, and fear; Gaza also shall see it, and be very sorrowful, and Ekron; for her expectation shall be ashamed; and the kin
419,earth shined with his glory. 
And it was according to the appearance of the vision which I saw, even according to the vision that I saw when I came to destroy the city: and the visions were like the vision that I saw by the river Chebar; and I fell upon my face. 
And the glory of the LORD came into the house by the way of the gate whose prospect is toward the east. 
So the spirit took me up, and brought me into the 
410,t all things; and I will be his God, and he shall be my son. 
But the fearful, and unbelieving, and the abominable, and murderers, and whoremongers, and sorcerers, and idolaters, and all liars, shall have their part in the lake which burneth with fire and brimstone: which is the second death. 
And there came unto me one of the seven angels which had the seven vials full of the seven last plagues, and talked
566, the seed of Abraham. 
Wherefore in all things it behoved him to be made like unto his brethren, that he might be a merciful and faithful high priest in things pertaining to God, to make reconciliation for the sins of the people. 
For in that he himself hath suffered being tempted, he is able to succour them that are tempted. 
Wherefore, holy brethren, partakers of the heavenly calling, consider the Apostle and High Priest of our profession, Christ Jesus; 
Who was faithful to him that appointed him, as also Moses was faithful in all his house. 
For this man wa
464,vender in the inn, he espied his money; for, behold, it was in his sack's mouth. 
And he said unto his brethren, My money is restored; and, lo, it is even in my sack: and their heart failed them, and they were afraid, saying one to another, What is this that God hath done unto us? 
And they came unto Jacob their father unto the land of Canaan, and told him all that befell unto them; saying, 
The man, who is the lord of the land, spake roughly to us, and took u
443, custom, as the duty of every day required; 
And afterward offered the continual burnt offering, both of the new moons, and of all the set feasts of the LORD that were consecrated, and of every one that willingly offered a freewill offering unto the LORD. 
From the first day of the seventh month began they to offer burnt offerings unto the LORD. But the foundation of the temple of the LORD was not yet laid. 
They gave money also unto the m
518,d, thou hast altogether blessed them these three times. 
Therefore now flee thou to thy place: I thought to promote thee unto great honour; but, lo, the LORD hath kept thee back from honour. 
And Balaam said unto Balak, Spake I not also to thy messengers which thou sentest unto me, saying, 
If Balak would give me his house full of silver and gold, I cannot go beyond the commandment of the LORD, to do either good or bad of mine own mind; but what the LORD saith, that will I speak? 
And now, behold, I go unto my pe
584, the wicked shall not be unpunished: but the seed of the righteous shall be delivered. 
As a jewel of gold in a swine's snout, so is a fair woman which is without discretion. 
The desire of the righteous is only good: but the expectation of the wicked is wrath. 
There is that scattereth, and yet increaseth; and there is that withholdeth more than is meet, but it tendeth to poverty. 
The liberal soul shall be made fat: and he that watereth shall be watered also himself. 
He that withholdeth corn, the people shall curse him: but blessing shall be upon the head of him that selleth
461, inheritance on this side Jordan near Jericho eastward, toward the sunrising. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
These are the names of the men which shall divide the land unto you: Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun. 
And ye shall take one prince of every tribe, to divide the land by inheritance. 
And the names of the men are these: Of the tribe of Judah, Caleb the son of Jephunneh. 
And of the tribe of the children of Simeon, Shemuel the 
573, one from another, as a shepherd divideth his sheep from the goats: 
And he shall set the sheep on his right hand, but the goats on the left. 
Then shall the King say unto them on his right hand, Come, ye blessed of my Father, inherit the kingdom prepared for you from the foundation of the world: 
For I was an hungred, and ye gave me meat: I was thirsty, and ye gave me drink: I was a stranger, and ye took me in: 
Naked, and ye clothed me: I was sick, and ye visited me: I was in prison, and ye came unto me. 
Then shall the righteous answer him, saying, Lord, when saw 
452, let his father in law depart; and he went his way into his own land. 
In the third month, when the children of Israel were gone forth out of the land of Egypt, the same day came they into the wilderness of Sinai. 
For they were departed from Rephidim, and were come to the desert of Sinai, and had pitched in the wilderness; and there Israel camped before the mount. 
And Moses went up unto God, and the LORD called unto him out of the mountain, sayin
580,s and his statutes which he commanded thee: 
And they shall be upon thee for a sign and for a wonder, and upon thy seed for ever. 
Because thou servedst not the LORD thy God with joyfulness, and with gladness of heart, for the abundance of all things; 
Therefore shalt thou serve thine enemies which the LORD shall send against thee, in hunger, and in thirst, and in nakedness, and in want of all things: and he shall put a yoke of iron upon thy neck, until he have destroyed thee. 
The LORD shall bring a nation against thee from far, from the end of the earth, as swift as the e
491,others. 
But God, who is rich in mercy, for his great love wherewith he loved us, 
Even when we were dead in sins, hath quickened us together with Christ, (by grace ye are saved;) 
And hath raised us up together, and made us sit together in heavenly places in Christ Jesus: 
That in the ages to come he might shew the exceeding riches of his grace in his kindness toward us through Christ Jesus. 
For by grace are ye saved through faith; and that not of yourselves: it is the gift of God: 
N
427,ications the commandment came forth, and I am come to shew thee; for thou art greatly beloved: therefore understand the matter, and consider the vision. 
Seventy weeks are determined upon thy people and upon thy holy city, to finish the transgression, and to make an end of sins, and to make reconciliation for iniquity, and to bring in everlasting righteousness, and to seal up the vision and prophecy, and to anoint the most 
425, stone him. 
And thou shalt speak unto the children of Israel, saying, Whosoever curseth his God shall bear his sin. 
And he that blasphemeth the name of the LORD, he shall surely be put to death, and all the congregation shall certainly stone him: as well the stranger, as he that is born in the land, when he blasphemeth the name of the Lord, shall be put to death. 
And he that killeth any man shall surely be put to death
420, me, lest I come out against thee with the sword. 
And the children of Israel said unto him, We will go by the high way: and if I and my cattle drink of thy water, then I will pay for it: I will only, without doing anything else, go through on my feet. 
And he said, Thou shalt not go through. And Edom came out against him with much people, and with a strong hand. 
Thus Edom refused to give Israel passage through his 
496,ed not at it in the days of Saul. 
And all the congregation said that they would do so: for the thing was right in the eyes of all the people. 
So David gathered all Israel together, from Shihor of Egypt even unto the entering of Hemath, to bring the ark of God from Kirjathjearim. 
And David went up, and all Israel, to Baalah, that is, to Kirjathjearim, which belonged to Judah, to bring up thence the ark of God the LORD, that dwelleth between the cherubims, whose name is called on it. 
And t
408,t am not meet to be called an apostle, because I persecuted the church of God. 
But by the grace of God I am what I am: and his grace which was bestowed upon me was not in vain; but I laboured more abundantly than they all: yet not I, but the grace of God which was with me. 
Therefore whether it were I or they, so we preach, and so ye believed. 
Now if Christ be preached that he rose from the dead, how sa
476, great day of his wrath is come; and who shall be able to stand? 
And after these things I saw four angels standing on the four corners of the earth, holding the four winds of the earth, that the wind should not blow on the earth, nor on the sea, nor on any tree. 
And I saw another angel ascending from the east, having the seal of the living God: and he cried with a loud voice to the four angels, to whom it was given to hurt the earth and the sea, 
Saying, Hurt not the ea
426,aron, and all the congregation of the children of Israel, did to the Levites according unto all that the LORD commanded Moses concerning the Levites, so did the children of Israel unto them. 
And the Levites were purified, and they washed their clothes; and Aaron offered them as an offering before the LORD; and Aaron made an atonement for them to cleanse them. 
And after that went the Levites in to do their service in the 
531,ise, and play before us. And Joab said, Let them arise. 
Then there arose and went over by number twelve of Benjamin, which pertained to Ishbosheth the son of Saul, and twelve of the servants of David. 
And they caught every one his fellow by the head, and thrust his sword in his fellow's side; so they fell down together: wherefore that place was called Helkathhazzurim, which is in Gibeon. 
And there was a very sore battle that day; and Abner was beaten, and the men of Israel, before the servants of David. 
And there were thr
565, that I and my son Solomon shall be counted offenders. 
And, lo, while she yet talked with the king, Nathan the prophet also came in. 
And they told the king, saying, Behold Nathan the prophet. And when he was come in before the king, he bowed himself before the king with his face to the ground. 
And Nathan said, My lord, O king, hast thou said, Adonijah shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne? 
For he is gone down this day, and hath slain oxen and fat cattle and sheep in abundance, and hath called all the king's sons, and the captains of the ho
523,lem. 
And the king of Egypt put him down at Jerusalem, and condemned the land in an hundred talents of silver and a talent of gold. 
And the king of Egypt made Eliakim his brother king over Judah and Jerusalem, and turned his name to Jehoiakim. And Necho took Jehoahaz his brother, and carried him to Egypt. 
Jehoiakim was twenty and five years old when he began to reign, and he reigned eleven years in Jerusalem: and he did that which was evil in the sight of the LORD his God. 
Against him came up Nebuchadnezzar king of
575,LORD said unto me, Proclaim all these words in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem, saying, Hear ye the words of this covenant, and do them. 
For I earnestly protested unto your fathers in the day that I brought them up out of the land of Egypt, even unto this day, rising early and protesting, saying, Obey my voice. 
Yet they obeyed not, nor inclined their ear, but walked every one in the imagination of their evil heart: therefore I will bring upon them all the words of this covenant, which I commanded them to do: but they did them not. 
And the LORD s
408,ection on things above, not on things on the earth. 
For ye are dead, and your life is hid with Christ in God. 
When Christ, who is our life, shall appear, then shall ye also appear with him in glory. 
Mortify therefore your members which are upon the earth; fornication, uncleanness, inordinate affection, evil concupiscence, and covetousness, which is idolatry: 
For which things' sake the wrath of God com
514,d at Zareah, and at Jarmuth, 
Zanoah, Adullam, and in their villages, at Lachish, and the fields thereof, at Azekah, and in the villages thereof. And they dwelt from Beersheba unto the valley of Hinnom. 
The children also of Benjamin from Geba dwelt at Michmash, and Aija, and Bethel, and in their villages. 
And at Anathoth, Nob, Ananiah, 
Hazor, Ramah, Gittaim, 
Hadid, Zeboim, Neballat, 
Lod, and Ono, the valley of craftsmen. 
And of the Levites were divisions in Judah, and in Benjamin. 
Now these are the pri
487,loweth after vain persons shall have poverty enough. 
A faithful man shall abound with blessings: but he that maketh haste to be rich shall not be innocent. 
To have respect of persons is not good: for for a piece of bread that man will transgress. 
He that hasteth to be rich hath an evil eye, and considereth not that poverty shall come upon him. 
He that rebuketh a man afterwards shall find more favour than he that flattereth with the tongue. 
Whoso robbeth his father or his mother
437,ll destroy the mighty and the holy people. 
And through his policy also he shall cause craft to prosper in his hand; and he shall magnify himself in his heart, and by peace shall destroy many: he shall also stand up against the Prince of princes; but he shall be broken without hand. 
And the vision of the evening and the morning which was told is true: wherefore shut thou up the vision; for it shall be for many days. 
And I Daniel fa
428,appearance; they had the likeness of a man. 
And every one had four faces, and every one had four wings. 
And their feet were straight feet; and the sole of their feet was like the sole of a calf's foot: and they sparkled like the colour of burnished brass. 
And they had the hands of a man under their wings on their four sides; and they four had their faces and their wings. 
Their wings were joined one to another; they turne
479,rding to the number of thy cities were thy gods, O Judah; and according to the number of the streets of Jerusalem have ye set up altars to that shameful thing, even altars to burn incense unto Baal. 
Therefore pray not thou for this people, neither lift up a cry or prayer for them: for I will not hear them in the time that they cry unto me for their trouble. 
What hath my beloved to do in mine house, seeing she hath wrought lewdness with many, and the holy flesh is passed fr
549,that time forth began Jesus to shew unto his disciples, how that he must go unto Jerusalem, and suffer many things of the elders and chief priests and scribes, and be killed, and be raised again the third day. 
Then Peter took him, and began to rebuke him, saying, Be it far from thee, Lord: this shall not be unto thee. 
But he turned, and said unto Peter, Get thee behind me, Satan: thou art an offence unto me: for thou savourest not the things that be of God, but those that be of men. 
Then said Jesus unto his disciples, If any man will come a
447,to be the ruler; and of the house of Judah, the house of my father; and among the sons of my father he liked me to make me king over all Israel: 
And of all my sons, (for the LORD hath given me many sons,) he hath chosen Solomon my son to sit upon the throne of the kingdom of the LORD over Israel. 
And he said unto me, Solomon thy son, he shall build my house and my courts: for I have chosen him to be my son, and I will be his father. 
Moreove
439,med unto us by them that heard him; 
God also bearing them witness, both with signs and wonders, and with divers miracles, and gifts of the Holy Ghost, according to his own will? 
For unto the angels hath he not put in subjection the world to come, whereof we speak. 
But one in a certain place testified, saying, What is man, that thou art mindful of him? or the son of man that thou visitest him? 
Thou madest him a little lower than the
450, that all things must be fulfilled, which were written in the law of Moses, and in the prophets, and in the psalms, concerning me. 
Then opened he their understanding, that they might understand the scriptures, 
And said unto them, Thus it is written, and thus it behoved Christ to suffer, and to rise from the dead the third day: 
And that repentance and remission of sins should be preached in his name among all nations, beginning at Jerusalem. 
A
480,h they have done unto their gods; so should ye sin against the LORD your God. 
When thou shalt besiege a city a long time, in making war against it to take it, thou shalt not destroy the trees thereof by forcing an axe against them: for thou mayest eat of them, and thou shalt not cut them down (for the tree of the field is man's life) to employ them in the siege: 
Only the trees which thou knowest that they be not trees for meat, thou shalt destroy and cut them down; and thou
404,nd was buried in the city of David his father: and Rehoboam his son reigned in his stead. 
And Rehoboam went to Shechem: for all Israel were come to Shechem to make him king. 
And it came to pass, when Jeroboam the son of Nebat, who was yet in Egypt, heard of it, (for he was fled from the presence of king Solomon, and Jeroboam dwelt in Egypt;) 
That they sent and called him. And Jeroboam and all the c
497,he Judge of quick and dead. 
To him give all the prophets witness, that through his name whosoever believeth in him shall receive remission of sins. 
While Peter yet spake these words, the Holy Ghost fell on all them which heard the word. 
And they of the circumcision which believed were astonished, as many as came with Peter, because that on the Gentiles also was poured out the gift of the Holy Ghost. 
For they heard them speak with tongues, and magnify God. Then answered Peter, 
Can any man
559, none can quench it, because of the evil of your doings. 
Behold, I am against thee, O inhabitant of the valley, and rock of the plain, saith the LORD; which say, Who shall come down against us? or who shall enter into our habitations? 
But I will punish you according to the fruit of your doings, saith the LORD: and I will kindle a fire in the forest thereof, and it shall devour all things round about it. 
Thus saith the LORD; Go down to the house of the king of Judah, and speak there this word, 
And say, Hear the word of the LORD, O king of Judah, that
467,it in a secret place, neither under a bushel, but on a candlestick, that they which come in may see the light. 
The light of the body is the eye: therefore when thine eye is single, thy whole body also is full of light; but when thine eye is evil, thy body also is full of darkness. 
Take heed therefore that the light which is in thee be not darkness. 
If thy whole body therefore be full of light, having no part dark, the whole shall be full of light, as when the 
554,to Gilgal. 
But these five kings fled, and hid themselves in a cave at Makkedah. 
And it was told Joshua, saying, The five kings are found hid in a cave at Makkedah. 
And Joshua said, Roll great stones upon the mouth of the cave, and set men by it for to keep them: 
And stay ye not, but pursue after your enemies, and smite the hindmost of them; suffer them not to enter into their cities: for the LORD your God hath delivered them into your hand. 
And it came to pass, when Joshua and the children of Israel had made an end of slaying them with a very 
430,in that day before thee. 
But I will deliver thee in that day, saith the LORD: and thou shalt not be given into the hand of the men of whom thou art afraid. 
For I will surely deliver thee, and thou shalt not fall by the sword, but thy life shall be for a prey unto thee: because thou hast put thy trust in me, saith the LORD. 
The word that came to Jeremiah from the LORD, after that Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had let 
485,rivily for their own lives. 
So are the ways of every one that is greedy of gain; which taketh away the life of the owners thereof. 
Wisdom crieth without; she uttereth her voice in the streets: 
She crieth in the chief place of concourse, in the openings of the gates: in the city she uttereth her words, saying, 
How long, ye simple ones, will ye love simplicity? and the scorners delight in their scorning, and fools hate knowledge? 
Turn you at my reproof: behold, I will pour out 
460,nd doctrines of men? 
Which things have indeed a shew of wisdom in will worship, and humility, and neglecting of the body: not in any honour to the satisfying of the flesh. 
If ye then be risen with Christ, seek those things which are above, where Christ sitteth on the right hand of God. 
Set your affection on things above, not on things on the earth. 
For ye are dead, and your life is hid with Christ in God. 
When Christ, who is our life, shall appear, th
494,the days of Terah were two hundred and five years: and Terah died in Haran. 
Now the LORD had said unto Abram, Get thee out of thy country, and from thy kindred, and from thy father's house, unto a land that I will shew thee: 
And I will make of thee a great nation, and I will bless thee, and make thy name great; and thou shalt be a blessing: 
And I will bless them that bless thee, and curse him that curseth thee: and in thee shall all families of the earth be blessed. 
So Abram departed, 
436,eamed a dream more; and, behold, the sun and the moon and the eleven stars made obeisance to me. 
And he told it to his father, and to his brethren: and his father rebuked him, and said unto him, What is this dream that thou hast dreamed? Shall I and thy mother and thy brethren indeed come to bow down ourselves to thee to the earth? 
And his brethren envied him; but his father observed the saying. 
And his brethren went to feed thei
492, the fat upon the breasts, and he burnt the fat upon the altar: 
And the breasts and the right shoulder Aaron waved for a wave offering before the LORD; as Moses commanded. 
And Aaron lifted up his hand toward the people, and blessed them, and came down from offering of the sin offering, and the burnt offering, and peace offerings. 
And Moses and Aaron went into the tabernacle of the congregation, and came out, and blessed the people: and the glory of the LORD appeared unto all the peopl
573, up and worshipped, every man in his tent door. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses face to face, as a man speaketh unto his friend. And he turned again into the camp: but his servant Joshua, the son of Nun, a young man, departed not out of the tabernacle. 
And Moses said unto the LORD, See, thou sayest unto me, Bring up this people: and thou hast not let me know whom thou wilt send with me. Yet thou hast said, I know thee by name, and thou hast also found grace in my sight. 
Now therefore, I pray thee, if I have found grace in thy sight, shew me now thy way, that I may k
530,shi, Go tell the king what thou hast seen. And Cushi bowed himself unto Joab, and ran. 
Then said Ahimaaz the son of Zadok yet again to Joab, But howsoever, let me, I pray thee, also run after Cushi. And Joab said, Wherefore wilt thou run, my son, seeing that thou hast no tidings ready? 
But howsoever, said he, let me run. And he said unto him, Run. Then Ahimaaz ran by the way of the plain, and overran Cushi. 
And David sat between the two gates: and the watchman went up to the roof over the gate unto the wall, and lifted up
496,reunto shall I liken this generation? It is like unto children sitting in the markets, and calling unto their fellows, 
And saying, We have piped unto you, and ye have not danced; we have mourned unto you, and ye have not lamented. 
For John came neither eating nor drinking, and they say, He hath a devil. 
The Son of man came eating and drinking, and they say, Behold a man gluttonous, and a winebibber, a friend of publicans and sinners. But wisdom is justified of her children. 
Then began he
426,nothing but that which is true in the name of the LORD? 
And he said, I saw all Israel scattered upon the hills, as sheep that have not a shepherd: and the LORD said, These have no master: let them return every man to his house in peace. 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, Did I not tell thee that he would prophesy no good concerning me, but evil? 
And he said, Hear thou therefore the word of the LORD: I saw the
407,ose things which are coming on the earth: for the powers of heaven shall be shaken. 
And then shall they see the Son of man coming in a cloud with power and great glory. 
And when these things begin to come to pass, then look up, and lift up your heads; for your redemption draweth nigh. 
And he spake to them a parable; Behold the fig tree, and all the trees; 
When they now shoot forth, ye see and know of
537, for us: their defence is departed from them, and the LORD is with us: fear them not. 
But all the congregation bade stone them with stones. And the glory of the LORD appeared in the tabernacle of the congregation before all the children of Israel. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, How long will this people provoke me? and how long will it be ere they believe me, for all the signs which I have shewed among them? 
I will smite them with the pestilence, and disinherit them, and will make of thee a greater nation and mightier than they. 
500,e are verily guilty concerning our brother, in that we saw the anguish of his soul, when he besought us, and we would not hear; therefore is this distress come upon us. 
And Reuben answered them, saying, Spake I not unto you, saying, Do not sin against the child; and ye would not hear? therefore, behold, also his blood is required. 
And they knew not that Joseph understood them; for he spake unto them by an interpreter. 
And he turned himself about from them, and wept; and returned to them again
473,ed to Hagar out of heaven, and said unto her, What aileth thee, Hagar? fear not; for God hath heard the voice of the lad where he is. 
Arise, lift up the lad, and hold him in thine hand; for I will make him a great nation. 
And God opened her eyes, and she saw a well of water; and she went, and filled the bottle with water, and gave the lad drink. 
And God was with the lad; and he grew, and dwelt in the wilderness, and became an archer. 
And he dwelt in the wilderness 
579,Kadesh, and smote all the country of the Amalekites, and also the Amorites, that dwelt in Hazezontamar. 
And there went out the king of Sodom, and the king of Gomorrah, and the king of Admah, and the king of Zeboiim, and the king of Bela (the same is Zoar;) and they joined battle with them in the vale of Siddim; 
With Chedorlaomer the king of Elam, and with Tidal king of nations, and Amraphel king of Shinar, and Arioch king of Ellasar; four kings with five. 
And the vale of Siddim was full of slimepits; and the kings of Sodom and Gomorrah fled, and fell there; and they tha
592,fferings upon it. 
In that night did God appear unto Solomon, and said unto him, Ask what I shall give thee. 
And Solomon said unto God, Thou hast shewed great mercy unto David my father, and hast made me to reign in his stead. 
Now, O LORD God, let thy promise unto David my father be established: for thou hast made me king over a people like the dust of the earth in multitude. 
Give me now wisdom and knowledge, that I may go out and come in before this people: for who can judge this thy people, that is so great? 
And God said to Solomon, Because this was in thine heart, and thou hast 
594,whose land ye dwell: but as for me and my house, we will serve the LORD. 
And the people answered and said, God forbid that we should forsake the LORD, to serve other gods; 
For the LORD our God, he it is that brought us up and our fathers out of the land of Egypt, from the house of bondage, and which did those great signs in our sight, and preserved us in all the way wherein we went, and among all the people through whom we passed: 
And the LORD drave out from before us all the people, even the Amorites which dwelt in the land: therefore will we also serve the LORD; for he is our God. 

475,udgments, which ye shall observe to do in the land, which the LORD God of thy fathers giveth thee to possess it, all the days that ye live upon the earth. 
Ye shall utterly destroy all the places, wherein the nations which ye shall possess served their gods, upon the high mountains, and upon the hills, and under every green tree: 
And ye shall overthrow their altars, and break their pillars, and burn their groves with fire; and ye shall hew down the graven images of thei
448,wn a certain priest that way: and when he saw him, he passed by on the other side. 
And likewise a Levite, when he was at the place, came and looked on him, and passed by on the other side. 
But a certain Samaritan, as he journeyed, came where he was: and when he saw him, he had compassion on him, 
And went to him, and bound up his wounds, pouring in oil and wine, and set him on his own beast, and brought him to an inn, and took care of him. 
A
493,rd gave the word: great was the company of those that published it. 
Kings of armies did flee apace: and she that tarried at home divided the spoil. 
Though ye have lien among the pots, yet shall ye be as the wings of a dove covered with silver, and her feathers with yellow gold. 
When the Almighty scattered kings in it, it was white as snow in Salmon. 
The hill of God is as the hill of Bashan; an high hill as the hill of Bashan. 
Why leap ye, ye high hills? this is the hill which God des
442,head; Judah is my lawgiver; 
Moab is my washpot; over Edom will I cast out my shoe; over Philistia will I triumph. 
Who will bring me into the strong city? who will lead me into Edom? 
Wilt not thou, O God, who hast cast us off? and wilt not thou, O God, go forth with our hosts? 
Give us help from trouble: for vain is the help of man. 
Through God we shall do valiantly: for he it is that shall tread down our enemies. 
Hold not thy peace, 
419,as though I had seen the face of God, and thou wast pleased with me. 
Take, I pray thee, my blessing that is brought to thee; because God hath dealt graciously with me, and because I have enough. And he urged him, and he took it. 
And he said, Let us take our journey, and let us go, and I will go before thee. 
And he said unto him, My lord knoweth that the children are tender, and the flocks and herds with young are
424,e circumcision. 
And the LORD said to Aaron, Go into the wilderness to meet Moses. And he went, and met him in the mount of God, and kissed him. 
And Moses told Aaron all the words of the LORD who had sent him, and all the signs which he had commanded him. 
And Moses and Aaron went and gathered together all the elders of the children of Israel: 
And Aaron spake all the words which the LORD had spoken unto Moses, and did 
477,od: 
And every spirit that confesseth not that Jesus Christ is come in the flesh is not of God: and this is that spirit of antichrist, whereof ye have heard that it should come; and even now already is it in the world. 
Ye are of God, little children, and have overcome them: because greater is he that is in you, than he that is in the world. 
They are of the world: therefore speak they of the world, and the world heareth them. 
We are of God: he that knoweth God heareth us
480,LORD rejoiced over you to do you good, and to multiply you; so the LORD will rejoice over you to destroy you, and to bring you to nought; and ye shall be plucked from off the land whither thou goest to possess it. 
And the LORD shall scatter thee among all people, from the one end of the earth even unto the other; and there thou shalt serve other gods, which neither thou nor thy fathers have known, even wood and stone. 
And among these nations shalt thou find no ease, neither
597,so the LORD pitieth them that fear him. 
For he knoweth our frame; he remembereth that we are dust. 
As for man, his days are as grass: as a flower of the field, so he flourisheth. 
For the wind passeth over it, and it is gone; and the place thereof shall know it no more. 
But the mercy of the LORD is from everlasting to everlasting upon them that fear him, and his righteousness unto children's children; 
To such as keep his covenant, and to those that remember his commandments to do them. 
The LORD hath prepared his throne in the heavens; and his kingdom ruleth over all. 
Bless the LORD, y
484,and make a wall, that she shall not find her paths. 
And she shall follow after her lovers, but she shall not overtake them; and she shall seek them, but shall not find them: then shall she say, I will go and return to my first husband; for then was it better with me than now. 
For she did not know that I gave her corn, and wine, and oil, and multiplied her silver and gold, which they prepared for Baal. 
Therefore will I return, and take away my corn in the time thereof, and my w
541, day of judgment, than for you. 
And thou, Capernaum, which art exalted unto heaven, shalt be brought down to hell: for if the mighty works, which have been done in thee, had been done in Sodom, it would have remained until this day. 
But I say unto you, That it shall be more tolerable for the land of Sodom in the day of judgment, than for thee. 
At that time Jesus answered and said, I thank thee, O Father, Lord of heaven and earth, because thou hast hid these things from the wise and prudent, and hast revealed them unto babes. 
Even s
578,ir for the tent over the tabernacle: eleven curtains he made them. 
The length of one curtain was thirty cubits, and four cubits was the breadth of one curtain: the eleven curtains were of one size. 
And he coupled five curtains by themselves, and six curtains by themselves. 
And he made fifty loops upon the uttermost edge of the curtain in the coupling, and fifty loops made he upon the edge of the curtain which coupleth the second. 
And he made fifty taches of brass to couple the tent together, that it might be one. 
And he made a covering for the tent of rams' skins dye
500,pon him. 
And he left the oxen, and ran after Elijah, and said, Let me, I pray thee, kiss my father and my mother, and then I will follow thee. And he said unto him, Go back again: for what have I done to thee? 
And he returned back from him, and took a yoke of oxen, and slew them, and boiled their flesh with the instruments of the oxen, and gave unto the people, and they did eat. Then he arose, and went after Elijah, and ministered unto him. 
And Benhadad the king of Syria gathered all his host
591,e prayer which thy servant prayeth before thee: 
That thine eyes may be open upon this house day and night, upon the place whereof thou hast said that thou wouldest put thy name there; to hearken unto the prayer which thy servant prayeth toward this place. 
Hearken therefore unto the supplications of thy servant, and of thy people Israel, which they shall make toward this place: hear thou from thy dwelling place, even from heaven; and when thou hearest, forgive. 
If a man sin against his neighbour, and an oath be laid upon him to make him swear, and the oath come before thine altar in
514,aron's sons, shall sprinkle his blood round about upon the altar. 
And he shall cut it into his pieces, with his head and his fat: and the priest shall lay them in order on the wood that is on the fire which is upon the altar: 
But he shall wash the inwards and the legs with water: and the priest shall bring it all, and burn it upon the altar: it is a burnt sacrifice, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And if the burnt sacrifice for his offering to the LORD be of fowls, then he shall 
467,sheth the son of Saul thine enemy, which sought thy life; and the LORD hath avenged my lord the king this day of Saul, and of his seed. 
And David answered Rechab and Baanah his brother, the sons of Rimmon the Beerothite, and said unto them, As the LORD liveth, who hath redeemed my soul out of all adversity, 
When one told me, saying, Behold, Saul is dead, thinking to have brought good tidings, I took hold of him, and slew him in Ziklag, who thought that I would 
538,e LORD had spoken these words unto Job, the LORD said to Eliphaz the Temanite, My wrath is kindled against thee, and against thy two friends: for ye have not spoken of me the thing that is right, as my servant Job hath. 
Therefore take unto you now seven bullocks and seven rams, and go to my servant Job, and offer up for yourselves a burnt offering; and my servant Job shall pray for you: for him will I accept: lest I deal with you after your folly, in that ye have not spoken of me the thing which is right, like my servant Job. 
So E
508,be done. 
Heaven and earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass away. 
But of that day and that hour knoweth no man, no, not the angels which are in heaven, neither the Son, but the Father. 
Take ye heed, watch and pray: for ye know not when the time is. 
For the Son of Man is as a man taking a far journey, who left his house, and gave authority to his servants, and to every man his work, and commanded the porter to watch. 
Watch ye therefore: for ye know not when the master of the house cometh,
550,take possession of the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite, which he refused to give thee for money: for Naboth is not alive, but dead. 
And it came to pass, when Ahab heard that Naboth was dead, that Ahab rose up to go down to the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite, to take possession of it. 
And the word of the LORD came to Elijah the Tishbite, saying, 
Arise, go down to meet Ahab king of Israel, which is in Samaria: behold, he is in the vineyard of Naboth, whither he is gone down to possess it. 
And thou shalt speak unto him, saying, Thus saith
516, in Judaea heard that the Gentiles had also received the word of God. 
And when Peter was come up to Jerusalem, they that were of the circumcision contended with him, 
Saying, Thou wentest in to men uncircumcised, and didst eat with them. 
But Peter rehearsed the matter from the beginning, and expounded it by order unto them, saying, 
I was in the city of Joppa praying: and in a trance I saw a vision, A certain vessel descend, as it had been a great sheet, let down from heaven by four corners; and it came even 
465,o all her sons and her daughters, portions: 
But unto Hannah he gave a worthy portion; for he loved Hannah: but the LORD had shut up her womb. 
And her adversary also provoked her sore, for to make her fret, because the LORD had shut up her womb. 
And as he did so year by year, when she went up to the house of the LORD, so she provoked her; therefore she wept, and did not eat. 
Then said Elkanah her husband to her, Hannah, why weepest thou? and why eatest thou 
468,ather, said he, was mine help, and delivered me from the sword of Pharaoh: 
And Jethro, Moses' father in law, came with his sons and his wife unto Moses into the wilderness, where he encamped at the mount of God: 
And he said unto Moses, I thy father in law Jethro am come unto thee, and thy wife, and her two sons with her. 
And Moses went out to meet his father in law, and did obeisance, and kissed him; and they asked each other of their welfare; and they came int
561,
Create in me a clean heart, O God; and renew a right spirit within me. 
Cast me not away from thy presence; and take not thy holy spirit from me. 
Restore unto me the joy of thy salvation; and uphold me with thy free spirit. 
Then will I teach transgressors thy ways; and sinners shall be converted unto thee. 
Deliver me from bloodguiltiness, O God, thou God of my salvation: and my tongue shall sing aloud of thy righteousness. 
O Lord, open thou my lips; and my mouth shall shew forth thy praise. 
For thou desirest not sacrifice; else would I give it: thou
597,an ass, with five damsels of hers that went after her; and she went after the messengers of David, and became his wife. 
David also took Ahinoam of Jezreel; and they were also both of them his wives. 
But Saul had given Michal his daughter, David's wife, to Phalti the son of Laish, which was of Gallim. 
And the Ziphites came unto Saul to Gibeah, saying, Doth not David hide himself in the hill of Hachilah, which is before Jeshimon? 
Then Saul arose, and went down to the wilderness of Ziph, having three thousand chosen men of Israel with him, to seek David in the wilderness of Ziph. 
And Saul
585,hem. 
Ye have multiplied your slain in this city, and ye have filled the streets thereof with the slain. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Your slain whom ye have laid in the midst of it, they are the flesh, and this city is the caldron: but I will bring you forth out of the midst of it. 
Ye have feared the sword; and I will bring a sword upon you, saith the Lord GOD. 
And I will bring you out of the midst thereof, and deliver you into the hands of strangers, and will execute judgments among you. 
Ye shall fall by the sword; I will judge you in the border of Israel; and ye sha
590, men of Benjamin with him, and Ziba the servant of the house of Saul, and his fifteen sons and his twenty servants with him; and they went over Jordan before the king. 
And there went over a ferry boat to carry over the king's household, and to do what he thought good. And Shimei the son of Gera fell down before the king, as he was come over Jordan; 
And said unto the king, Let not my lord impute iniquity unto me, neither do thou remember that which thy servant did perversely the day that my lord the king went out of Jerusalem, that the king should take it to his heart. 
For thy serv
414,n, who hath gendered it? 
The waters are hid as with a stone, and the face of the deep is frozen. 
Canst thou bind the sweet influences of Pleiades, or loose the bands of Orion? 
Canst thou bring forth Mazzaroth in his season? or canst thou guide Arcturus with his sons? 
Knowest thou the ordinances of heaven? canst thou set the dominion thereof in the earth? 
Canst thou lift up thy voice to the clouds, that abu
539,udged of no man. 
For who hath known the mind of the Lord, that he may instruct him? but we have the mind of Christ. 
And I, brethren, could not speak unto you as unto spiritual, but as unto carnal, even as unto babes in Christ. 
I have fed you with milk, and not with meat: for hitherto ye were not able to bear it, neither yet now are ye able. 
For ye are yet carnal: for whereas there is among you envying, and strife, and divisions, are ye not carnal, and walk as men? 
For while one saith, I am of Paul; and another, I am of Apollos; 
473, come eating and drinking; and ye say, Behold a gluttonous man, and a winebibber, a friend of publicans and sinners! 
But wisdom is justified of all her children. 
And one of the Pharisees desired him that he would eat with him. And he went into the Pharisee's house, and sat down to meat. 
And, behold, a woman in the city, which was a sinner, when she knew that Jesus sat at meat in the Pharisee's house, brought an alabaster box of ointment, 
And stood at his feet behin
556, her suburbs, 
And Jattir with her suburbs, and Eshtemoa with her suburbs, 
And Holon with her suburbs, and Debir with her suburbs, 
And Ain with her suburbs, and Juttah with her suburbs, and Bethshemesh with her suburbs; nine cities out of those two tribes. 
And out of the tribe of Benjamin, Gibeon with her suburbs, Geba with her suburbs, 
Anathoth with her suburbs, and Almon with her suburbs; four cities. 
All the cities of the children of Aaron, the priests, were thirteen cities with their suburbs. 
And the families of the children of Kohath, the 
412, so shall it come to pass; and as I have purposed, so shall it stand: 
That I will break the Assyrian in my land, and upon my mountains tread him under foot: then shall his yoke depart from off them, and his burden depart from off their shoulders. 
This is the purpose that is purposed upon the whole earth: and this is the hand that is stretched out upon all the nations. 
For the LORD of hosts hath purposed, a
526,ason of uncleanness that chanceth him by night, then shall he go abroad out of the camp, he shall not come within the camp: 
But it shall be, when evening cometh on, he shall wash himself with water: and when the sun is down, he shall come into the camp again. 
Thou shalt have a place also without the camp, whither thou shalt go forth abroad: 
And thou shalt have a paddle upon thy weapon; and it shall be, when thou wilt ease thyself abroad, thou shalt dig therewith, and shalt turn back and cover that which cometh from th
488,of the Son of God; that ye may know that ye have eternal life, and that ye may believe on the name of the Son of God. 
And this is the confidence that we have in him, that, if we ask any thing according to his will, he heareth us: 
And if we know that he hear us, whatsoever we ask, we know that we have the petitions that we desired of him. 
If any man see his brother sin a sin which is not unto death, he shall ask, and he shall give him life for them that sin not unto death. There is
531,mbers. 
I have set the point of the sword against all their gates, that their heart may faint, and their ruins be multiplied: ah! it is made bright, it is wrapped up for the slaughter. 
Go thee one way or other, either on the right hand, or on the left, whithersoever thy face is set. 
I will also smite mine hands together, and I will cause my fury to rest: I the LORD have said it. 
The word of the LORD came unto me again, saying, 
Also, thou son of man, appoint thee two ways, that the sword of the king of Babylon may come: bo
533,n nothing! 
O Israel, thy prophets are like the foxes in the deserts. 
Ye have not gone up into the gaps, neither made up the hedge for the house of Israel to stand in the battle in the day of the LORD. 
They have seen vanity and lying divination, saying, The LORD saith: and the LORD hath not sent them: and they have made others to hope that they would confirm the word. 
Have ye not seen a vain vision, and have ye not spoken a lying divination, whereas ye say, The LORD saith it; albeit I have not spoken? 
Therefore thus saith t
556,is hands unto the LORD: and the thunders and hail ceased, and the rain was not poured upon the earth. 
And when Pharaoh saw that the rain and the hail and the thunders were ceased, he sinned yet more, and hardened his heart, he and his servants. 
And the heart of Pharaoh was hardened, neither would he let the children of Israel go; as the LORD had spoken by Moses. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Go in unto Pharaoh: for I have hardened his heart, and the heart of his servants, that I might shew these my signs before him: 
And that thou mayest tell in t
487,easant fruits; camphire, with spikenard, 
Spikenard and saffron; calamus and cinnamon, with all trees of frankincense; myrrh and aloes, with all the chief spices: 
A fountain of gardens, a well of living waters, and streams from Lebanon. 
Awake, O north wind; and come, thou south; blow upon my garden, that the spices thereof may flow out. Let my beloved come into his garden, and eat his pleasant fruits. 
I am come into my garden, my sister, my spouse: I have gathered my myrrh with m
441, 
Consider how I love thy precepts: quicken me, O LORD, according to thy lovingkindness. 
Thy word is true from the beginning: and every one of thy righteous judgments endureth for ever. 
Princes have persecuted me without a cause: but my heart standeth in awe of thy word. 
I rejoice at thy word, as one that findeth great spoil. 
I hate and abhor lying: but thy law do I love. 
Seven times a day do I praise thee because of thy righteous j
522,RD: and the priests, Aaron's sons, shall sprinkle his blood round about upon the altar. 
And he shall cut it into his pieces, with his head and his fat: and the priest shall lay them in order on the wood that is on the fire which is upon the altar: 
But he shall wash the inwards and the legs with water: and the priest shall bring it all, and burn it upon the altar: it is a burnt sacrifice, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And if the burnt sacrifice for his offering to the LORD be of fowls, 
504, your sakes, O house of Israel, but for mine holy name's sake, which ye have profaned among the heathen, whither ye went. 
And I will sanctify my great name, which was profaned among the heathen, which ye have profaned in the midst of them; and the heathen shall know that I am the LORD, saith the Lord GOD, when I shall be sanctified in you before their eyes. 
For I will take you from among the heathen, and gather you out of all countries, and will bring you into your own land. 
Then will I sprinkle 
467,rom thee: quicken us, and we will call upon thy name. 
Turn us again, O LORD God of hosts, cause thy face to shine; and we shall be saved. 
Sing aloud unto God our strength: make a joyful noise unto the God of Jacob. 
Take a psalm, and bring hither the timbrel, the pleasant harp with the psaltery. 
Blow up the trumpet in the new moon, in the time appointed, on our solemn feast day. 
For this was a statute for Israel, and a law of the God of Jacob. 
This he ordain
582,goeth down from Jerusalem unto Gaza, which is desert. 
And he arose and went: and, behold, a man of Ethiopia, an eunuch of great authority under Candace queen of the Ethiopians, who had the charge of all her treasure, and had come to Jerusalem for to worship, 
Was returning, and sitting in his chariot read Esaias the prophet. 
Then the Spirit said unto Philip, Go near, and join thyself to this chariot. 
And Philip ran thither to him, and heard him read the prophet Esaias, and said, Understandest thou what thou readest? 
And he said, How can I, except some man should guide me?
560,RD. 
But ye gave the Nazarites wine to drink; and commanded the prophets, saying, Prophesy not. 
Behold, I am pressed under you, as a cart is pressed that is full of sheaves. 
Therefore the flight shall perish from the swift, and the strong shall not strengthen his force, neither shall the mighty deliver himself: 
Neither shall he stand that handleth the bow; and he that is swift of foot shall not deliver himself: neither shall he that rideth the horse deliver himself. 
And he that is courageous among the mighty shall flee away naked in that day, saith t
596,n bitter words: 
That they may shoot in secret at the perfect: suddenly do they shoot at him, and fear not. 
They encourage themselves in an evil matter: they commune of laying snares privily; they say, Who shall see them? 
They search out iniquities; they accomplish a diligent search: both the inward thought of every one of them, and the heart, is deep. 
But God shall shoot at them with an arrow; suddenly shall they be wounded. 
So they shall make their own tongue to fall upon themselves: all that see them shall flee away. 
And all men shall fear, and shall declare the work of God; for th
549,s own house. 
And he did not many mighty works there because of their unbelief. 
At that time Herod the tetrarch heard of the fame of Jesus, 
And said unto his servants, This is John the Baptist; he is risen from the dead; and therefore mighty works do shew forth themselves in him. 
For Herod had laid hold on John, and bound him, and put him in prison for Herodias' sake, his brother Philip's wife. 
For John said unto him, It is not lawful for thee to have her. 
And when he would have put him to death, he feared the multitude, because they coun
570,harisee's house, brought an alabaster box of ointment, 
And stood at his feet behind him weeping, and began to wash his feet with tears, and did wipe them with the hairs of her head, and kissed his feet, and anointed them with the ointment. 
Now when the Pharisee which had bidden him saw it, he spake within himself, saying, This man, if he were a prophet, would have known who and what manner of woman this is that toucheth him: for she is a sinner. 
And Jesus answering said unto him, Simon, I have somewhat to say unto thee. And he saith, Master, say on. 
There was 
473,saved was then taken away. 
But after long abstinence Paul stood forth in the midst of them, and said, Sirs, ye should have hearkened unto me, and not have loosed from Crete, and to have gained this harm and loss. 
And now I exhort you to be of good cheer: for there shall be no loss of any man's life among you, but of the ship. 
For there stood by me this night the angel of God, whose I am, and whom I serve, 
Saying, Fear not, Paul; thou must be brought before Caesar: 
462,ess that taketh his name in vain. 
Remember the sabbath day, to keep it holy. 
Six days shalt thou labour, and do all thy work: 
But the seventh day is the sabbath of the LORD thy God: in it thou shalt not do any work, thou, nor thy son, nor thy daughter, thy manservant, nor thy maidservant, nor thy cattle, nor thy stranger that is within thy gates: 
For in six days the LORD made heaven and earth, the sea, and all that in them is, and rested the seventh day:
478,bededom, and all that he had. 
Now Hiram king of Tyre sent messengers to David, and timber of cedars, with masons and carpenters, to build him an house. 
And David perceived that the LORD had confirmed him king over Israel, for his kingdom was lifted up on high, because of his people Israel. 
And David took more wives at Jerusalem: and David begat more sons and daughters. 
Now these are the names of his children which he had in Jerusalem; Shammua, and Shobab, Nathan, and So
548,ion, and doth teach him. 
For the fitches are not threshed with a threshing instrument, neither is a cart wheel turned about upon the cummin; but the fitches are beaten out with a staff, and the cummin with a rod. 
Bread corn is bruised; because he will not ever be threshing it, nor break it with the wheel of his cart, nor bruise it with his horsemen. 
This also cometh forth from the LORD of hosts, which is wonderful in counsel, and excellent in working. 
Woe to Ariel, to Ariel, the city where David dwelt! add ye year to year; let them kill s
540, Bakbakkar, Heresh, and Galal, and Mattaniah the son of Micah, the son of Zichri, the son of Asaph; 
And Obadiah the son of Shemaiah, the son of Galal, the son of Jeduthun, and Berechiah the son of Asa, the son of Elkanah, that dwelt in the villages of the Netophathites. 
And the porters were, Shallum, and Akkub, and Talmon, and Ahiman, and their brethren: Shallum was the chief; 
Who hitherto waited in the king's gate eastward: they were porters in the companies of the children of Levi. 
And Shallum the son of Kore, the son of Ebiasap
509,r be in vain. 
But now when Timotheus came from you unto us, and brought us good tidings of your faith and charity, and that ye have good remembrance of us always, desiring greatly to see us, as we also to see you: 
Therefore, brethren, we were comforted over you in all our affliction and distress by your faith: 
For now we live, if ye stand fast in the Lord. 
For what thanks can we render to God again for you, for all the joy wherewith we joy for your sakes before our God; 
Night and day praying exceedi
428,And in Shushan the palace the Jews slew and destroyed five hundred men. 
And Parshandatha, and Dalphon, and Aspatha, 
And Poratha, and Adalia, and Aridatha, 
And Parmashta, and Arisai, and Aridai, and Vajezatha, 
The ten sons of Haman the son of Hammedatha, the enemy of the Jews, slew they; but on the spoil laid they not their hand. 
On that day the number of those that were slain in Shushan the palace was brought before the
574,tines have invaded the land. 
Wherefore Saul returned from pursuing after David, and went against the Philistines: therefore they called that place Selahammahlekoth. 
And David went up from thence, and dwelt in strong holds at Engedi. 
And it came to pass, when Saul was returned from following the Philistines, that it was told him, saying, Behold, David is in the wilderness of Engedi. 
Then Saul took three thousand chosen men out of all Israel, and went to seek David and his men upon the rocks of the wild goats. 
And he came to the sheepcotes by the way, where was a c
587,rist Jesus. 
That good thing which was committed unto thee keep by the Holy Ghost which dwelleth in us. 
This thou knowest, that all they which are in Asia be turned away from me; of whom are Phygellus and Hermogenes. 
The Lord give mercy unto the house of Onesiphorus; for he oft refreshed me, and was not ashamed of my chain: 
But, when he was in Rome, he sought me out very diligently, and found me. 
The Lord grant unto him that he may find mercy of the Lord in that day: and in how many things he ministered unto me at Ephesus, thou knowest very well. 
Thou therefore, my son, be st
557, the court of the prison until the day that Jerusalem was taken: and he was there when Jerusalem was taken. 
In the ninth year of Zedekiah king of Judah, in the tenth month, came Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon and all his army against Jerusalem, and they besieged it. 
And in the eleventh year of Zedekiah, in the fourth month, the ninth day of the month, the city was broken up. 
And all the princes of the king of Babylon came in, and sat in the middle gate, even Nergalsharezer, Samgarnebo, Sarsechim, Rabsaris, Nergalsharezer, Rabmag, with all the resid
470, his word was in my tongue. 
The God of Israel said, the Rock of Israel spake to me, He that ruleth over men must be just, ruling in the fear of God. 
And he shall be as the light of the morning, when the sun riseth, even a morning without clouds; as the tender grass springing out of the earth by clear shining after rain. 
Although my house be not so with God; yet he hath made with me an everlasting covenant, ordered in all things, and sure: for this is all my salva
485,m not come to destroy, but to fulfil. 
For verily I say unto you, Till heaven and earth pass, one jot or one tittle shall in no wise pass from the law, till all be fulfilled. 
Whosoever therefore shall break one of these least commandments, and shall teach men so, he shall be called the least in the kingdom of heaven: but whosoever shall do and teach them, the same shall be called great in the kingdom of heaven. 
For I say unto you, That except your righteousness shall exceed the 
559,r kind, and every winged fowl after his kind: and God saw that it was good. 
And God blessed them, saying, Be fruitful, and multiply, and fill the waters in the seas, and let fowl multiply in the earth. 
And the evening and the morning were the fifth day. 
And God said, Let the earth bring forth the living creature after his kind, cattle, and creeping thing, and beast of the earth after his kind: and it was so. 
And God made the beast of the earth after his kind, and cattle after their kind, and every thing that creepeth upon the earth after his kind: a
412,hrough your prayer, and the supply of the Spirit of Jesus Christ, 
According to my earnest expectation and my hope, that in nothing I shall be ashamed, but that with all boldness, as always, so now also Christ shall be magnified in my body, whether it be by life, or by death. 
For to me to live is Christ, and to die is gain. 
But if I live in the flesh, this is the fruit of my labour: yet what I shall choose 
531,ahpanhes, saying, 
Take great stones in thine hand, and hide them in the clay in the brickkiln, which is at the entry of Pharaoh's house in Tahpanhes, in the sight of the men of Judah; 
And say unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will send and take Nebuchadrezzar the king of Babylon, my servant, and will set his throne upon these stones that I have hid; and he shall spread his royal pavilion over them. 
And when he cometh, he shall smite the land of Egypt, and deliver such as are for death to
570,ate me without a cause. 
For they speak not peace: but they devise deceitful matters against them that are quiet in the land. 
Yea, they opened their mouth wide against me, and said, Aha, aha, our eye hath seen it. 
This thou hast seen, O LORD: keep not silence: O Lord, be not far from me. 
Stir up thyself, and awake to my judgment, even unto my cause, my God and my Lord. 
Judge me, O LORD my God, according to thy righteousness; and let them not rejoice over me. 
Let them not say in their hearts, Ah, so would we have it: let them not say, We have swallowed him up.
426,he LORD. 
The fourteenth day of the second month at even they shall keep it, and eat it with unleavened bread and bitter herbs. 
They shall leave none of it unto the morning, nor break any bone of it: according to all the ordinances of the passover they shall keep it. 
But the man that is clean, and is not in a journey, and forbeareth to keep the passover, even the same soul shall be cut off from among his people: because 
515,ine. 
This is the law of the Nazarite who hath vowed, and of his offering unto the LORD for his separation, beside that that his hand shall get: according to the vow which he vowed, so he must do after the law of his separation. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron and unto his sons, saying, On this wise ye shall bless the children of Israel, saying unto them, 
The LORD bless thee, and keep thee: 
The LORD make his face shine upon thee, and be gracious unto thee: 
The LORD lift up his coun
524,ria: and Ahab his son reigned in his stead. 
And in the thirty and eighth year of Asa king of Judah began Ahab the son of Omri to reign over Israel: and Ahab the son of Omri reigned over Israel in Samaria twenty and two years. 
And Ahab the son of Omri did evil in the sight of the LORD above all that were before him. 
And it came to pass, as if it had been a light thing for him to walk in the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, that he took to wife Jezebel the daughter of Ethbaal king of the Zidonians, and went and serv
464, with plenty, and thy presses shall burst out with new wine. 
My son, despise not the chastening of the LORD; neither be weary of his correction: 
For whom the LORD loveth he correcteth; even as a father the son in whom he delighteth. 
Happy is the man that findeth wisdom, and the man that getteth understanding. 
For the merchandise of it is better than the merchandise of silver, and the gain thereof than fine gold. 
She is more precious than rubies: and all t
417,s tent, and came and dwelt in the plain of Mamre, which is in Hebron, and built there an altar unto the LORD. 
And it came to pass in the days of Amraphel king of Shinar, Arioch king of Ellasar, Chedorlaomer king of Elam, and Tidal king of nations; 
That these made war with Bera king of Sodom, and with Birsha king of Gomorrah, Shinab king of Admah, and Shemeber king of Zeboiim, and the king of Bela, which is Zoar.
439, me there should be yea yea, and nay nay? 
But as God is true, our word toward you was not yea and nay. 
For the Son of God, Jesus Christ, who was preached among you by us, even by me and Silvanus and Timotheus, was not yea and nay, but in him was yea. 
For all the promises of God in him are yea, and in him Amen, unto the glory of God by us. 
Now he which stablisheth us with you in Christ, and hath anointed us, is God; 
Who hath also s
523,eth their enemies: and if any man will hurt them, he must in this manner be killed. 
These have power to shut heaven, that it rain not in the days of their prophecy: and have power over waters to turn them to blood, and to smite the earth with all plagues, as often as they will. 
And when they shall have finished their testimony, the beast that ascendeth out of the bottomless pit shall make war against them, and shall overcome them, and kill them. 
And their dead bodies shall lie in the street of the great city, which
495,d Tibni the son of Ginath, to make him king; and half followed Omri. 
But the people that followed Omri prevailed against the people that followed Tibni the son of Ginath: so Tibni died, and Omri reigned. 
In the thirty and first year of Asa king of Judah began Omri to reign over Israel, twelve years: six years reigned he in Tirzah. 
And he bought the hill Samaria of Shemer for two talents of silver, and built on the hill, and called the name of the city which he built, after the name of Sh
590,ng in and going out at Jerusalem. 
And he spake boldly in the name of the Lord Jesus, and disputed against the Grecians: but they went about to slay him. 
Which when the brethren knew, they brought him down to Caesarea, and sent him forth to Tarsus. 
Then had the churches rest throughout all Judaea and Galilee and Samaria, and were edified; and walking in the fear of the Lord, and in the comfort of the Holy Ghost, were multiplied. 
And it came to pass, as Peter passed throughout all quarters, he came down also to the saints which dwelt at Lydda. 
And there he found a certain man name
464,and smitten Judah, and carried away captives. 
The Philistines also had invaded the cities of the low country, and of the south of Judah, and had taken Bethshemesh, and Ajalon, and Gederoth, and Shocho with the villages thereof, and Timnah with the villages thereof, Gimzo also and the villages thereof: and they dwelt there. 
For the LORD brought Judah low because of Ahaz king of Israel; for he made Judah naked, and transgressed sore against the LORD. 
And Tilg
441,nto Azzah, the Caphtorims, which came forth out of Caphtor, destroyed them, and dwelt in their stead.) 
Rise ye up, take your journey, and pass over the river Arnon: behold, I have given into thine hand Sihon the Amorite, king of Heshbon, and his land: begin to possess it, and contend with him in battle. 
This day will I begin to put the dread of thee and the fear of thee upon the nations that are under the whole heaven, who shall hear r
439, his understanding. 
He giveth power to the faint; and to them that have no might he increaseth strength. 
Even the youths shall faint and be weary, and the young men shall utterly fall: 
But they that wait upon the LORD shall renew their strength; they shall mount up with wings as eagles; they shall run, and not be weary; and they shall walk, and not faint. 
Keep silence before me, O islands; and let the people renew their strength: l
580, thing upon his day: 
Beside the sabbaths of the LORD, and beside your gifts, and beside all your vows, and beside all your freewill offerings, which ye give unto the LORD. 
Also in the fifteenth day of the seventh month, when ye have gathered in the fruit of the land, ye shall keep a feast unto the LORD seven days: on the first day shall be a sabbath, and on the eighth day shall be a sabbath. 
And ye shall take you on the first day the boughs of goodly trees, branches of palm trees, and the boughs of thick trees, and willows of the brook; and ye shall rejoice before the LO
407, had eaten, his spirit came again to him: for he had eaten no bread, nor drunk any water, three days and three nights. 
And David said unto him, To whom belongest thou? and whence art thou? And he said, I am a young man of Egypt, servant to an Amalekite; and my master left me, because three days agone I fell sick. 
We made an invasion upon the south of the Cherethites, and upon the coast which belongeth 
583, this land: must I needs bring thy son again unto the land from whence thou camest? 
And Abraham said unto him, Beware thou that thou bring not my son thither again. 
The LORD God of heaven, which took me from my father's house, and from the land of my kindred, and which spake unto me, and that sware unto me, saying, Unto thy seed will I give this land; he shall send his angel before thee, and thou shalt take a wife unto my son from thence. 
And if the woman will not be willing to follow thee, then thou shalt be clear from this my oath: only bring not my son thither again. 
An
414, over the fourth part of the earth, to kill with sword, and with hunger, and with death, and with the beasts of the earth. 
And when he had opened the fifth seal, I saw under the altar the souls of them that were slain for the word of God, and for the testimony which they held: 
And they cried with a loud voice, saying, How long, O Lord, holy and true, dost thou not judge and avenge our blood on them that dwell
508,on. 
And these are they whom David set over the service of song in the house of the LORD, after that the ark had rest. 
And they ministered before the dwelling place of the tabernacle of the congregation with singing, until Solomon had built the house of the LORD in Jerusalem: and then they waited on their office according to their order. 
And these are they that waited with their children. Of the sons of the Kohathites: Heman a singer, the son of Joel, the son of Shemuel, 
The son of Elkanah, the son o
512,leasant to the eyes, and a tree to be desired to make one wise, she took of the fruit thereof, and did eat, and gave also unto her husband with her; and he did eat. 
And the eyes of them both were opened, and they knew that they were naked; and they sewed fig leaves together, and made themselves aprons. 
And they heard the voice of the LORD God walking in the garden in the cool of the day: and Adam and his wife hid themselves from the presence of the LORD God amongst the trees of the garden. 
And the LORD G
493,eliver us into the hand of the Amorites, to destroy us. 
Whither shall we go up? our brethren have discouraged our heart, saying, The people is greater and taller than we; the cities are great and walled up to heaven; and moreover we have seen the sons of the Anakims there. 
Then I said unto you, Dread not, neither be afraid of them. 
The LORD your God which goeth before you, he shall fight for you, according to all that he did for you in Egypt before your eyes; 
And in the wilderness, wh
596,not kept his commandments, and their lies caused them to err, after the which their fathers have walked: 
But I will send a fire upon Judah, and it shall devour the palaces of Jerusalem. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Israel, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they sold the righteous for silver, and the poor for a pair of shoes; 
That pant after the dust of the earth on the head of the poor, and turn aside the way of the meek: and a man and his father will go in unto the same maid, to profane my holy name: 
And they lay themselves down upo
499,rms thereof, and all the ordinances thereof, and all the forms thereof, and all the laws thereof: and write it in their sight, that they may keep the whole form thereof, and all the ordinances thereof, and do them. 
This is the law of the house; Upon the top of the mountain the whole limit thereof round about shall be most holy. Behold, this is the law of the house. 
And these are the measures of the altar after the cubits: The cubit is a cubit and an hand breadth; even the bottom shall be a cu
505,est the deeds of the Nicolaitanes, which I also hate. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches; To him that overcometh will I give to eat of the tree of life, which is in the midst of the paradise of God. 
And unto the angel of the church in Smyrna write; These things saith the first and the last, which was dead, and is alive; 
I know thy works, and tribulation, and poverty, (but thou art rich) and I know the blasphemy of them which say they are Jews, and are not, bu
548, do ye not rather suffer yourselves to be defrauded? 
Nay, ye do wrong, and defraud, and that your brethren. 
Know ye not that the unrighteous shall not inherit the kingdom of God? Be not deceived: neither fornicators, nor idolaters, nor adulterers, nor effeminate, nor abusers of themselves with mankind, 
Nor thieves, nor covetous, nor drunkards, nor revilers, nor extortioners, shall inherit the kingdom of God. 
And such were some of you: but ye are washed, but ye are sanctified, but ye are justified in the name of the Lord Jesus, and by the 
432,o the four angels, to whom it was given to hurt the earth and the sea, 
Saying, Hurt not the earth, neither the sea, nor the trees, till we have sealed the servants of our God in their foreheads. 
And I heard the number of them which were sealed: and there were sealed an hundred and forty and four thousand of all the tribes of the children of Israel. 
Of the tribe of Juda were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Reuben were 
552,y, which art, and wast, and art to come; because thou hast taken to thee thy great power, and hast reigned. 
And the nations were angry, and thy wrath is come, and the time of the dead, that they should be judged, and that thou shouldest give reward unto thy servants the prophets, and to the saints, and them that fear thy name, small and great; and shouldest destroy them which destroy the earth. 
And the temple of God was opened in heaven, and there was seen in his temple the ark of his testament: and there were lightnings, and voices, and thunde
597,ubine: she bare Zimran, and Jokshan, and Medan, and Midian, and Ishbak, and Shuah. And the sons of Jokshan; Sheba, and Dedan. 
And the sons of Midian; Ephah, and Epher, and Henoch, and Abida, and Eldaah. All these are the sons of Keturah. 
And Abraham begat Isaac. The sons of Isaac; Esau and Israel. 
The sons of Esau; Eliphaz, Reuel, and Jeush, and Jaalam, and Korah. 
The sons of Eliphaz; Teman, and Omar, Zephi, and Gatam, Kenaz, and Timna, and Amalek. 
The sons of Reuel; Nahath, Zerah, Shammah, and Mizzah. 
And the sons of Seir; Lotan, and Shobal, and Zibeon, and Anah, and Dishon, and Ezar
595,e the golden emerods which the Philistines returned for a trespass offering unto the LORD; for Ashdod one, for Gaza one, for Askelon one, for Gath one, for Ekron one; 
And the golden mice, according to the number of all the cities of the Philistines belonging to the five lords, both of fenced cities, and of country villages, even unto the great stone of Abel, whereon they set down the ark of the LORD: which stone remaineth unto this day in the field of Joshua, the Bethshemite. 
And he smote the men of Bethshemesh, because they had looked into the ark of the LORD, even he smote of the peop
543, 
And they took Joseph's coat, and killed a kid of the goats, and dipped the coat in the blood; 
And they sent the coat of many colours, and they brought it to their father; and said, This have we found: know now whether it be thy son's coat or no. 
And he knew it, and said, It is my son's coat; an evil beast hath devoured him; Joseph is without doubt rent in pieces. 
And Jacob rent his clothes, and put sackcloth upon his loins, and mourned for his son many days. 
And all his sons and all his daughters rose up to comfort him; but he refu
436,unto thee among the nations. 
For thy mercy is great above the heavens: and thy truth reacheth unto the clouds. 
Be thou exalted, O God, above the heavens: and thy glory above all the earth; 
That thy beloved may be delivered: save with thy right hand, and answer me. 
God hath spoken in his holiness; I will rejoice, I will divide Shechem, and mete out the valley of Succoth. 
Gilead is mine; Manasseh is mine; Ephraim also is the stre
585, still, and know that I am God: I will be exalted among the heathen, I will be exalted in the earth. 
The LORD of hosts is with us; the God of Jacob is our refuge. Selah. 
O clap your hands, all ye people; shout unto God with the voice of triumph. 
For the LORD most high is terrible; he is a great King over all the earth. 
He shall subdue the people under us, and the nations under our feet. 
He shall choose our inheritance for us, the excellency of Jacob whom he loved. Selah. 
God is gone up with a shout, the LORD with the sound of a trumpet. 
Sing praises to God, sing praises: 
427,is yet tender, and putteth forth leaves, ye know that summer is nigh: 
So likewise ye, when ye shall see all these things, know that it is near, even at the doors. 
Verily I say unto you, This generation shall not pass, till all these things be fulfilled. 
Heaven and earth shall pass away, but my words shall not pass away. 
But of that day and hour knoweth no man, no, not the angels of heaven, but my Father only. 
But as th
577,s of the land, among the Canaanites and the Perizzites: and I being few in number, they shall gather themselves together against me, and slay me; and I shall be destroyed, I and my house. 
And they said, Should he deal with our sister as with an harlot? 
And God said unto Jacob, Arise, go up to Bethel, and dwell there: and make there an altar unto God, that appeared unto thee when thou fleddest from the face of Esau thy brother. 
Then Jacob said unto his household, and to all that were with him, Put away the strange gods that are among you, and be clean, and change your 
428,Israel could not stedfastly behold the face of Moses for the glory of his countenance; which glory was to be done away: 
How shall not the ministration of the spirit be rather glorious? 
For if the ministration of condemnation be glory, much more doth the ministration of righteousness exceed in glory. 
For even that which was made glorious had no glory in this respect, by reason of the glory that excelleth. 
For if that whic
467, the LORD thy God shall deliver them unto thee, and shall destroy them with a mighty destruction, until they be destroyed. 
And he shall deliver their kings into thine hand, and thou shalt destroy their name from under heaven: there shall no man be able to stand before thee, until thou have destroyed them. 
The graven images of their gods shall ye burn with fire: thou shalt not desire the silver or gold that is on them, nor take it unto thee, lest thou be snared 
414,e had tarried among them more than ten days, he went down unto Caesarea; and the next day sitting on the judgment seat commanded Paul to be brought. 
And when he was come, the Jews which came down from Jerusalem stood round about, and laid many and grievous complaints against Paul, which they could not prove. 
While he answered for himself, Neither against the law of the Jews, neither against the temple, nor ye
531, their foreheads. 
And I heard the number of them which were sealed: and there were sealed an hundred and forty and four thousand of all the tribes of the children of Israel. 
Of the tribe of Juda were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Reuben were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Gad were sealed twelve thousand. 
Of the tribe of Aser were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Nephthalim were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Manasses were sealed twelve thousand. 
Of the tribe of Simeon were sealed twelve 
448,will make the cities of Judah desolate, without an inhabitant. 
Who is the wise man, that may understand this? and who is he to whom the mouth of the LORD hath spoken, that he may declare it, for what the land perisheth and is burned up like a wilderness, that none passeth through? 
And the LORD saith, Because they have forsaken my law which I set before them, and have not obeyed my voice, neither walked therein; 
But have walked after the imag
485, there was not a man to till the ground. 
But there went up a mist from the earth, and watered the whole face of the ground. 
And the LORD God formed man of the dust of the ground, and breathed into his nostrils the breath of life; and man became a living soul. 
And the LORD God planted a garden eastward in Eden; and there he put the man whom he had formed. 
And out of the ground made the LORD God to grow every tree that is pleasant to the sight, and good for food; the tree of lif
536,sed is he that watcheth, and keepeth his garments, lest he walk naked, and they see his shame. 
And he gathered them together into a place called in the Hebrew tongue Armageddon. 
And the seventh angel poured out his vial into the air; and there came a great voice out of the temple of heaven, from the throne, saying, It is done. 
And there were voices, and thunders, and lightnings; and there was a great earthquake, such as was not since men were upon the earth, so mighty an earthquake, and so great. 
And the great city was divided
533,aying the harlot, and thou also shalt give no hire any more. 
So will I make my fury toward thee to rest, and my jealousy shall depart from thee, and I will be quiet, and will be no more angry. 
Because thou hast not remembered the days of thy youth, but hast fretted me in all these things; behold, therefore I also will recompense thy way upon thine head, saith the Lord GOD: and thou shalt not commit this lewdness above all thine abominations. 
Behold, every one that useth proverbs shall use this proverb against thee, saying, A
412, up in her wings, and they shall be ashamed because of their sacrifices. 
Hear ye this, O priests; and hearken, ye house of Israel; and give ye ear, O house of the king; for judgment is toward you, because ye have been a snare on Mizpah, and a net spread upon Tabor. 
And the revolters are profound to make slaughter, though I have been a rebuker of them all. 
I know Ephraim, and Israel is not hid from me: for 
581,d. 
They made a calf in Horeb, and worshipped the molten image. 
Thus they changed their glory into the similitude of an ox that eateth grass. 
They forgat God their saviour, which had done great things in Egypt; 
Wondrous works in the land of Ham, and terrible things by the Red sea. 
Therefore he said that he would destroy them, had not Moses his chosen stood before him in the breach, to turn away his wrath, lest he should destroy them. 
Yea, they despised the pleasant land, they believed not his word: 
But murmured in their tents, and hearkened not unto the voice of the LO
465,p the loins of your mind, be sober, and hope to the end for the grace that is to be brought unto you at the revelation of Jesus Christ; 
As obedient children, not fashioning yourselves according to the former lusts in your ignorance: 
But as he which hath called you is holy, so be ye holy in all manner of conversation; 
Because it is written, Be ye holy; for I am holy. 
And if ye call on the Father, who without respect of persons judgeth according to every man'
531,hole earth, and shall tread it down, and break it in pieces. 
And the ten horns out of this kingdom are ten kings that shall arise: and another shall rise after them; and he shall be diverse from the first, and he shall subdue three kings. 
And he shall speak great words against the most High, and shall wear out the saints of the most High, and think to change times and laws: and they shall be given into his hand until a time and times and the dividing of time. 
But the judgment shall sit, and they shall take away his dominio
573,, and from all the mountains of Israel: Joshua destroyed them utterly with their cities. 
There was none of the Anakims left in the land of the children of Israel: only in Gaza, in Gath, and in Ashdod, there remained. 
So Joshua took the whole land, according to all that the LORD said unto Moses; and Joshua gave it for an inheritance unto Israel according to their divisions by their tribes. And the land rested from war. 
Now these are the kings of the land, which the children of Israel smote, and possessed their land on the other side Jordan toward the rising of the 
420, rest of the city. 
So David waxed greater and greater: for the LORD of hosts was with him. 
These also are the chief of the mighty men whom David had, who strengthened themselves with him in his kingdom, and with all Israel, to make him king, according to the word of the LORD concerning Israel. 
And this is the number of the mighty men whom David had; Jashobeam, an Hachmonite, the chief of the captains: he lifted up
414,. 
And the children of Gad dwelt over against them, in the land of Bashan unto Salcah: 
Joel the chief, and Shapham the next, and Jaanai, and Shaphat in Bashan. 
And their brethren of the house of their fathers were, Michael, and Meshullam, and Sheba, and Jorai, and Jachan, and Zia, and Heber, seven. 
These are the children of Abihail the son of Huri, the son of Jaroah, the son of Gilead, the son of Michael, th
435,eration of thy children. 
When I thought to know this, it was too painful for me; 
Until I went into the sanctuary of God; then understood I their end. 
Surely thou didst set them in slippery places: thou castedst them down into destruction. 
How are they brought into desolation, as in a moment! they are utterly consumed with terrors. 
As a dream when one awaketh; so, O Lord, when thou awakest, thou shalt despise their image. 
Thus
435,auseth her to commit adultery: and whosoever shall marry her that is divorced committeth adultery. 
Again, ye have heard that it hath been said by them of old time, Thou shalt not forswear thyself, but shalt perform unto the Lord thine oaths: 
But I say unto you, Swear not at all; neither by heaven; for it is God's throne: 
Nor by the earth; for it is his footstool: neither by Jerusalem; for it is the city of the great King. 
Neith
464, any of the commandments of the LORD concerning things which ought not to be done, and be guilty; 
Or if his sin, which he hath sinned, come to his knowledge: then he shall bring his offering, a kid of the goats, a female without blemish, for his sin which he hath sinned. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of the sin offering, and slay the sin offering in the place of the burnt offering. 
And the priest shall take of the blood thereof with his finger, an
515, judge nothing before the time, until the Lord come, who both will bring to light the hidden things of darkness, and will make manifest the counsels of the hearts: and then shall every man have praise of God. 
And these things, brethren, I have in a figure transferred to myself and to Apollos for your sakes; that ye might learn in us not to think of men above that which is written, that no one of you be puffed up for one against another. 
For who maketh thee to differ from another? and what hast thou that thou
513,s which they know not: but what they know naturally, as brute beasts, in those things they corrupt themselves. 
Woe unto them! for they have gone in the way of Cain, and ran greedily after the error of Balaam for reward, and perished in the gainsaying of Core. 
These are spots in your feasts of charity, when they feast with you, feeding themselves without fear: clouds they are without water, carried about of winds; trees whose fruit withereth, without fruit, twice dead, plucked up by the roots; 
Raging waves
581, fled from before the earthquake in the days of Uzziah king of Judah: and the LORD my God shall come, and all the saints with thee. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the light shall not be clear, nor dark: 
But it shall be one day which shall be known to the LORD, not day, nor night: but it shall come to pass, that at evening time it shall be light. 
And it shall be in that day, that living waters shall go out from Jerusalem; half of them toward the former sea, and half of them toward the hinder sea: in summer and in winter shall it be. 
And the LORD shall be king
509,hings faithfully: over which Cononiah the Levite was ruler, and Shimei his brother was the next. 
And Jehiel, and Azaziah, and Nahath, and Asahel, and Jerimoth, and Jozabad, and Eliel, and Ismachiah, and Mahath, and Benaiah, were overseers under the hand of Cononiah and Shimei his brother, at the commandment of Hezekiah the king, and Azariah the ruler of the house of God. 
And Kore the son of Imnah the Levite, the porter toward the east, was over the freewill offerings of God, to distribute the oblations
515,he might perform his saying, which the LORD spake by Ahijah the Shilonite unto Jeroboam the son of Nebat. 
So when all Israel saw that the king hearkened not unto them, the people answered the king, saying, What portion have we in David? neither have we inheritance in the son of Jesse: to your tents, O Israel: now see to thine own house, David. So Israel departed unto their tents. 
But as for the children of Israel which dwelt in the cities of Judah, Rehoboam reigned over them. 
Then king Rehoboam sent Adoram,
503,n of Levi did according to the word of Moses: and there fell of the people that day about three thousand men. 
For Moses had said, Consecrate yourselves today to the LORD, even every man upon his son, and upon his brother; that he may bestow upon you a blessing this day. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that Moses said unto the people, Ye have sinned a great sin: and now I will go up unto the LORD; peradventure I shall make an atonement for your sin. 
And Moses returned unto the LORD, and said, 
421,n hundred talents; 
Also twenty basons of gold, of a thousand drams; and two vessels of fine copper, precious as gold. 
And I said unto them, Ye are holy unto the LORD; the vessels are holy also; and the silver and the gold are a freewill offering unto the LORD God of your fathers. 
Watch ye, and keep them, until ye weigh them before the chief of the priests and the Levites, and chief of the fathers of Israel, at Jeru
434, came to me, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; I was jealous for Zion with great jealousy, and I was jealous for her with great fury. 
Thus saith the LORD; I am returned unto Zion, and will dwell in the midst of Jerusalem: and Jerusalem shall be called a city of truth; and the mountain of the LORD of hosts the holy mountain. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; There shall yet old men and old women dwell in the streets of Jerusalem
506,her than affliction. 
Behold, God exalteth by his power: who teacheth like him? 
Who hath enjoined him his way? or who can say, Thou hast wrought iniquity? 
Remember that thou magnify his work, which men behold. 
Every man may see it; man may behold it afar off. 
Behold, God is great, and we know him not, neither can the number of his years be searched out. 
For he maketh small the drops of water: they pour down rain according to the vapour thereof: 
Which the clouds do drop and distil upon man abunda
489,ltar of Baal that thy father hath, and cut down the grove that is by it: 
And build an altar unto the LORD thy God upon the top of this rock, in the ordered place, and take the second bullock, and offer a burnt sacrifice with the wood of the grove which thou shalt cut down. 
Then Gideon took ten men of his servants, and did as the LORD had said unto him: and so it was, because he feared his father's household, and the men of the city, that he could not do it by day, that he did it by 
581,e sword of the LORD, even the pestilence, in the land, and the angel of the LORD destroying throughout all the coasts of Israel. Now therefore advise thyself what word I shall bring again to him that sent me. 
And David said unto Gad, I am in a great strait: let me fall now into the hand of the LORD; for very great are his mercies: but let me not fall into the hand of man. 
So the LORD sent pestilence upon Israel: and there fell of Israel seventy thousand men. 
And God sent an angel unto Jerusalem to destroy it: and as he was destroying, the LORD beheld, and he repented him 
428, no sons, but daughters: and their brethren the sons of Kish took them. 
The sons of Mushi; Mahli, and Eder, and Jeremoth, three. 
These were the sons of Levi after the house of their fathers; even the chief of the fathers, as they were counted by number of names by their polls, that did the work for the service of the house of the LORD, from the age of twenty years and upward. 
For David said, The LORD God of Israel hath gi
456,d they bring them out by their means. 
But king Solomon loved many strange women, together with the daughter of Pharaoh, women of the Moabites, Ammonites, Edomites, Zidonians, and Hittites: 
Of the nations concerning which the LORD said unto the children of Israel, Ye shall not go in to them, neither shall they come in unto you: for surely they will turn away your heart after their gods: Solomon clave unto these in love. 
And he had seven hundred wives
538, and with sound of the cornet, and with trumpets, and with cymbals, making a noise with psalteries and harps. 
And it came to pass, as the ark of the covenant of the LORD came to the city of David, that Michal, the daughter of Saul looking out at a window saw king David dancing and playing: and she despised him in her heart. 
So they brought the ark of God, and set it in the midst of the tent that David had pitched for it: and they offered burnt sacrifices and peace offerings before God. 
And when David had made an end of offering t
466,shalt be wise for thyself: but if thou scornest, thou alone shalt bear it. 
A foolish woman is clamorous: she is simple, and knoweth nothing. 
For she sitteth at the door of her house, on a seat in the high places of the city, 
To call passengers who go right on their ways: 
Whoso is simple, let him turn in hither: and as for him that wanteth understanding, she saith to him, 
Stolen waters are sweet, and bread eaten in secret is pleasant. 
But he knoweth not tha
491,d, with the ensign of their father's house: far off about the tabernacle of the congregation shall they pitch. 
And on the east side toward the rising of the sun shall they of the standard of the camp of Judah pitch throughout their armies: and Nahshon the son of Amminadab shall be captain of the children of Judah. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were threescore and fourteen thousand and six hundred. 
And those that do pitch next unto him shall be the tribe of Issac
546,d all the coasts of the Amorites, from Arnon even unto Jabbok, and from the wilderness even unto Jordan. 
So now the LORD God of Israel hath dispossessed the Amorites from before his people Israel, and shouldest thou possess it? 
Wilt not thou possess that which Chemosh thy god giveth thee to possess? So whomsoever the LORD our God shall drive out from before us, them will we possess. 
And now art thou any thing better than Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab? did he ever strive against Israel, or did he ever fight against them, 
While Is
444,ears with a loud voice, saying, Cause them that have charge over the city to draw near, even every man with his destroying weapon in his hand. 
And, behold, six men came from the way of the higher gate, which lieth toward the north, and every man a slaughter weapon in his hand; and one man among them was clothed with linen, with a writer's inkhorn by his side: and they went in, and stood beside the brasen altar. 
And the glory of the God of
401, days should be remembered and kept throughout every generation, every family, every province, and every city; and that these days of Purim should not fail from among the Jews, nor the memorial of them perish from their seed. 
Then Esther the queen, the daughter of Abihail, and Mordecai the Jew, wrote with all authority, to confirm this second letter of Purim. 
And he sent the letters unto all the 
492,RD. 
And if his offering be a goat, then he shall offer it before the LORD. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of it, and kill it before the tabernacle of the congregation: and the sons of Aaron shall sprinkle the blood thereof upon the altar round about. 
And he shall offer thereof his offering, even an offering made by fire unto the LORD; the fat that covereth the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards, 
And the two kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, which is by t
444,eat him also, and entreated him shamefully, and sent him away empty. 
And again he sent a third: and they wounded him also, and cast him out. 
Then said the lord of the vineyard, What shall I do? I will send my beloved son: it may be they will reverence him when they see him. 
But when the husbandmen saw him, they reasoned among themselves, saying, This is the heir: come, let us kill him, that the inheritance may be ours. 
So they cast him 
493,h a vineyard. 
She girdeth her loins with strength, and strengtheneth her arms. 
She perceiveth that her merchandise is good: her candle goeth not out by night. 
She layeth her hands to the spindle, and her hands hold the distaff. 
She stretcheth out her hand to the poor; yea, she reacheth forth her hands to the needy. 
She is not afraid of the snow for her household: for all her household are clothed with scarlet. 
She maketh herself coverings of tapestry; her clothing is silk and purple
579, the wind: and my welfare passeth away as a cloud. 
And now my soul is poured out upon me; the days of affliction have taken hold upon me. 
My bones are pierced in me in the night season: and my sinews take no rest. 
By the great force of my disease is my garment changed: it bindeth me about as the collar of my coat. 
He hath cast me into the mire, and I am become like dust and ashes. 
I cry unto thee, and thou dost not hear me: I stand up, and thou regardest me not. 
Thou art become cruel to me: with thy strong hand thou opposest thyself against me. 
Thou liftest me up to
453,el, and Haran, three. These were the chief of the fathers of Laadan. 
And the sons of Shimei were, Jahath, Zina, and Jeush, and Beriah. These four were the sons of Shimei. 
And Jahath was the chief, and Zizah the second: but Jeush and Beriah had not many sons; therefore they were in one reckoning, according to their father's house. 
The sons of Kohath; Amram, Izhar, Hebron, and Uzziel, four. 
The sons of Amram; Aaron and Moses: and Aaron was separat
443,f Israel. 
But the field of the suburbs of their cities may not be sold; for it is their perpetual possession. 
And if thy brother be waxen poor, and fallen in decay with thee; then thou shalt relieve him: yea, though he be a stranger, or a sojourner; that he may live with thee. 
Take thou no usury of him, or increase: but fear thy God; that thy brother may live with thee. 
Thou shalt not give him thy money upon usury, nor lend him thy vic
564,spakest unto me. 
Now therefore, I pray thee, hearken thou also unto the voice of thine handmaid, and let me set a morsel of bread before thee; and eat, that thou mayest have strength, when thou goest on thy way. 
But he refused, and said, I will not eat. But his servants, together with the woman, compelled him; and he hearkened unto their voice. So he arose from the earth, and sat upon the bed. 
And the woman had a fat calf in the house; and she hasted, and killed it, and took flour, and kneaded it, and did bake unleavened bread thereof: 
And she brought it
400,and a portion to her maidens. 
She considereth a field, and buyeth it: with the fruit of her hands she planteth a vineyard. 
She girdeth her loins with strength, and strengtheneth her arms. 
She perceiveth that her merchandise is good: her candle goeth not out by night. 
She layeth her hands to the spindle, and her hands hold the distaff. 
She stretcheth out her hand to the poor; yea, she reacheth
569,yed the cities thereof; that opened not the house of his prisoners? 
All the kings of the nations, even all of them, lie in glory, every one in his own house. 
But thou art cast out of thy grave like an abominable branch, and as the raiment of those that are slain, thrust through with a sword, that go down to the stones of the pit; as a carcase trodden under feet. 
Thou shalt not be joined with them in burial, because thou hast destroyed thy land, and slain thy people: the seed of evildoers shall never be renowned. 
Prepare slaughter for his children for the iniq
506,y to him, We be not born of fornication; we have one Father, even God. 
Jesus said unto them, If God were your Father, ye would love me: for I proceeded forth and came from God; neither came I of myself, but he sent me. 
Why do ye not understand my speech? even because ye cannot hear my word. 
Ye are of your father the devil, and the lusts of your father ye will do. He was a murderer from the beginning, and abode not in the truth, because there is no truth in him. When he speaketh a lie, he speaketh o
499,the sea, with the servants of Solomon. 
And they came to Ophir, and fetched from thence gold, four hundred and twenty talents, and brought it to king Solomon. 
And when the queen of Sheba heard of the fame of Solomon concerning the name of the LORD, she came to prove him with hard questions. 
And she came to Jerusalem with a very great train, with camels that bare spices, and very much gold, and precious stones: and when she was come to Solomon, she communed with him of all that was in her hear
407, and knowledge, and understanding, interpreting of dreams, and shewing of hard sentences, and dissolving of doubts, were found in the same Daniel, whom the king named Belteshazzar: now let Daniel be called, and he will shew the interpretation. 
Then was Daniel brought in before the king. And the king spake and said unto Daniel, Art thou that Daniel, which art of the children of the captivity of Judah, wh
452,d John: 
Who, when they were come down, prayed for them, that they might receive the Holy Ghost: 
(For as yet he was fallen upon none of them: only they were baptized in the name of the Lord Jesus.) 
Then laid they their hands on them, and they received the Holy Ghost. 
And when Simon saw that through laying on of the apostles' hands the Holy Ghost was given, he offered them money, 
Saying, Give me also this power, that on whomsoever I lay hands, h
594,present, or things to come; all are your's; 
And ye are Christ's; and Christ is God's. 
Let a man so account of us, as of the ministers of Christ, and stewards of the mysteries of God. 
Moreover it is required in stewards, that a man be found faithful. 
But with me it is a very small thing that I should be judged of you, or of man's judgment: yea, I judge not mine own self. 
For I know nothing by myself; yet am I not hereby justified: but he that judgeth me is the Lord. 
Therefore judge nothing before the time, until the Lord come, who both will bring to light the hidden things of darkne
580,his king: and sheweth mercy to his anointed, unto David, and to his seed for evermore. 
Now these be the last words of David. David the son of Jesse said, and the man who was raised up on high, the anointed of the God of Jacob, and the sweet psalmist of Israel, said, 
The Spirit of the LORD spake by me, and his word was in my tongue. 
The God of Israel said, the Rock of Israel spake to me, He that ruleth over men must be just, ruling in the fear of God. 
And he shall be as the light of the morning, when the sun riseth, even a morning without clouds; as the tender grass spri
549,es of the house of the LORD. 
Then Solomon assembled the elders of Israel, and all the heads of the tribes, the chief of the fathers of the children of Israel, unto king Solomon in Jerusalem, that they might bring up the ark of the covenant of the LORD out of the city of David, which is Zion. 
And all the men of Israel assembled themselves unto king Solomon at the feast in the month Ethanim, which is the seventh month. 
And all the elders of Israel came, and the priests took up the ark. 
And they brought up the ark of the LORD, and the taberna
561,rable multitude of people, insomuch that they trode one upon another, he began to say unto his disciples first of all, Beware ye of the leaven of the Pharisees, which is hypocrisy. 
For there is nothing covered, that shall not be revealed; neither hid, that shall not be known. 
Therefore whatsoever ye have spoken in darkness shall be heard in the light; and that which ye have spoken in the ear in closets shall be proclaimed upon the housetops. 
And I say unto you my friends, Be not afraid of them that kill the body, and after that have no more that they c
567,ed, and put a pillow of goats' hair for his bolster, and covered it with a cloth. 
And when Saul sent messengers to take David, she said, He is sick. 
And Saul sent the messengers again to see David, saying, Bring him up to me in the bed, that I may slay him. 
And when the messengers were come in, behold, there was an image in the bed, with a pillow of goats' hair for his bolster. 
And Saul said unto Michal, Why hast thou deceived me so, and sent away mine enemy, that he is escaped? And Michal answered Saul, He said unto me, Let me go; why should I kill thee? 

459, be foul weather to day: for the sky is red and lowering. O ye hypocrites, ye can discern the face of the sky; but can ye not discern the signs of the times? 
A wicked and adulterous generation seeketh after a sign; and there shall no sign be given unto it, but the sign of the prophet Jonas. And he left them, and departed. 
And when his disciples were come to the other side, they had forgotten to take bread. 
Then Jesus said unto them, Take heed and bewar
581,d Laban went to shear his sheep: and Rachel had stolen the images that were her father's. 
And Jacob stole away unawares to Laban the Syrian, in that he told him not that he fled. 
So he fled with all that he had; and he rose up, and passed over the river, and set his face toward the mount Gilead. 
And it was told Laban on the third day that Jacob was fled. 
And he took his brethren with him, and pursued after him seven days' journey; and they overtook him in the mount Gilead. 
And God came to Laban the Syrian in a dream by night, and said unto him, Take heed that thou speak
430, heart condemn us not, then have we confidence toward God. 
And whatsoever we ask, we receive of him, because we keep his commandments, and do those things that are pleasing in his sight. 
And this is his commandment, That we should believe on the name of his Son Jesus Christ, and love one another, as he gave us commandment. 
And he that keepeth his commandments dwelleth in him, and he in him. And hereby we know that he abidet
403, day of the LORD be darkness, and not light? even very dark, and no brightness in it? 
I hate, I despise your feast days, and I will not smell in your solemn assemblies. 
Though ye offer me burnt offerings and your meat offerings, I will not accept them: neither will I regard the peace offerings of your fat beasts. 
Take thou away from me the noise of thy songs; for I will not hear the melody of thy 
598,he house of Baasha the son of Ahijah, for the provocation wherewith thou hast provoked me to anger, and made Israel to sin. 
And of Jezebel also spake the LORD, saying, The dogs shall eat Jezebel by the wall of Jezreel. 
Him that dieth of Ahab in the city the dogs shall eat; and him that dieth in the field shall the fowls of the air eat. 
But there was none like unto Ahab, which did sell himself to work wickedness in the sight of the LORD, whom Jezebel his wife stirred up. 
And he did very abominably in following idols, according to all things as did the Amorites, whom the LORD cast out befo
485, 
And ye have done worse than your fathers; for, behold, ye walk every one after the imagination of his evil heart, that they may not hearken unto me: 
Therefore will I cast you out of this land into a land that ye know not, neither ye nor your fathers; and there shall ye serve other gods day and night; where I will not shew you favour. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that it shall no more be said, The LORD liveth, that brought up the children of Israel out of t
561,teach and preach Jesus Christ. 
And in those days, when the number of the disciples was multiplied, there arose a murmuring of the Grecians against the Hebrews, because their widows were neglected in the daily ministration. 
Then the twelve called the multitude of the disciples unto them, and said, It is not reason that we should leave the word of God, and serve tables. 
Wherefore, brethren, look ye out among you seven men of honest report, full of the Holy Ghost and wisdom, whom we may appoint over this business. 
But we will give ourselves continually t
572,encamped at Eziongaber. 
And they removed from Eziongaber, and pitched in the wilderness of Zin, which is Kadesh. 
And they removed from Kadesh, and pitched in mount Hor, in the edge of the land of Edom. 
And Aaron the priest went up into mount Hor at the commandment of the LORD, and died there, in the fortieth year after the children of Israel were come out of the land of Egypt, in the first day of the fifth month. 
And Aaron was an hundred and twenty and three years old when he died in mount Hor. 
And king Arad the Canaanite, which dwelt in the south in the land o
512,om among you. 
In the morning therefore ye shall be brought according to your tribes: and it shall be, that the tribe which the LORD taketh shall come according to the families thereof; and the family which the LORD shall take shall come by households; and the household which the LORD shall take shall come man by man. 
And it shall be, that he that is taken with the accursed thing shall be burnt with fire, he and all that he hath: because he hath transgressed the covenant of the LORD, and because he hath wr
600,de of Jordan, of the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and of the half tribe of Manasseh, with all manner of instruments of war for the battle, an hundred and twenty thousand. 
All these men of war, that could keep rank, came with a perfect heart to Hebron, to make David king over all Israel: and all the rest also of Israel were of one heart to make David king. 
And there they were with David three days, eating and drinking: for their brethren had prepared for them. 
Moreover they that were nigh them, even unto Issachar and Zebulun and Naphtali, brought bread on asses, and on camels, and on mules, 
481,o be his wife; 
Her former husband, which sent her away, may not take her again to be his wife, after that she is defiled; for that is abomination before the LORD: and thou shalt not cause the land to sin, which the LORD thy God giveth thee for an inheritance. 
When a man hath taken a new wife, he shall not go out to war, neither shall he be charged with any business: but he shall be free at home one year, and shall cheer up his wife which he hath taken. 
No man shall take the
460,ntenance was as the sun shineth in his strength. 
And when I saw him, I fell at his feet as dead. And he laid his right hand upon me, saying unto me, Fear not; I am the first and the last: 
I am he that liveth, and was dead; and, behold, I am alive for evermore, Amen; and have the keys of hell and of death. 
Write the things which thou hast seen, and the things which are, and the things which shall be hereafter; 
The mystery of the seven stars which thou s
437,nd thou shalt receive them: and thou shalt accomplish my desire, in giving food for my household. 
So Hiram gave Solomon cedar trees and fir trees according to all his desire. 
And Solomon gave Hiram twenty thousand measures of wheat for food to his household, and twenty measures of pure oil: thus gave Solomon to Hiram year by year. 
And the LORD gave Solomon wisdom, as he promised him: and there was peace between Hiram and Solomon; 
583,t up thy vines and thy fig trees: they shall impoverish thy fenced cities, wherein thou trustedst, with the sword. 
Nevertheless in those days, saith the LORD, I will not make a full end with you. 
And it shall come to pass, when ye shall say, Wherefore doeth the LORD our God all these things unto us? then shalt thou answer them, Like as ye have forsaken me, and served strange gods in your land, so shall ye serve strangers in a land that is not your's. 
Declare this in the house of Jacob, and publish it in Judah, saying, 
Hear now this, O foolish people, and without understand
553,hey went, that he entered into a certain village: and a certain woman named Martha received him into her house. 
And she had a sister called Mary, which also sat at Jesus' feet, and heard his word. 
But Martha was cumbered about much serving, and came to him, and said, Lord, dost thou not care that my sister hath left me to serve alone? bid her therefore that she help me. 
And Jesus answered and said unto her, Martha, Martha, thou art careful and troubled about many things: 
But one thing is needful: and Mary hath chosen that good part, which shal
450, I will satisfy her poor with bread. 
I will also clothe her priests with salvation: and her saints shall shout aloud for joy. 
There will I make the horn of David to bud: I have ordained a lamp for mine anointed. 
His enemies will I clothe with shame: but upon himself shall his crown flourish. 
Behold, how good and how pleasant it is for brethren to dwell together in unity! 
It is like the precious ointment upon the head, that ran down upon the 
494, thou? And I said, I see a seething pot; and the face thereof is toward the north. 
Then the LORD said unto me, Out of the north an evil shall break forth upon all the inhabitants of the land. 
For, lo, I will call all the families of the kingdoms of the north, saith the LORD; and they shall come, and they shall set every one his throne at the entering of the gates of Jerusalem, and against all the walls thereof round about, and against all the cities of Judah. 
And I will utter my judgmen
473, the seventh day the priest shall look on the scall: and, behold, if the scall be not spread in the skin, nor be in sight deeper than the skin; then the priest shall pronounce him clean: and he shall wash his clothes, and be clean. 
But if the scall spread much in the skin after his cleansing; 
Then the priest shall look on him: and, behold, if the scall be spread in the skin, the priest shall not seek for yellow hair; he is unclean. 
But if the scall be in his sight a
404,d she shall sing there, as in the days of her youth, and as in the day when she came up out of the land of Egypt. 
And it shall be at that day, saith the LORD, that thou shalt call me Ishi; and shalt call me no more Baali. 
For I will take away the names of Baalim out of her mouth, and they shall no more be remembered by their name. 
And in that day will I make a covenant for them with the beasts of t
417,rs thereof, saving the beholding of them with their eyes? 
The sleep of a labouring man is sweet, whether he eat little or much: but the abundance of the rich will not suffer him to sleep. 
There is a sore evil which I have seen under the sun, namely, riches kept for the owners thereof to their hurt. 
But those riches perish by evil travail: and he begetteth a son, and there is nothing in his hand. 
As he came for
530, to draw. 
Jesus saith unto her, Go, call thy husband, and come hither. 
The woman answered and said, I have no husband. Jesus said unto her, Thou hast well said, I have no husband: 
For thou hast had five husbands; and he whom thou now hast is not thy husband: in that saidst thou truly. 
The woman saith unto him, Sir, I perceive that thou art a prophet. 
Our fathers worshipped in this mountain; and ye say, that in Jerusalem is the place where men ought to worship. 
Jesus saith unto her, Woman, believe me, the hour cometh, w
467,ve thee. 
And when I looked, behold, an hand was sent unto me; and, lo, a roll of a book was therein; 
And he spread it before me; and it was written within and without: and there was written therein lamentations, and mourning, and woe. 
Moreover he said unto me, Son of man, eat that thou findest; eat this roll, and go speak unto the house of Israel. 
So I opened my mouth, and he caused me to eat that roll. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, cause thy belly to eat
443,ut we know that, when he shall appear, we shall be like him; for we shall see him as he is. 
And every man that hath this hope in him purifieth himself, even as he is pure. 
Whosoever committeth sin transgresseth also the law: for sin is the transgression of the law. 
And ye know that he was manifested to take away our sins; and in him is no sin. 
Whosoever abideth in him sinneth not: whosoever sinneth hath not seen him, neither known him.
450,ghbour, Wherefore hath the LORD done thus unto this great city? 
Then they shall answer, Because they have forsaken the covenant of the LORD their God, and worshipped other gods, and served them. 
Weep ye not for the dead, neither bemoan him: but weep sore for him that goeth away: for he shall return no more, nor see his native country. 
For thus saith the LORD touching Shallum the son of Josiah king of Judah, which reigned instead of Josiah his 
567,ether upon heaps: and the land stank. 
But when Pharaoh saw that there was respite, he hardened his heart, and hearkened not unto them; as the LORD had said. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Say unto Aaron, Stretch out thy rod, and smite the dust of the land, that it may become lice throughout all the land of Egypt. 
And they did so; for Aaron stretched out his hand with his rod, and smote the dust of the earth, and it became lice in man, and in beast; all the dust of the land became lice throughout all the land of Egypt. 
And the magicians did so with their ench
520,ot, and hast found them liars: 
And hast borne, and hast patience, and for my name's sake hast laboured, and hast not fainted. 
Nevertheless I have somewhat against thee, because thou hast left thy first love. 
Remember therefore from whence thou art fallen, and repent, and do the first works; or else I will come unto thee quickly, and will remove thy candlestick out of his place, except thou repent. 
But this thou hast, that thou hatest the deeds of the Nicolaitanes, which I also hate. 
He that hath an ear, let hi
492, the children of the married wife, saith the LORD. 
Enlarge the place of thy tent, and let them stretch forth the curtains of thine habitations: spare not, lengthen thy cords, and strengthen thy stakes; 
For thou shalt break forth on the right hand and on the left; and thy seed shall inherit the Gentiles, and make the desolate cities to be inhabited. 
Fear not; for thou shalt not be ashamed: neither be thou confounded; for thou shalt not be put to shame: for thou shalt forget the shame o
559, the rock is removed out of his place. 
The waters wear the stones: thou washest away the things which grow out of the dust of the earth; and thou destroyest the hope of man. 
Thou prevailest for ever against him, and he passeth: thou changest his countenance, and sendest him away. 
His sons come to honour, and he knoweth it not; and they are brought low, but he perceiveth it not of them. 
But his flesh upon him shall have pain, and his soul within him shall mourn. 
Then answered Eliphaz the Temanite, and said, 
Should a wise man utter vain knowledge, a
489,praying in the Holy Ghost, 
Keep yourselves in the love of God, looking for the mercy of our Lord Jesus Christ unto eternal life. 
And of some have compassion, making a difference: 
And others save with fear, pulling them out of the fire; hating even the garment spotted by the flesh. 
Now unto him that is able to keep you from falling, and to present you faultless before the presence of his glory with exceeding joy, 
To the only wise God our Saviour, be glory and majesty, dominion and
476,dah and Benjamin heard that the children of the captivity builded the temple unto the LORD God of Israel; 
Then they came to Zerubbabel, and to the chief of the fathers, and said unto them, Let us build with you: for we seek your God, as ye do; and we do sacrifice unto him since the days of Esarhaddon king of Assur, which brought us up hither. 
But Zerubbabel, and Jeshua, and the rest of the chief of the fathers of Israel, said unto them, Ye have nothing to do with us to 
440,brother Elimelech's: 
And I thought to advertise thee, saying, Buy it before the inhabitants, and before the elders of my people. If thou wilt redeem it, redeem it: but if thou wilt not redeem it, then tell me, that I may know: for there is none to redeem it beside thee; and I am after thee. And he said, I will redeem it. 
Then said Boaz, What day thou buyest the field of the hand of Naomi, thou must buy it also of Ruth the Moabitess, t
553,the stranger or sojourner by thee, or to the stock of the stranger's family: 
After that he is sold he may be redeemed again; one of his brethren may redeem him: 
Either his uncle, or his uncle's son, may redeem him, or any that is nigh of kin unto him of his family may redeem him; or if he be able, he may redeem himself. 
And he shall reckon with him that bought him from the year that he was sold to him unto the year of jubile: and the price of his sale shall be according unto the number of years, according to the time of an hired servant shall i
508,all preserve thee, understanding shall keep thee: 
To deliver thee from the way of the evil man, from the man that speaketh froward things; 
Who leave the paths of uprightness, to walk in the ways of darkness; 
Who rejoice to do evil, and delight in the frowardness of the wicked; 
Whose ways are crooked, and they froward in their paths: 
To deliver thee from the strange woman, even from the stranger which flattereth with her words; 
Which forsaketh the guide of her youth, and forgetteth the covenant of 
559,becometh thine house, O LORD, for ever. 
O Lord God, to whom vengeance belongeth; O God, to whom vengeance belongeth, shew thyself. 
Lift up thyself, thou judge of the earth: render a reward to the proud. 
LORD, how long shall the wicked, how long shall the wicked triumph? 
How long shall they utter and speak hard things? and all the workers of iniquity boast themselves? 
They break in pieces thy people, O LORD, and afflict thine heritage. 
They slay the widow and the stranger, and murder the fatherless. 
Yet they say, The LORD shall not see, neither sh
401,s, and bar them: and appoint watches of the inhabitants of Jerusalem, every one in his watch, and every one to be over against his house. 
Now the city was large and great: but the people were few therein, and the houses were not builded. 
And my God put into mine heart to gather together the nobles, and the rulers, and the people, that they might be reckoned by genealogy. And I found a register of
414,d, they shall put bands upon thee, and shall bind thee with them, and thou shalt not go out among them: 
And I will make thy tongue cleave to the roof of thy mouth, that thou shalt be dumb, and shalt not be to them a reprover: for they are a rebellious house. 
But when I speak with thee, I will open thy mouth, and thou shalt say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; He that heareth, let him hear; and he that forb
478, because of unbelief they were broken off, and thou standest by faith. Be not highminded, but fear: 
For if God spared not the natural branches, take heed lest he also spare not thee. 
Behold therefore the goodness and severity of God: on them which fell, severity; but toward thee, goodness, if thou continue in his goodness: otherwise thou also shalt be cut off. 
And they also, if they abide not still in unbelief, shall be graffed in: for God is able to graff them in again.
523,all they search. 
And the passengers that pass through the land, when any seeth a man's bone, then shall he set up a sign by it, till the buriers have buried it in the valley of Hamongog. 
And also the name of the city shall be Hamonah. Thus shall they cleanse the land. 
And, thou son of man, thus saith the Lord GOD; Speak unto every feathered fowl, and to every beast of the field, Assemble yourselves, and come; gather yourselves on every side to my sacrifice that I do sacrifice for you, even a great sacrifice upon th
470,t cast off and abhorred, thou hast been wroth with thine anointed. 
Thou hast made void the covenant of thy servant: thou hast profaned his crown by casting it to the ground. 
Thou hast broken down all his hedges; thou hast brought his strong holds to ruin. 
All that pass by the way spoil him: he is a reproach to his neighbours. 
Thou hast set up the right hand of his adversaries; thou hast made all his enemies to rejoice. 
Thou hast also turned the edge of his swor
427,came out a fire from the LORD, and consumed the two hundred and fifty men that offered incense. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest, that he take up the censers out of the burning, and scatter thou the fire yonder; for they are hallowed. 
The censers of these sinners against their own souls, let them make them broad plates for a covering of the altar: for they offered them
523,ng shall go into captivity, and his priests and his princes together. 
Wherefore gloriest thou in the valleys, thy flowing valley, O backsliding daughter? that trusted in her treasures, saying, Who shall come unto me? 
Behold, I will bring a fear upon thee, saith the Lord GOD of hosts, from all those that be about thee; and ye shall be driven out every man right forth; and none shall gather up him that wandereth. 
And afterward I will bring again the captivity of the children of Ammon, saith the LORD. 
Concerning Edom
535,alt thou establish in the very heavens. 
I have made a covenant with my chosen, I have sworn unto David my servant, 
Thy seed will I establish for ever, and build up thy throne to all generations. Selah. 
And the heavens shall praise thy wonders, O LORD: thy faithfulness also in the congregation of the saints. 
For who in the heaven can be compared unto the LORD? who among the sons of the mighty can be likened unto the LORD? 
God is greatly to be feared in the assembly of the saints, and to be had in reverence of all them that ar
577,was Mary Magdalene, and Mary the mother of James the less and of Joses, and Salome; 
(Who also, when he was in Galilee, followed him, and ministered unto him;) and many other women which came up with him unto Jerusalem. 
And now when the even was come, because it was the preparation, that is, the day before the sabbath, 
Joseph of Arimathaea, an honourable counsellor, which also waited for the kingdom of God, came, and went in boldly unto Pilate, and craved the body of Jesus. 
And Pilate marvelled if he were already dead: and calling unto him the centurion, he asked him 
494,nto them: and they made ready the passover. 
And when the hour was come, he sat down, and the twelve apostles with him. 
And he said unto them, With desire I have desired to eat this passover with you before I suffer: 
For I say unto you, I will not any more eat thereof, until it be fulfilled in the kingdom of God. 
And he took the cup, and gave thanks, and said, Take this, and divide it among yourselves: 
For I say unto you, I will not drink of the fruit of the vine, until the kingdom of 
585, let the bones be burned. 
Then set it empty upon the coals thereof, that the brass of it may be hot, and may burn, and that the filthiness of it may be molten in it, that the scum of it may be consumed. 
She hath wearied herself with lies, and her great scum went not forth out of her: her scum shall be in the fire. 
In thy filthiness is lewdness: because I have purged thee, and thou wast not purged, thou shalt not be purged from thy filthiness any more, till I have caused my fury to rest upon thee. 
I the LORD have spoken it: it shall come to pass, and I will do it; I will not 
407,ish by his knowledge; every founder is confounded by the graven image: for his molten image is falsehood, and there is no breath in them. 
They are vanity, the work of errors: in the time of their visitation they shall perish. 
The portion of Jacob is not like them; for he is the former of all things: and Israel is the rod of his inheritance: the LORD of hosts is his name. 
Thou art my battle axe and wea
446,uld be put to death. And he went down from Judaea to Caesarea, and there abode. 
And Herod was highly displeased with them of Tyre and Sidon: but they came with one accord to him, and, having made Blastus the king's chamberlain their friend, desired peace; because their country was nourished by the king's country. 
And upon a set day Herod, arrayed in royal apparel, sat upon his throne, and made an oration unto them. 
And the people gave a sh
459,him, 
Saying, Master, Moses wrote unto us, If any man's brother die, having a wife, and he die without children, that his brother should take his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
There were therefore seven brethren: and the first took a wife, and died without children. 
And the second took her to wife, and he died childless. 
And the third took her; and in like manner the seven also: and they left no children, and died. 
Last of all the woman di
486,st: for it is the number of a man; and his number is Six hundred threescore and six. 
And I looked, and, lo, a Lamb stood on the mount Sion, and with him an hundred forty and four thousand, having his Father's name written in their foreheads. 
And I heard a voice from heaven, as the voice of many waters, and as the voice of a great thunder: and I heard the voice of harpers harping with their harps: 
And they sung as it were a new song before the throne, and before the four beasts, 
567,ery one four wings; and the likeness of the hands of a man was under their wings. 
And the likeness of their faces was the same faces which I saw by the river of Chebar, their appearances and themselves: they went every one straight forward. 
Moreover the spirit lifted me up, and brought me unto the east gate of the LORD's house, which looketh eastward: and behold at the door of the gate five and twenty men; among whom I saw Jaazaniah the son of Azur, and Pelatiah the son of Benaiah, princes of the people. 
Then said he unto me, Son of man, these are the men th
593,e of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets of silver; and the overlaying of their chapiters of silver; and all the pillars of the court were filleted with silver. 
And the hanging for the gate of the court was needlework, of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen: and twenty cubits was the length, and the height in the breadth was five cubits, answerable to the hangings of the court. 
And their pillars were four, and their sockets of brass four; their hooks of silver, and the overlaying of their chapiters and their fillets of silver. 
And all the pins of the ta
570,ed: and when they heard that the LORD had visited the children of Israel, and that he had looked upon their affliction, then they bowed their heads and worshipped. 
And afterward Moses and Aaron went in, and told Pharaoh, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Let my people go, that they may hold a feast unto me in the wilderness. 
And Pharaoh said, Who is the LORD, that I should obey his voice to let Israel go? I know not the LORD, neither will I let Israel go. 
And they said, The God of the Hebrews hath met with us: let us go, we pray thee, three days' journey into 
411,of the remnant of the sons of Kohath. 
Unto the sons of Gershom were given out of the family of the half tribe of Manasseh, Golan in Bashan with her suburbs, and Ashtaroth with her suburbs: 
And out of the tribe of Issachar; Kedesh with her suburbs, Daberath with her suburbs, 
And Ramoth with her suburbs, and Anem with her suburbs: 
And out of the tribe of Asher; Mashal with her suburbs, and Abdon with her s
493,n that obeyeth not the voice of the LORD their God, nor receiveth correction: truth is perished, and is cut off from their mouth. 
Cut off thine hair, O Jerusalem, and cast it away, and take up a lamentation on high places; for the LORD hath rejected and forsaken the generation of his wrath. 
For the children of Judah have done evil in my sight, saith the LORD: they have set their abominations in the house which is called by my name, to pollute it. 
And they have built the high places of 
414,ould skill of instruments of musick. 
Also they were over the bearers of burdens, and were overseers of all that wrought the work in any manner of service: and of the Levites there were scribes, and officers, and porters. 
And when they brought out the money that was brought into the house of the LORD, Hilkiah the priest found a book of the law of the LORD given by Moses. 
And Hilkiah answered and said to Shaph
418,r his kind, 
And the ferret, and the chameleon, and the lizard, and the snail, and the mole. 
These are unclean to you among all that creep: whosoever doth touch them, when they be dead, shall be unclean until the even. 
And upon whatsoever any of them, when they are dead, doth fall, it shall be unclean; whether it be any vessel of wood, or raiment, or skin, or sack, whatsoever vessel it be, wherein any work is don
517, 
And the princes of Succoth said, Are the hands of Zebah and Zalmunna now in thine hand, that we should give bread unto thine army? 
And Gideon said, Therefore when the LORD hath delivered Zebah and Zalmunna into mine hand, then I will tear your flesh with the thorns of the wilderness and with briers. 
And he went up thence to Penuel, and spake unto them likewise: and the men of Penuel answered him as the men of Succoth had answered him. 
And he spake also unto the men of Penuel, saying, When I come again in pe
502,r he is talking, or he is pursuing, or he is in a journey, or peradventure he sleepeth, and must be awaked. 
And they cried aloud, and cut themselves after their manner with knives and lancets, till the blood gushed out upon them. 
And it came to pass, when midday was past, and they prophesied until the time of the offering of the evening sacrifice, that there was neither voice, nor any to answer, nor any that regarded. 
And Elijah said unto all the people, Come near unto me. And all the people ca
597,ion; for thou shalt not fear: and from terror; for it shall not come near thee. 
Behold, they shall surely gather together, but not by me: whosoever shall gather together against thee shall fall for thy sake. 
Behold, I have created the smith that bloweth the coals in the fire, and that bringeth forth an instrument for his work; and I have created the waster to destroy. 
No weapon that is formed against thee shall prosper; and every tongue that shall rise against thee in judgment thou shalt condemn. This is the heritage of the servants of the LORD, and their righteousness is of me, saith th
459, unto the next day: for it was now eventide. 
Howbeit many of them which heard the word believed; and the number of the men was about five thousand. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that their rulers, and elders, and scribes, 
And Annas the high priest, and Caiaphas, and John, and Alexander, and as many as were of the kindred of the high priest, were gathered together at Jerusalem. 
And when they had set them in the midst, they asked, By what power, or
515,m, and give it unto him which hath ten talents. 
For unto every one that hath shall be given, and he shall have abundance: but from him that hath not shall be taken away even that which he hath. 
And cast ye the unprofitable servant into outer darkness: there shall be weeping and gnashing of teeth. 
When the Son of man shall come in his glory, and all the holy angels with him, then shall he sit upon the throne of his glory: 
And before him shall be gathered all nations: and he shall separate them one from anot
506,re. 
And when Paul would have entered in unto the people, the disciples suffered him not. 
And certain of the chief of Asia, which were his friends, sent unto him, desiring him that he would not adventure himself into the theatre. 
Some therefore cried one thing, and some another: for the assembly was confused: and the more part knew not wherefore they were come together. 
And they drew Alexander out of the multitude, the Jews putting him forward. And Alexander beckoned with the hand, and would have m
528,r's concubines in the sight of all Israel. 
And the counsel of Ahithophel, which he counselled in those days, was as if a man had enquired at the oracle of God: so was all the counsel of Ahithophel both with David and with Absalom. 
Moreover Ahithophel said unto Absalom, Let me now choose out twelve thousand men, and I will arise and pursue after David this night: 
And I will come upon him while he is weary and weak handed, and will make him afraid: and all the people that are with him shall flee; and I will smite the king
415,ll give for the ransom of his life whatsoever is laid upon him. 
Whether he have gored a son, or have gored a daughter, according to this judgment shall it be done unto him. 
If the ox shall push a manservant or a maidservant; he shall give unto their master thirty shekels of silver, and the ox shall be stoned. 
And if a man shall open a pit, or if a man shall dig a pit, and not cover it, and an ox or an ass fal
532,round, and the firstfruits of all fruit of all trees, year by year, unto the house of the LORD: 
Also the firstborn of our sons, and of our cattle, as it is written in the law, and the firstlings of our herds and of our flocks, to bring to the house of our God, unto the priests that minister in the house of our God: 
And that we should bring the firstfruits of our dough, and our offerings, and the fruit of all manner of trees, of wine and of oil, unto the priests, to the chambers of the house of our God; and the tithes of our 
451,ay. 
And we came to Jerusalem, and abode there three days. 
Now on the fourth day was the silver and the gold and the vessels weighed in the house of our God by the hand of Meremoth the son of Uriah the priest; and with him was Eleazar the son of Phinehas; and with them was Jozabad the son of Jeshua, and Noadiah the son of Binnui, Levites; 
By number and by weight of every one: and all the weight was written at that time. 
Also the children of tho
462,each, eye for eye, tooth for tooth: as he hath caused a blemish in a man, so shall it be done to him again. 
And he that killeth a beast, he shall restore it: and he that killeth a man, he shall be put to death. 
Ye shall have one manner of law, as well for the stranger, as for one of your own country: for I am the LORD your God. 
And Moses spake to the children of Israel, that they should bring forth him that had cursed out of the camp, and stone him with s
496,sin, and of righteousness, and of judgment: 
Of sin, because they believe not on me; 
Of righteousness, because I go to my Father, and ye see me no more; 
Of judgment, because the prince of this world is judged. 
I have yet many things to say unto you, but ye cannot bear them now. 
Howbeit when he, the Spirit of truth, is come, he will guide you into all truth: for he shall not speak of himself; but whatsoever he shall hear, that shall he speak: and he will shew you things to come. 
He shall
412,e be stricken any more? ye will revolt more and more: the whole head is sick, and the whole heart faint. 
From the sole of the foot even unto the head there is no soundness in it; but wounds, and bruises, and putrifying sores: they have not been closed, neither bound up, neither mollified with ointment. 
Your country is desolate, your cities are burned with fire: your land, strangers devour it in your presenc
455, thy place: and thou shalt deliver Pharaoh's cup into his hand, after the former manner when thou wast his butler. 
But think on me when it shall be well with thee, and shew kindness, I pray thee, unto me, and make mention of me unto Pharaoh, and bring me out of this house: 
For indeed I was stolen away out of the land of the Hebrews: and here also have I done nothing that they should put me into the dungeon. 
When the chief baker saw that the interpr
559, corpses. 
So Sennacherib king of Assyria departed, and went and returned, and dwelt at Nineveh. 
And it came to pass, as he was worshipping in the house of Nisroch his god, that Adrammelech and Sharezer his sons smote him with the sword; and they escaped into the land of Armenia: and Esarhaddon his son reigned in his stead. 
In those days was Hezekiah sick unto death. And Isaiah the prophet the son of Amoz came unto him, and said unto him, Thus saith the LORD, Set thine house in order: for thou shalt die, and not live. 
Then Hezekiah turned his face to
514,cknowledge and increase with glory: and he shall cause them to rule over many, and shall divide the land for gain. 
And at the time of the end shall the king of the south push at him: and the king of the north shall come against him like a whirlwind, with chariots, and with horsemen, and with many ships; and he shall enter into the countries, and shall overflow and pass over. 
He shall enter also into the glorious land, and many countries shall be overthrown: but these shall escape out of his hand, even Edom,
527,to put away his wife? tempting him. 
And he answered and said unto them, What did Moses command you? 
And they said, Moses suffered to write a bill of divorcement, and to put her away. 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, For the hardness of your heart he wrote you this precept. 
But from the beginning of the creation God made them male and female. 
For this cause shall a man leave his father and mother, and cleave to his wife; 
And they twain shall be one flesh: so then they are no more twain, but one flesh. 
What the
518,f my pomegranate. 
His left hand should be under my head, and his right hand should embrace me. 
I charge you, O daughters of Jerusalem, that ye stir not up, nor awake my love, until he please. 
Who is this that cometh up from the wilderness, leaning upon her beloved? I raised thee up under the apple tree: there thy mother brought thee forth: there she brought thee forth that bare thee. 
Set me as a seal upon thine heart, as a seal upon thine arm: for love is strong as death; jealousy is cruel as the grave: the c
511, from heaven, and behold from the habitation of thy holiness and of thy glory: where is thy zeal and thy strength, the sounding of thy bowels and of thy mercies toward me? are they restrained? 
Doubtless thou art our father, though Abraham be ignorant of us, and Israel acknowledge us not: thou, O LORD, art our father, our redeemer; thy name is from everlasting. 
O LORD, why hast thou made us to err from thy ways, and hardened our heart from thy fear? Return for thy servants' sake, the tribes of thine inher
404,prophets, and of them which keep the sayings of this book: worship God. 
And he saith unto me, Seal not the sayings of the prophecy of this book: for the time is at hand. 
He that is unjust, let him be unjust still: and he which is filthy, let him be filthy still: and he that is righteous, let him be righteous still: and he that is holy, let him be holy still. 
And, behold, I come quickly; and my rewa
495,d ground corn thereon; and the thing was not known. 
And when Absalom's servants came to the woman to the house, they said, Where is Ahimaaz and Jonathan? And the woman said unto them, They be gone over the brook of water. And when they had sought and could not find them, they returned to Jerusalem. 
And it came to pass, after they were departed, that they came up out of the well, and went and told king David, and said unto David, Arise, and pass quickly over the water: for thus hath Ahitho
488,alent of lead: and this is a woman that sitteth in the midst of the ephah. 
And he said, This is wickedness. And he cast it into the midst of the ephah; and he cast the weight of lead upon the mouth thereof. 
Then lifted I up mine eyes, and looked, and, behold, there came out two women, and the wind was in their wings; for they had wings like the wings of a stork: and they lifted up the ephah between the earth and the heaven. 
Then said I to the angel that talked with me, Whither do 
425,nd a witness of the sufferings of Christ, and also a partaker of the glory that shall be revealed: 
Feed the flock of God which is among you, taking the oversight thereof, not by constraint, but willingly; not for filthy lucre, but of a ready mind; 
Neither as being lords over God's heritage, but being ensamples to the flock. 
And when the chief Shepherd shall appear, ye shall receive a crown of glory that fadeth not away
536,in our Lord Jesus Christ, in the sight of God and our Father; 
Knowing, brethren beloved, your election of God. 
For our gospel came not unto you in word only, but also in power, and in the Holy Ghost, and in much assurance; as ye know what manner of men we were among you for your sake. 
And ye became followers of us, and of the Lord, having received the word in much affliction, with joy of the Holy Ghost. 
So that ye were ensamples to all that believe in Macedonia and Achaia. 
For from you sounded out the word of the Lord not onl
536, saith the LORD of the king that sitteth upon the throne of David, and of all the people that dwelleth in this city, and of your brethren that are not gone forth with you into captivity; 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Behold, I will send upon them the sword, the famine, and the pestilence, and will make them like vile figs, that cannot be eaten, they are so evil. 
And I will persecute them with the sword, with the famine, and with the pestilence, and will deliver them to be removed to all the kingdoms of the earth, to be a curse, 
583,rsons of thy father's house. 
Abide thou with me, fear not: for he that seeketh my life seeketh thy life: but with me thou shalt be in safeguard. 
Then they told David, saying, Behold, the Philistines fight against Keilah, and they rob the threshingfloors. 
Therefore David enquired of the LORD, saying, Shall I go and smite these Philistines? And the LORD said unto David, Go, and smite the Philistines, and save Keilah. 
And David's men said unto him, Behold, we be afraid here in Judah: how much more then if we come to Keilah against the armies of the Philistines? 
Then David en
508,ericho, and fell among thieves, which stripped him of his raiment, and wounded him, and departed, leaving him half dead. 
And by chance there came down a certain priest that way: and when he saw him, he passed by on the other side. 
And likewise a Levite, when he was at the place, came and looked on him, and passed by on the other side. 
But a certain Samaritan, as he journeyed, came where he was: and when he saw him, he had compassion on him, 
And went to him, and bound up his wounds, pouring in oil an
421,you be swift. 
One thousand shall flee at the rebuke of one; at the rebuke of five shall ye flee: till ye be left as a beacon upon the top of a mountain, and as an ensign on an hill. 
And therefore will the LORD wait, that he may be gracious unto you, and therefore will he be exalted, that he may have mercy upon you: for the LORD is a God of judgment: blessed are all they that wait for him. 
For the people shall dwell
567,ose carcases fell in the wilderness? 
And to whom sware he that they should not enter into his rest, but to them that believed not? 
So we see that they could not enter in because of unbelief. 
Let us therefore fear, lest, a promise being left us of entering into his rest, any of you should seem to come short of it. 
For unto us was the gospel preached, as well as unto them: but the word preached did not profit them, not being mixed with faith in them that heard it. 
For we which have believed do enter into rest, as he said, As I have sworn in my wrath, if they
498, upon God. 
And the LORD said, I have surely seen the affliction of my people which are in Egypt, and have heard their cry by reason of their taskmasters; for I know their sorrows; 
And I am come down to deliver them out of the hand of the Egyptians, and to bring them up out of that land unto a good land and a large, unto a land flowing with milk and honey; unto the place of the Canaanites, and the Hittites, and the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites. 
Now therefo
450,s; make thy way straight before my face. 
For there is no faithfulness in their mouth; their inward part is very wickedness; their throat is an open sepulchre; they flatter with their tongue. 
Destroy thou them, O God; let them fall by their own counsels; cast them out in the multitude of their transgressions; for they have rebelled against thee. 
But let all those that put their trust in thee rejoice: let them ever shout for joy, because thou de
600,ons, and according to their doors. 
And according to the doors of the chambers that were toward the south was a door in the head of the way, even the way directly before the wall toward the east, as one entereth into them. 
Then said he unto me, The north chambers and the south chambers, which are before the separate place, they be holy chambers, where the priests that approach unto the LORD shall eat the most holy things: there shall they lay the most holy things, and the meat offering, and the sin offering, and the trespass offering; for the place is holy. 
When the priests enter therein, th
578,ke a widow's raiment to pledge: 
But thou shalt remember that thou wast a bondman in Egypt, and the LORD thy God redeemed thee thence: therefore I command thee to do this thing. 
When thou cuttest down thine harvest in thy field, and hast forgot a sheaf in the field, thou shalt not go again to fetch it: it shall be for the stranger, for the fatherless, and for the widow: that the LORD thy God may bless thee in all the work of thine hands. 
When thou beatest thine olive tree, thou shalt not go over the boughs again: it shall be for the stranger, for the fatherless, and for
450, within and without: and there was written therein lamentations, and mourning, and woe. 
Moreover he said unto me, Son of man, eat that thou findest; eat this roll, and go speak unto the house of Israel. 
So I opened my mouth, and he caused me to eat that roll. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, cause thy belly to eat, and fill thy bowels with this roll that I give thee. Then did I eat it; and it was in my mouth as honey for sweetness. 
And he sai
545, 
The seventh captain for the seventh month was Helez the Pelonite, of the children of Ephraim: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The eighth captain for the eighth month was Sibbecai the Hushathite, of the Zarhites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The ninth captain for the ninth month was Abiezer the Anetothite, of the Benjamites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The tenth captain for the tenth month was Maharai the Netophathite, of the Zarhites: and in his course were twenty and four thou
414,man answered him, Sir, I have no man, when the water is troubled, to put me into the pool: but while I am coming, another steppeth down before me. 
Jesus saith unto him, Rise, take up thy bed, and walk. 
And immediately the man was made whole, and took up his bed, and walked: and on the same day was the sabbath. 
The Jews therefore said unto him that was cured, It is the sabbath day: it is not lawful for thee t
515,t thy brother? for we shall all stand before the judgment seat of Christ. 
For it is written, As I live, saith the Lord, every knee shall bow to me, and every tongue shall confess to God. 
So then every one of us shall give account of himself to God. 
Let us not therefore judge one another any more: but judge this rather, that no man put a stumblingblock or an occasion to fall in his brother's way. 
I know, and am persuaded by the Lord Jesus, that there is nothing unclean of itself: but to him that esteemeth a
562, Take thee ten pieces: for thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel, Behold, I will rend the kingdom out of the hand of Solomon, and will give ten tribes to thee: 
(But he shall have one tribe for my servant David's sake, and for Jerusalem's sake, the city which I have chosen out of all the tribes of Israel:) 
Because that they have forsaken me, and have worshipped Ashtoreth the goddess of the Zidonians, Chemosh the god of the Moabites, and Milcom the god of the children of Ammon, and have not walked in my ways, to do that which is right in mine eyes, and to
506, took up his parable, and said, Alas, who shall live when God doeth this! 
And ships shall come from the coast of Chittim, and shall afflict Asshur, and shall afflict Eber, and he also shall perish for ever. 
And Balaam rose up, and went and returned to his place: and Balak also went his way. 
And Israel abode in Shittim, and the people began to commit whoredom with the daughters of Moab. 
And they called the people unto the sacrifices of their gods: and the people did eat, and bowed down to their god
599,And he brought back all the goods, and also brought again his brother Lot, and his goods, and the women also, and the people. 
And the king of Sodom went out to meet him after his return from the slaughter of Chedorlaomer, and of the kings that were with him, at the valley of Shaveh, which is the king's dale. 
And Melchizedek king of Salem brought forth bread and wine: and he was the priest of the most high God. 
And he blessed him, and said, Blessed be Abram of the most high God, possessor of heaven and earth: 
And blessed be the most high God, which hath delivered thine enemies into thy han
435,ant of Judah, that were returned from all nations, whither they had been driven, to dwell in the land of Judah; 
Even men, and women, and children, and the king's daughters, and every person that Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had left with Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan, and Jeremiah the prophet, and Baruch the son of Neriah. 
So they came into the land of Egypt: for they obeyed not the voice of the LORD: thus
589,dmark, which thy fathers have set. 
Seest thou a man diligent in his business? he shall stand before kings; he shall not stand before mean men. 
When thou sittest to eat with a ruler, consider diligently what is before thee: 
And put a knife to thy throat, if thou be a man given to appetite. 
Be not desirous of his dainties: for they are deceitful meat. 
Labour not to be rich: cease from thine own wisdom. 
Wilt thou set thine eyes upon that which is not? for riches certainly make themselves wings; they fly away as an eagle toward heaven. 
Eat thou not the bread of him that hath an e
408,n the holy land, and shall choose Jerusalem again. 
Be silent, O all flesh, before the LORD: for he is raised up out of his holy habitation. 
And he shewed me Joshua the high priest standing before the angel of the LORD, and Satan standing at his right hand to resist him. 
And the LORD said unto Satan, The LORD rebuke thee, O Satan; even the LORD that hath chosen Jerusalem rebuke thee: is not this a brand
413, thy paths. 
The LORD standeth up to plead, and standeth to judge the people. 
The LORD will enter into judgment with the ancients of his people, and the princes thereof: for ye have eaten up the vineyard; the spoil of the poor is in your houses. 
What mean ye that ye beat my people to pieces, and grind the faces of the poor? saith the Lord GOD of hosts. 
Moreover the LORD saith, Because the daughters of Zion 
588,at there was come a man to seek the welfare of the children of Israel. 
So I came to Jerusalem, and was there three days. 
And I arose in the night, I and some few men with me; neither told I any man what my God had put in my heart to do at Jerusalem: neither was there any beast with me, save the beast that I rode upon. 
And I went out by night by the gate of the valley, even before the dragon well, and to the dung port, and viewed the walls of Jerusalem, which were broken down, and the gates thereof were consumed with fire. 
Then I went on to the gate of the fountain, and to the k
499,re, nor have mercy, but destroy them. 
Hear ye, and give ear; be not proud: for the LORD hath spoken. 
Give glory to the LORD your God, before he cause darkness, and before your feet stumble upon the dark mountains, and, while ye look for light, he turn it into the shadow of death, and make it gross darkness. 
But if ye will not hear it, my soul shall weep in secret places for your pride; and mine eye shall weep sore, and run down with tears, because the LORD's flock is carried away captive. 
S
523,with me, O Tyre, and Zidon, and all the coasts of Palestine? will ye render me a recompence? and if ye recompense me, swiftly and speedily will I return your recompence upon your own head; 
Because ye have taken my silver and my gold, and have carried into your temples my goodly pleasant things: 
The children also of Judah and the children of Jerusalem have ye sold unto the Grecians, that ye might remove them far from their border. 
Behold, I will raise them out of the place whither ye have sold them, and will return 
565, good, and doest good; teach me thy statutes. 
The proud have forged a lie against me: but I will keep thy precepts with my whole heart. 
Their heart is as fat as grease; but I delight in thy law. 
It is good for me that I have been afflicted; that I might learn thy statutes. 
The law of thy mouth is better unto me than thousands of gold and silver. 
Thy hands have made me and fashioned me: give me understanding, that I may learn thy commandments. 
They that fear thee will be glad when they see me; because I have hoped in thy word. 
I know, O LORD, that thy j
465,leaseth me well. 
But his father and his mother knew not that it was of the LORD, that he sought an occasion against the Philistines: for at that time the Philistines had dominion over Israel. 
Then went Samson down, and his father and his mother, to Timnath, and came to the vineyards of Timnath: and, behold, a young lion roared against him. 
And the Spirit of the LORD came mightily upon him, and he rent him as he would have rent a kid, and he had nothing in hi
488,iada took for him two wives; and he begat sons and daughters. 
And it came to pass after this, that Joash was minded to repair the house of the LORD. 
And he gathered together the priests and the Levites, and said to them, Go out unto the cities of Judah, and gather of all Israel money to repair the house of your God from year to year, and see that ye hasten the matter. Howbeit the Levites hastened it not. 
And the king called for Jehoiada the chief, and said unto him, Why hast thou 
418,at keepeth the commandment keepeth his own soul; but he that despiseth his ways shall die. 
He that hath pity upon the poor lendeth unto the LORD; and that which he hath given will he pay him again. 
Chasten thy son while there is hope, and let not thy soul spare for his crying. 
A man of great wrath shall suffer punishment: for if thou deliver him, yet thou must do it again. 
Hear counsel, and receive instruction,
600,n; and he shall be tormented with fire and brimstone in the presence of the holy angels, and in the presence of the Lamb: 
And the smoke of their torment ascendeth up for ever and ever: and they have no rest day nor night, who worship the beast and his image, and whosoever receiveth the mark of his name. 
Here is the patience of the saints: here are they that keep the commandments of God, and the faith of Jesus. 
And I heard a voice from heaven saying unto me, Write, Blessed are the dead which die in the Lord from henceforth: Yea, saith the Spirit, that they may rest from their labours; and th
555,uld deliver Jerusalem out of my hand? 
But they held their peace, and answered him not a word: for the king's commandment was, saying, Answer him not. 
Then came Eliakim, the son of Hilkiah, that was over the household, and Shebna the scribe, and Joah, the son of Asaph, the recorder, to Hezekiah with their clothes rent, and told him the words of Rabshakeh. 
And it came to pass, when king Hezekiah heard it, that he rent his clothes, and covered himself with sackcloth, and went into the house of the LORD. 
And he sent Eliakim, who was over the househo
424,
And it came to pass in the morning that his spirit was troubled; and he sent and called for all the magicians of Egypt, and all the wise men thereof: and Pharaoh told them his dream; but there was none that could interpret them unto Pharaoh. 
Then spake the chief butler unto Pharaoh, saying, I do remember my faults this day: 
Pharaoh was wroth with his servants, and put me in ward in the captain of the guard's house, bo
459,rn after the flesh persecuted him that was born after the Spirit, even so it is now. 
Nevertheless what saith the scripture? Cast out the bondwoman and her son: for the son of the bondwoman shall not be heir with the son of the freewoman. 
So then, brethren, we are not children of the bondwoman, but of the free. 
Stand fast therefore in the liberty wherewith Christ hath made us free, and be not entangled again with the yoke of bondage. 
Behold, I Paul say
451,
Again the next day after John stood, and two of his disciples; 
And looking upon Jesus as he walked, he saith, Behold the Lamb of God! 
And the two disciples heard him speak, and they followed Jesus. 
Then Jesus turned, and saw them following, and saith unto them, What seek ye? They said unto him, Rabbi, (which is to say, being interpreted, Master,) where dwellest thou? 
He saith unto them, Come and see. They came and saw where he dwelt, and abod
553,. 
And he took them, and sent them over the brook, and sent over that he had. 
And Jacob was left alone; and there wrestled a man with him until the breaking of the day. 
And when he saw that he prevailed not against him, he touched the hollow of his thigh; and the hollow of Jacob's thigh was out of joint, as he wrestled with him. 
And he said, Let me go, for the day breaketh. And he said, I will not let thee go, except thou bless me. 
And he said unto him, What is thy name? And he said, Jacob. 
And he said, Thy name shall be called no more Jacob,
537, king, and his counsellors, and before all the king's mighty princes. And I was strengthened as the hand of the LORD my God was upon me, and I gathered together out of Israel chief men to go up with me. 
These are now the chief of their fathers, and this is the genealogy of them that went up with me from Babylon, in the reign of Artaxerxes the king. 
Of the sons of Phinehas; Gershom: of the sons of Ithamar; Daniel: of the sons of David; Hattush. 
Of the sons of Shechaniah, of the sons of Pharosh; Zechariah: and with him were reckon
400,helomi. 
And the prince of the tribe of the children of Naphtali, Pedahel the son of Ammihud. 
These are they whom the LORD commanded to divide the inheritance unto the children of Israel in the land of Canaan. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho, saying, 
Command the children of Israel, that they give unto the Levites of the inheritance of their possession 
485,te said unto him, Thou knowest the thing that the LORD said unto Moses the man of God concerning me and thee in Kadeshbarnea. 
Forty years old was I when Moses the servant of the LORD sent me from Kadeshbarnea to espy out the land; and I brought him word again as it was in mine heart. 
Nevertheless my brethren that went up with me made the heart of the people melt: but I wholly followed the LORD my God. 
And Moses sware on that day, saying, Surely the land whereon thy feet have tr
411,ise, anoint him: for this is he. 
Then Samuel took the horn of oil, and anointed him in the midst of his brethren: and the Spirit of the LORD came upon David from that day forward. So Samuel rose up, and went to Ramah. 
But the Spirit of the LORD departed from Saul, and an evil spirit from the LORD troubled him. 
And Saul's servants said unto him, Behold now, an evil spirit from God troubleth thee. 
Let our 
575,nests; but the Son of man hath not where to lay his head. 
And he said unto another, Follow me. But he said, Lord, suffer me first to go and bury my father. 
Jesus said unto him, Let the dead bury their dead: but go thou and preach the kingdom of God. 
And another also said, Lord, I will follow thee; but let me first go bid them farewell, which are at home at my house. 
And Jesus said unto him, No man, having put his hand to the plough, and looking back, is fit for the kingdom of God. 
After these things the LORD appointed other seventy also, and sent them two and two 
532, because he hath received him safe and sound. 
And he was angry, and would not go in: therefore came his father out, and intreated him. 
And he answering said to his father, Lo, these many years do I serve thee, neither transgressed I at any time thy commandment: and yet thou never gavest me a kid, that I might make merry with my friends: 
But as soon as this thy son was come, which hath devoured thy living with harlots, thou hast killed for him the fatted calf. 
And he said unto him, Son, thou art ever with me, and all that I
534,ished? Ye shall not be unpunished: for I will call for a sword upon all the inhabitants of the earth, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Therefore prophesy thou against them all these words, and say unto them, The LORD shall roar from on high, and utter his voice from his holy habitation; he shall mightily roar upon his habitation; he shall give a shout, as they that tread the grapes, against all the inhabitants of the earth. 
A noise shall come even to the ends of the earth; for the LORD hath a controversy with the nations, he will plea
503, perisheth in his righteousness, and there is a wicked man that prolongeth his life in his wickedness. 
Be not righteous over much; neither make thyself over wise: why shouldest thou destroy thyself ? 
Be not over much wicked, neither be thou foolish: why shouldest thou die before thy time? 
It is good that thou shouldest take hold of this; yea, also from this withdraw not thine hand: for he that feareth God shall come forth of them all. 
Wisdom strengtheneth the wise more than ten mighty men which
557,ten thousand measures of wheat, and ten thousand of barley. So much did the children of Ammon pay unto him, both the second year, and the third. 
So Jotham became mighty, because he prepared his ways before the LORD his God. 
Now the rest of the acts of Jotham, and all his wars, and his ways, lo, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel and Judah. 
He was five and twenty years old when he began to reign, and reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem. 
And Jotham slept with his fathers, and they buried him in the city of David: and Ahaz his son rei
475,od of bulls and of goats, and the ashes of an heifer sprinkling the unclean, sanctifieth to the purifying of the flesh: 
How much more shall the blood of Christ, who through the eternal Spirit offered himself without spot to God, purge your conscience from dead works to serve the living God? 
And for this cause he is the mediator of the new testament, that by means of death, for the redemption of the transgressions that were under the first testament, they which are call
405, unto this day. 
Neither did Manasseh drive out the inhabitants of Bethshean and her towns, nor Taanach and her towns, nor the inhabitants of Dor and her towns, nor the inhabitants of Ibleam and her towns, nor the inhabitants of Megiddo and her towns: but the Canaanites would dwell in that land. 
And it came to pass, when Israel was strong, that they put the Canaanites to tribute, and did not utterly d
468,selves together, to ask help of the LORD: even out of all the cities of Judah they came to seek the LORD. 
And Jehoshaphat stood in the congregation of Judah and Jerusalem, in the house of the LORD, before the new court, 
And said, O LORD God of our fathers, art not thou God in heaven? and rulest not thou over all the kingdoms of the heathen? and in thine hand is there not power and might, so that none is able to withstand thee? 
Art not thou our God, who didst dr
591, saith the LORD; Even so will I break the yoke of Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon from the neck of all nations within the space of two full years. And the prophet Jeremiah went his way. 
Then the word of the LORD came unto Jeremiah the prophet, after that Hananiah the prophet had broken the yoke from off the neck of the prophet Jeremiah, saying, 
Go and tell Hananiah, saying, Thus saith the LORD; Thou hast broken the yokes of wood; but thou shalt make for them yokes of iron. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; I have put a yoke of iron upon the neck of all these natio
552,ame of the place Peniel: for I have seen God face to face, and my life is preserved. 
And as he passed over Penuel the sun rose upon him, and he halted upon his thigh. 
Therefore the children of Israel eat not of the sinew which shrank, which is upon the hollow of the thigh, unto this day: because he touched the hollow of Jacob's thigh in the sinew that shrank. 
And Jacob lifted up his eyes, and looked, and, behold, Esau came, and with him four hundred men. And he divided the children unto Leah, and unto Rachel, and unto the two handmaids. 
And h
521,among the Philistines? 
And they smote the Philistines that day from Michmash to Aijalon: and the people were very faint. 
And the people flew upon the spoil, and took sheep, and oxen, and calves, and slew them on the ground: and the people did eat them with the blood. 
Then they told Saul, saying, Behold, the people sin against the LORD, in that they eat with the blood. And he said, Ye have transgressed: roll a great stone unto me this day. 
And Saul said, Disperse yourselves among the people, and say unto them, Br
481,his heart shall fall into mischief. 
As a roaring lion, and a ranging bear; so is a wicked ruler over the poor people. 
The prince that wanteth understanding is also a great oppressor: but he that hateth covetousness shall prolong his days. 
A man that doeth violence to the blood of any person shall flee to the pit; let no man stay him. 
Whoso walketh uprightly shall be saved: but he that is perverse in his ways shall fall at once. 
He that tilleth his land shall have plenty o
565,my heart with one of thine eyes, with one chain of thy neck. 
How fair is thy love, my sister, my spouse! how much better is thy love than wine! and the smell of thine ointments than all spices! 
Thy lips, O my spouse, drop as the honeycomb: honey and milk are under thy tongue; and the smell of thy garments is like the smell of Lebanon. 
A garden inclosed is my sister, my spouse; a spring shut up, a fountain sealed. 
Thy plants are an orchard of pomegranates, with pleasant fruits; camphire, with spikenard, 
Spikenard and saffron; calamus and cinnamon, with al
558,d the sons of Kenaz; Othniel, and Seraiah: and the sons of Othniel; Hathath. 
And Meonothai begat Ophrah: and Seraiah begat Joab, the father of the valley of Charashim; for they were craftsmen. 
And the sons of Caleb the son of Jephunneh; Iru, Elah, and Naam: and the sons of Elah, even Kenaz. 
And the sons of Jehaleleel; Ziph, and Ziphah, Tiria, and Asareel. 
And the sons of Ezra were, Jether, and Mered, and Epher, and Jalon: and she bare Miriam, and Shammai, and Ishbah the father of Eshtemoa. 
And his wife Jehudijah bare Jered the father of Gedor, and
418,written in their foreheads. 
And I heard a voice from heaven, as the voice of many waters, and as the voice of a great thunder: and I heard the voice of harpers harping with their harps: 
And they sung as it were a new song before the throne, and before the four beasts, and the elders: and no man could learn that song but the hundred and forty and four thousand, which were redeemed from the earth. 
These are they w
583, the daughter of Saul came out to meet David, and said, How glorious was the king of Israel to day, who uncovered himself to day in the eyes of the handmaids of his servants, as one of the vain fellows shamelessly uncovereth himself! 
And David said unto Michal, It was before the LORD, which chose me before thy father, and before all his house, to appoint me ruler over the people of the LORD, over Israel: therefore will I play before the LORD. 
And I will yet be more vile than thus, and will be base in mine own sight: and of the maidservants which thou hast spoken of, of them 
453,or us, through the veil, that is to say, his flesh; 
And having an high priest over the house of God; 
Let us draw near with a true heart in full assurance of faith, having our hearts sprinkled from an evil conscience, and our bodies washed with pure water. 
Let us hold fast the profession of our faith without wavering; (for he is faithful that promised;) 
And let us consider one another to provoke unto love and to good works: 
Not forsaking the ass
482,tip of his finger in water, and cool my tongue; for I am tormented in this flame. 
But Abraham said, Son, remember that thou in thy lifetime receivedst thy good things, and likewise Lazarus evil things: but now he is comforted, and thou art tormented. 
And beside all this, between us and you there is a great gulf fixed: so that they which would pass from hence to you cannot; neither can they pass to us, that would come from thence. 
Then he said, I pray thee therefore, father, 
460,ad wintered in the isle, whose sign was Castor and Pollux. 
And landing at Syracuse, we tarried there three days. 
And from thence we fetched a compass, and came to Rhegium: and after one day the south wind blew, and we came the next day to Puteoli: 
Where we found brethren, and were desired to tarry with them seven days: and so we went toward Rome. 
And from thence, when the brethren heard of us, they came to meet us as far as Appii forum, and The three t
510, 
And there were a thousand men of Benjamin with him, and Ziba the servant of the house of Saul, and his fifteen sons and his twenty servants with him; and they went over Jordan before the king. 
And there went over a ferry boat to carry over the king's household, and to do what he thought good. And Shimei the son of Gera fell down before the king, as he was come over Jordan; 
And said unto the king, Let not my lord impute iniquity unto me, neither do thou remember that which thy servant did perversely th
457, And they said unto him, Caesar's. 
And Jesus answering said unto them, Render to Caesar the things that are Caesar's, and to God the things that are God's. And they marvelled at him. 
Then come unto him the Sadducees, which say there is no resurrection; and they asked him, saying, 
Master, Moses wrote unto us, If a man's brother die, and leave his wife behind him, and leave no children, that his brother should take his wife, and raise up seed unto his 
574,ees, fir trees, and algum trees, out of Lebanon: for I know that thy servants can skill to cut timber in Lebanon; and, behold, my servants shall be with thy servants, 
Even to prepare me timber in abundance: for the house which I am about to build shall be wonderful great. 
And, behold, I will give to thy servants, the hewers that cut timber, twenty thousand measures of beaten wheat, and twenty thousand measures of barley, and twenty thousand baths of wine, and twenty thousand baths of oil. 
Then Huram the king of Tyre answered in writing, which he sent to Solomon, Be
564, in Bashan, of the Manassites. 
And this is the law which Moses set before the children of Israel: 
These are the testimonies, and the statutes, and the judgments, which Moses spake unto the children of Israel, after they came forth out of Egypt. 
On this side Jordan, in the valley over against Bethpeor, in the land of Sihon king of the Amorites, who dwelt at Heshbon, whom Moses and the children of Israel smote, after they were come forth out of Egypt: 
And they possessed his land, and the land of Og king of Bashan, two kings of the Amorites, which were on t
592,y for your iniquities, and mourn one toward another. 
Thus Ezekiel is unto you a sign: according to all that he hath done shall ye do: and when this cometh, ye shall know that I am the Lord GOD. 
Also, thou son of man, shall it not be in the day when I take from them their strength, the joy of their glory, the desire of their eyes, and that whereupon they set their minds, their sons and their daughters, 
That he that escapeth in that day shall come unto thee, to cause thee to hear it with thine ears? 
In that day shall thy mouth be opened to him which is escaped, and thou shalt speak, 
518, most holy. 
As the sin offering is, so is the trespass offering: there is one law for them: the priest that maketh atonement therewith shall have it. 
And the priest that offereth any man's burnt offering, even the priest shall have to himself the skin of the burnt offering which he hath offered. 
And all the meat offering that is baken in the oven, and all that is dressed in the fryingpan, and in the pan, shall be the priest's that offereth it. 
And every meat offering, mingled with oil, and dry, shall all the 
546,ople in the name of the LORD of hosts. 
And he dealt among all the people, even among the whole multitude of Israel, as well to the women as men, to every one a cake of bread, and a good piece of flesh, and a flagon of wine. So all the people departed every one to his house. 
Then David returned to bless his household. And Michal the daughter of Saul came out to meet David, and said, How glorious was the king of Israel to day, who uncovered himself to day in the eyes of the handmaids of his servants, as one of the vain fellows shamelessly u
597,ils; 
My lips shall not speak wickedness, nor my tongue utter deceit. 
God forbid that I should justify you: till I die I will not remove mine integrity from me. 
My righteousness I hold fast, and will not let it go: my heart shall not reproach me so long as I live. 
Let mine enemy be as the wicked, and he that riseth up against me as the unrighteous. 
For what is the hope of the hypocrite, though he hath gained, when God taketh away his soul? 
Will God hear his cry when trouble cometh upon him? 
Will he delight himself in the Almighty? will he always call upon God? 
I will teach you by the
596,shethgath: the houses of Achzib shall be a lie to the kings of Israel. 
Yet will I bring an heir unto thee, O inhabitant of Mareshah: he shall come unto Adullam the glory of Israel. 
Make thee bald, and poll thee for thy delicate children; enlarge thy baldness as the eagle; for they are gone into captivity from thee. 
Woe to them that devise iniquity, and work evil upon their beds! when the morning is light, they practise it, because it is in the power of their hand. 
And they covet fields, and take them by violence; and houses, and take them away: so they oppress a man and his house, even
408, in the valley. 
And it came to pass the same night, that the LORD said unto him, Arise, get thee down unto the host; for I have delivered it into thine hand. 
But if thou fear to go down, go thou with Phurah thy servant down to the host: 
And thou shalt hear what they say; and afterward shall thine hands be strengthened to go down unto the host. Then went he down with Phurah his servant unto the outside 
560,e a certain ruler, and worshipped him, saying, My daughter is even now dead: but come and lay thy hand upon her, and she shall live. 
And Jesus arose, and followed him, and so did his disciples. 
And, behold, a woman, which was diseased with an issue of blood twelve years, came behind him, and touched the hem of his garment: 
For she said within herself, If I may but touch his garment, I shall be whole. 
But Jesus turned him about, and when he saw her, he said, Daughter, be of good comfort; thy faith hath made thee whole. And the woman was made whole fro
523, Moses was fourscore years old, and Aaron fourscore and three years old, when they spake unto Pharaoh. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
When Pharaoh shall speak unto you, saying, Shew a miracle for you: then thou shalt say unto Aaron, Take thy rod, and cast it before Pharaoh, and it shall become a serpent. 
And Moses and Aaron went in unto Pharaoh, and they did so as the LORD had commanded: and Aaron cast down his rod before Pharaoh, and before his servants, and it became a serpent. 
Then Pharao
570, said, This is wickedness. And he cast it into the midst of the ephah; and he cast the weight of lead upon the mouth thereof. 
Then lifted I up mine eyes, and looked, and, behold, there came out two women, and the wind was in their wings; for they had wings like the wings of a stork: and they lifted up the ephah between the earth and the heaven. 
Then said I to the angel that talked with me, Whither do these bear the ephah? 
And he said unto me, To build it an house in the land of Shinar: and it shall be established, and set there upon her own base. 
And I turned,
556,ll, yea, four are comely in going: 
A lion which is strongest among beasts, and turneth not away for any; 
A greyhound; an he goat also; and a king, against whom there is no rising up. 
If thou hast done foolishly in lifting up thyself, or if thou hast thought evil, lay thine hand upon thy mouth. 
Surely the churning of milk bringeth forth butter, and the wringing of the nose bringeth forth blood: so the forcing of wrath bringeth forth strife. 
The words of king Lemuel, the prophecy that his mother taught him. 
What, my son? and what, the son of my w
463,and say, God save king Adonijah. 
But me, even me thy servant, and Zadok the priest, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and thy servant Solomon, hath he not called. 
Is this thing done by my lord the king, and thou hast not shewed it unto thy servant, who should sit on the throne of my lord the king after him? 
Then king David answered and said, Call me Bathsheba. And she came into the king's presence, and stood before the king. 
And the king sware, and said, A
538, defile yourselves with their idols: 
I am the LORD your God; walk in my statutes, and keep my judgments, and do them; 
And hallow my sabbaths; and they shall be a sign between me and you, that ye may know that I am the LORD your God. 
Notwithstanding the children rebelled against me: they walked not in my statutes, neither kept my judgments to do them, which if a man do, he shall even live in them; they polluted my sabbaths: then I said, I would pour out my fury upon them, to accomplish my anger against them in the wilderness. 
Nev
583,is head, and burn it on the altar; and the blood thereof shall be wrung out at the side of the altar: 
And he shall pluck away his crop with his feathers, and cast it beside the altar on the east part, by the place of the ashes: 
And he shall cleave it with the wings thereof, but shall not divide it asunder: and the priest shall burn it upon the altar, upon the wood that is upon the fire: it is a burnt sacrifice, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And when any will offer a meat offering unto the LORD, his offering shall be of fine flour; and he shall p
557,re am I. 
And he ran unto Eli, and said, Here am I; for thou calledst me. And he said, I called not; lie down again. And he went and lay down. 
And the LORD called yet again, Samuel. And Samuel arose and went to Eli, and said, Here am I; for thou didst call me. And he answered, I called not, my son; lie down again. 
Now Samuel did not yet know the LORD, neither was the word of the LORD yet revealed unto him. 
And the LORD called Samuel again the third time. And he arose and went to Eli, and said, Here am I; for thou didst call me. And Eli perceived th
557,o you is the word of this salvation sent. 
For they that dwell at Jerusalem, and their rulers, because they knew him not, nor yet the voices of the prophets which are read every sabbath day, they have fulfilled them in condemning him. 
And though they found no cause of death in him, yet desired they Pilate that he should be slain. 
And when they had fulfilled all that was written of him, they took him down from the tree, and laid him in a sepulchre. 
But God raised him from the dead: 
And he was seen many days of them which came up with him from Galil
547, dwell in that land. 
And it came to pass, when Israel was strong, that they put the Canaanites to tribute, and did not utterly drive them out. 
Neither did Ephraim drive out the Canaanites that dwelt in Gezer; but the Canaanites dwelt in Gezer among them. 
Neither did Zebulun drive out the inhabitants of Kitron, nor the inhabitants of Nahalol; but the Canaanites dwelt among them, and became tributaries. 
Neither did Asher drive out the inhabitants of Accho, nor the inhabitants of Zidon, nor of Ahlab, nor of Achzib, nor of Helbah, nor of Aph
575,en of an hundred throughout all the tribes of Israel, and an hundred of a thousand, and a thousand out of ten thousand, to fetch victual for the people, that they may do, when they come to Gibeah of Benjamin, according to all the folly that they have wrought in Israel. 
So all the men of Israel were gathered against the city, knit together as one man. 
And the tribes of Israel sent men through all the tribe of Benjamin, saying, What wickedness is this that is done among you? 
Now therefore deliver us the men, the children of Belial, which are in Gibeah, that we may put
440,of was a talent of gold with the precious stones: and it was set on David's head. And he brought forth the spoil of the city in great abundance. 
And he brought forth the people that were therein, and put them under saws, and under harrows of iron, and under axes of iron, and made them pass through the brick-kiln: and thus did he unto all the cities of the children of Ammon. So David and all the people returned unto Jerusalem. 
And it c
553,there was exceeding much spoil in them. 
They smote also the tents of cattle, and carried away sheep and camels in abundance, and returned to Jerusalem. 
And the Spirit of God came upon Azariah the son of Oded: 
And he went out to meet Asa, and said unto him, Hear ye me, Asa, and all Judah and Benjamin; The LORD is with you, while ye be with him; and if ye seek him, he will be found of you; but if ye forsake him, he will forsake you. 
Now for a long season Israel hath been without the true God, and without a teaching priest, and without law. 
But 
447,ee out of Egypt. 
Thou shalt therefore keep this ordinance in his season from year to year. 
And it shall be when the LORD shall bring thee into the land of the Canaanites, as he sware unto thee and to thy fathers, and shall give it thee, 
That thou shalt set apart unto the LORD all that openeth the matrix, and every firstling that cometh of a beast which thou hast; the males shall be the LORD's. 
And every firstling of an ass thou shalt redee
497,to Zerubbabel, governor of Judah, saying, I will shake the heavens and the earth; 
And I will overthrow the throne of kingdoms, and I will destroy the strength of the kingdoms of the heathen; and I will overthrow the chariots, and those that ride in them; and the horses and their riders shall come down, every one by the sword of his brother. 
In that day, saith the LORD of hosts, will I take thee, O Zerubbabel, my servant, the son of Shealtiel, saith the LORD, and will make thee as a signet: 
502,oice when they divide the spoil. 
For thou hast broken the yoke of his burden, and the staff of his shoulder, the rod of his oppressor, as in the day of Midian. 
For every battle of the warrior is with confused noise, and garments rolled in blood; but this shall be with burning and fuel of fire. 
For unto us a child is born, unto us a son is given: and the government shall be upon his shoulder: and his name shall be called Wonderful, Counsellor, The mighty God, The everlasting Father, The Prince o
481,ther was a Greek. 
And as they went through the cities, they delivered them the decrees for to keep, that were ordained of the apostles and elders which were at Jerusalem. 
And so were the churches established in the faith, and increased in number daily. 
Now when they had gone throughout Phrygia and the region of Galatia, and were forbidden of the Holy Ghost to preach the word in Asia, 
After they were come to Mysia, they assayed to go into Bithynia: but the Spirit suffered t
448,
For in eating every one taketh before other his own supper: and one is hungry, and another is drunken. 
What? have ye not houses to eat and to drink in? or despise ye the church of God, and shame them that have not? what shall I say to you? shall I praise you in this? I praise you not. 
For I have received of the Lord that which also I delivered unto you, that the Lord Jesus the same night in which he was betrayed took bread: 
And when he had 
500,e shall feign herself to be another woman. 
And it was so, when Ahijah heard the sound of her feet, as she came in at the door, that he said, Come in, thou wife of Jeroboam; why feignest thou thyself to be another? for I am sent to thee with heavy tidings. 
Go, tell Jeroboam, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Forasmuch as I exalted thee from among the people, and made thee prince over my people Israel, 
And rent the kingdom away from the house of David, and gave it thee: and yet thou hast not b
403,ttle thing. 
And Lebanon is not sufficient to burn, nor the beasts thereof sufficient for a burnt offering. 
All nations before him are as nothing; and they are counted to him less than nothing, and vanity. 
To whom then will ye liken God? or what likeness will ye compare unto him? 
The workman melteth a graven image, and the goldsmith spreadeth it over with gold, and casteth silver chains. 
He that 
569,ore the LORD God of Israel saith, I said indeed that thy house, and the house of thy father, should walk before me for ever: but now the LORD saith, Be it far from me; for them that honour me I will honour, and they that despise me shall be lightly esteemed. 
Behold, the days come, that I will cut off thine arm, and the arm of thy father's house, that there shall not be an old man in thine house. 
And thou shalt see an enemy in my habitation, in all the wealth which God shall give Israel: and there shall not be an old man in thine house for ever. 
And the man of 
536,kept in store, reserved unto fire against the day of judgment and perdition of ungodly men. 
But, beloved, be not ignorant of this one thing, that one day is with the Lord as a thousand years, and a thousand years as one day. 
The Lord is not slack concerning his promise, as some men count slackness; but is longsuffering to us-ward, not willing that any should perish, but that all should come to repentance. 
But the day of the Lord will come as a thief in the night; in the which the heavens shall pass away with a great noise, and 
586,blood of the bullock, and sprinkle it upon the mercy seat, and before the mercy seat: 
And he shall make an atonement for the holy place, because of the uncleanness of the children of Israel, and because of their transgressions in all their sins: and so shall he do for the tabernacle of the congregation, that remaineth among them in the midst of their uncleanness. 
And there shall be no man in the tabernacle of the congregation when he goeth in to make an atonement in the holy place, until he come out, and have made an atonement for himself, and for his household, and for all the
457, him, so did he. 
And the children of Israel spake unto Moses, saying, Behold, we die, we perish, we all perish. 
Whosoever cometh any thing near unto the tabernacle of the LORD shall die: shall we be consumed with dying? 
And the LORD said unto Aaron, Thou and thy sons and thy father's house with thee shall bear the iniquity of the sanctuary: and thou and thy sons with thee shall bear the iniquity of your priesthood. 
And thy brethren also of the tribe
464,ent: for they hear thy words, but they do them not. 
And when this cometh to pass, (lo, it will come,) then shall they know that a prophet hath been among them. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, prophesy against the shepherds of Israel, prophesy, and say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD unto the shepherds; Woe be to the shepherds of Israel that do feed themselves! should not the shepherds feed the flocks? 
Ye eat the fat, and ye cl
439,rength: let them come near; then let them speak: let us come near together to judgment. 
Who raised up the righteous man from the east, called him to his foot, gave the nations before him, and made him rule over kings? he gave them as the dust to his sword, and as driven stubble to his bow. 
He pursued them, and passed safely; even by the way that he had not gone with his feet. 
Who hath wrought and done it, calling the generations fro
519,'s. 
Now the word of the LORD came unto Jonah the son of Amittai, saying, 
Arise, go to Nineveh, that great city, and cry against it; for their wickedness is come up before me. 
But Jonah rose up to flee unto Tarshish from the presence of the LORD, and went down to Joppa; and he found a ship going to Tarshish: so he paid the fare thereof, and went down into it, to go with them unto Tarshish from the presence of the LORD. 
But the LORD sent out a great wind into the sea, and there was a mighty tempest in the sea, s
459, him. 
Ye shall not respect persons in judgment; but ye shall hear the small as well as the great; ye shall not be afraid of the face of man; for the judgment is God's: and the cause that is too hard for you, bring it unto me, and I will hear it. 
And I commanded you at that time all the things which ye should do. 
And when we departed from Horeb, we went through all that great and terrible wilderness, which ye saw by the way of the mountain of the Amorit
415,ld and her that travaileth with child together: a great company shall return thither. 
They shall come with weeping, and with supplications will I lead them: I will cause them to walk by the rivers of waters in a straight way, wherein they shall not stumble: for I am a father to Israel, and Ephraim is my firstborn. 
Hear the word of the LORD, O ye nations, and declare it in the isles afar off, and say, He that s
420,eeks to them that plucked off the hair: I hid not my face from shame and spitting. 
For the Lord GOD will help me; therefore shall I not be confounded: therefore have I set my face like a flint, and I know that I shall not be ashamed. 
He is near that justifieth me; who will contend with me? let us stand together: who is mine adversary? let him come near to me. 
Behold, the Lord GOD will help me; who is he that shall
561, wherefore should God be angry at thy voice, and destroy the work of thine hands? 
For in the multitude of dreams and many words there are also divers vanities: but fear thou God. 
If thou seest the oppression of the poor, and violent perverting of judgment and justice in a province, marvel not at the matter: for he that is higher than the highest regardeth; and there be higher than they. 
Moreover the profit of the earth is for all: the king himself is served by the field. 
He that loveth silver shall not be satisfied with silver; nor he that loveth abun
418,rother, or shall I cease? And the LORD said, Go up; for to morrow I will deliver them into thine hand. 
And Israel set liers in wait round about Gibeah. 
And the children of Israel went up against the children of Benjamin on the third day, and put themselves in array against Gibeah, as at other times. 
And the children of Benjamin went out against the people, and were drawn away from the city; and they began to smi
446,nd where is the place of understanding? 
Seeing it is hid from the eyes of all living, and kept close from the fowls of the air. 
Destruction and death say, We have heard the fame thereof with our ears. 
God understandeth the way thereof, and he knoweth the place thereof. 
For he looketh to the ends of the earth, and seeth under the whole heaven; 
To make the weight for the winds; and he weigheth the waters by measure. 
When he made a decree 
593,besought him, saying, If thou cast us out, suffer us to go away into the herd of swine. 
And he said unto them, Go. And when they were come out, they went into the herd of swine: and, behold, the whole herd of swine ran violently down a steep place into the sea, and perished in the waters. 
And they that kept them fled, and went their ways into the city, and told every thing, and what was befallen to the possessed of the devils. 
And, behold, the whole city came out to meet Jesus: and when they saw him, they besought him that he would depart out of their coasts. 
And he entered into a s
469,housand two hundred and threescore days, clothed in sackcloth. 
These are the two olive trees, and the two candlesticks standing before the God of the earth. 
And if any man will hurt them, fire proceedeth out of their mouth, and devoureth their enemies: and if any man will hurt them, he must in this manner be killed. 
These have power to shut heaven, that it rain not in the days of their prophecy: and have power over waters to turn them to blood, and to smite the 
459, tell it to the inhabitants of this land: for they have heard that thou LORD art among this people, that thou LORD art seen face to face, and that thy cloud standeth over them, and that thou goest before them, by day time in a pillar of a cloud, and in a pillar of fire by night. 
Now if thou shalt kill all this people as one man, then the nations which have heard the fame of thee will speak, saying, 
Because the LORD was not able to bring this people into
587,hings is blind, and cannot see afar off, and hath forgotten that he was purged from his old sins. 
Wherefore the rather, brethren, give diligence to make your calling and election sure: for if ye do these things, ye shall never fall: 
For so an entrance shall be ministered unto you abundantly into the everlasting kingdom of our Lord and Saviour Jesus Christ. 
Wherefore I will not be negligent to put you always in remembrance of these things, though ye know them, and be established in the present truth. 
Yea, I think it meet, as long as I am in this tabernacle, to stir you up by pu
539,ites, and to them which were in the cities of the Kenites, 
And to them which were in Hormah, and to them which were in Chorashan, and to them which were in Athach, 
And to them which were in Hebron, and to all the places where David himself and his men were wont to haunt. 
Now the Philistines fought against Israel: and the men of Israel fled from before the Philistines, and fell down slain in mount Gilboa. 
And the Philistines followed hard upon Saul and upon his sons; and the Philistines slew Jonathan, and Abinadab, and Melchishua,
539,e for the side chambers round about, that they might have hold, but they had not hold in the wall of the house. 
And there was an enlarging, and a winding about still upward to the side chambers: for the winding about of the house went still upward round about the house: therefore the breadth of the house was still upward, and so increased from the lowest chamber to the highest by the midst. 
I saw also the height of the house round about: the foundations of the side chambers were a full reed of six great cubits. 
The thickness of th
463,, to sanctify him. 
And Moses brought Aaron's sons, and put coats upon them, and girded them with girdles, and put bonnets upon them; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he brought the bullock for the sin offering: and Aaron and his sons laid their hands upon the head of the bullock for the sin offering. 
And he slew it; and Moses took the blood, and put it upon the horns of the altar round about with his finger, and purified the altar, and poured the blood at 
501,ere is no way. 
Yet setteth he the poor on high from affliction, and maketh him families like a flock. 
The righteous shall see it, and rejoice: and all iniquity shall stop her mouth. 
Whoso is wise, and will observe these things, even they shall understand the lovingkindness of the LORD. 
O god, my heart is fixed; I will sing and give praise, even with my glory. 
Awake, psaltery and harp: I myself will awake early. 
I will praise thee, O LORD, among the people: and I will sing praises unto thee 
541,nion, that thou shalt break his yoke from off thy neck. 
And Esau hated Jacob because of the blessing wherewith his father blessed him: and Esau said in his heart, The days of mourning for my father are at hand; then will I slay my brother Jacob. 
And these words of Esau her elder son were told to Rebekah: and she sent and called Jacob her younger son, and said unto him, Behold, thy brother Esau, as touching thee, doth comfort himself, purposing to kill thee. 
Now therefore, my son, obey my voice; arise, flee thou to Laban my brother t
531,t it to ruin. 
Howl, ye ships of Tarshish: for your strength is laid waste. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that Tyre shall be forgotten seventy years, according to the days of one king: after the end of seventy years shall Tyre sing as an harlot. 
Take an harp, go about the city, thou harlot that hast been forgotten; make sweet melody, sing many songs, that thou mayest be remembered. 
And it shall come to pass after the end of seventy years, that the LORD will visit Tyre, and she shall turn to her hire, and shall com
491, days of thy father light and understanding and wisdom, like the wisdom of the gods, was found in him; whom the king Nebuchadnezzar thy father, the king, I say, thy father, made master of the magicians, astrologers, Chaldeans, and soothsayers; 
Forasmuch as an excellent spirit, and knowledge, and understanding, interpreting of dreams, and shewing of hard sentences, and dissolving of doubts, were found in the same Daniel, whom the king named Belteshazzar: now let Daniel be called, and he
455, twentieth day of the month; and all the people sat in the street of the house of God, trembling because of this matter, and for the great rain. 
And Ezra the priest stood up, and said unto them, Ye have transgressed, and have taken strange wives, to increase the trespass of Israel. 
Now therefore make confession unto the LORD God of your fathers, and do his pleasure: and separate yourselves from the people of the land, and from the strange wives. 
Th
558,nto his hand. 
And David saw that Saul was come out to seek his life: and David was in the wilderness of Ziph in a wood. 
And Jonathan Saul's son arose, and went to David into the wood, and strengthened his hand in God. 
And he said unto him, Fear not: for the hand of Saul my father shall not find thee; and thou shalt be king over Israel, and I shall be next unto thee; and that also Saul my father knoweth. 
And they two made a covenant before the LORD: and David abode in the wood, and Jonathan went to his house. 
Then came up the Ziphites to Saul to Gi
583,lee: there shall ye see him, as he said unto you. 
And they went out quickly, and fled from the sepulchre; for they trembled and were amazed: neither said they any thing to any man; for they were afraid. 
Now when Jesus was risen early the first day of the week, he appeared first to Mary Magdalene, out of whom he had cast seven devils. 
And she went and told them that had been with him, as they mourned and wept. 
And they, when they had heard that he was alive, and had been seen of her, believed not. 
After that he appeared in another form unto two of them, as they walked, and
558,hildren of Aaron. 
On that day they read in the book of Moses in the audience of the people; and therein was found written, that the Ammonite and the Moabite should not come into the congregation of God for ever; 
Because they met not the children of Israel with bread and with water, but hired Balaam against them, that he should curse them: howbeit our God turned the curse into a blessing. 
Now it came to pass, when they had heard the law, that they separated from Israel all the mixed multitude. 
And before this, Eliashib the priest, having the oversig
441,ir journey from Elim, and all the congregation of the children of Israel came unto the wilderness of Sin, which is between Elim and Sinai, on the fifteenth day of the second month after their departing out of the land of Egypt. 
And the whole congregation of the children of Israel murmured against Moses and Aaron in the wilderness: 
And the children of Israel said unto them, Would to God we had died by the hand of the LORD in the land of
475,, being a leper; for he was cut off from the house of the LORD: and Jotham his son was over the king's house, judging the people of the land. 
Now the rest of the acts of Uzziah, first and last, did Isaiah the prophet, the son of Amoz, write. 
So Uzziah slept with his fathers, and they buried him with his fathers in the field of the burial which belonged to the kings; for they said, He is a leper: and Jotham his son reigned in his stead. 
Jotham was twenty and five years
446,soning among themselves. 
And Paul dwelt two whole years in his own hired house, and received all that came in unto him, 
Preaching the kingdom of God, and teaching those things which concern the Lord Jesus Christ, with all confidence, no man forbidding him. 
Paul, a servant of Jesus Christ, called to be an apostle, separated unto the gospel of God, 
(Which he had promised afore by his prophets in the holy scriptures,) 
Concerning his Son Jes
448,er wood; rooms shalt thou make in the ark, and shalt pitch it within and without with pitch. 
And this is the fashion which thou shalt make it of: The length of the ark shall be three hundred cubits, the breadth of it fifty cubits, and the height of it thirty cubits. 
A window shalt thou make to the ark, and in a cubit shalt thou finish it above; and the door of the ark shalt thou set in the side thereof; with lower, second, and third stories s
429, selfsame day entered Noah, and Shem, and Ham, and Japheth, the sons of Noah, and Noah's wife, and the three wives of his sons with them, into the ark; 
They, and every beast after his kind, and all the cattle after their kind, and every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth after his kind, and every fowl after his kind, every bird of every sort. 
And they went in unto Noah into the ark, two and two of all flesh, wherei
555,hat dwellest in the clefts of the rock, that holdest the height of the hill: though thou shouldest make thy nest as high as the eagle, I will bring thee down from thence, saith the LORD. 
Also Edom shall be a desolation: every one that goeth by it shall be astonished, and shall hiss at all the plagues thereof. 
As in the overthrow of Sodom and Gomorrah and the neighbour cities thereof, saith the LORD, no man shall abide there, neither shall a son of man dwell in it. 
Behold, he shall come up like a lion from the swelling of Jordan against the habita
483,he lamps thereof, that they may give light over against it. 
And the tongs thereof, and the snuffdishes thereof, shall be of pure gold. 
Of a talent of pure gold shall he make it, with all these vessels. 
And look that thou make them after their pattern, which was shewed thee in the mount. 
Moreover thou shalt make the tabernacle with ten curtains of fine twined linen, and blue, and purple, and scarlet: with cherubims of cunning work shalt thou make them. 
The length of one curt
470,e them one from another, as a shepherd divideth his sheep from the goats: 
And he shall set the sheep on his right hand, but the goats on the left. 
Then shall the King say unto them on his right hand, Come, ye blessed of my Father, inherit the kingdom prepared for you from the foundation of the world: 
For I was an hungred, and ye gave me meat: I was thirsty, and ye gave me drink: I was a stranger, and ye took me in: 
Naked, and ye clothed me: I was sick, and ye vi
470,f his household? 
Fear them not therefore: for there is nothing covered, that shall not be revealed; and hid, that shall not be known. 
What I tell you in darkness, that speak ye in light: and what ye hear in the ear, that preach ye upon the housetops. 
And fear not them which kill the body, but are not able to kill the soul: but rather fear him which is able to destroy both soul and body in hell. 
Are not two sparrows sold for a farthing? and one of them shall not 
403, city on the east side two thousand cubits, and on the south side two thousand cubits, and on the west side two thousand cubits, and on the north side two thousand cubits; and the city shall be in the midst: this shall be to them the suburbs of the cities. 
And among the cities which ye shall give unto the Levites there shall be six cities for refuge, which ye shall appoint for the manslayer, that he
511,d, and every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth after his kind, and every fowl after his kind, every bird of every sort. 
And they went in unto Noah into the ark, two and two of all flesh, wherein is the breath of life. 
And they that went in, went in male and female of all flesh, as God had commanded him: and the LORD shut him in. 
And the flood was forty days upon the earth; and the waters increased, and bare up the ark, and it was lift up above the earth. 
And the waters prevailed, and were inc
447,LORD had spoken unto the house of Israel; all came to pass. 
Then Joshua called the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and the half tribe of Manasseh, 
And said unto them, Ye have kept all that Moses the servant of the LORD commanded you, and have obeyed my voice in all that I commanded you: 
Ye have not left your brethren these many days unto this day, but have kept the charge of the commandment of the LORD your God. 
And now the LORD your God hath
556,of them, commanded the soldiers to go down, and to take him by force from among them, and to bring him into the castle. 
And the night following the Lord stood by him, and said, Be of good cheer, Paul: for as thou hast testified of me in Jerusalem, so must thou bear witness also at Rome. 
And when it was day, certain of the Jews banded together, and bound themselves under a curse, saying that they would neither eat nor drink till they had killed Paul. 
And they were more than forty which had made this conspiracy. 
And they came to the chief priests a
532,the king, and after certain days obtained I leave of the king: 
And I came to Jerusalem, and understood of the evil that Eliashib did for Tobiah, in preparing him a chamber in the courts of the house of God. 
And it grieved me sore: therefore I cast forth all the household stuff to Tobiah out of the chamber. 
Then I commanded, and they cleansed the chambers: and thither brought I again the vessels of the house of God, with the meat offering and the frankincense. 
And I perceived that the portions of the Levites had not been gi
531,; for every shepherd is an abomination unto the Egyptians. 
Then Joseph came and told Pharaoh, and said, My father and my brethren, and their flocks, and their herds, and all that they have, are come out of the land of Canaan; and, behold, they are in the land of Goshen. 
And he took some of his brethren, even five men, and presented them unto Pharaoh. 
And Pharaoh said unto his brethren, What is your occupation? And they said unto Pharaoh, Thy servants are shepherds, both we, and also our fathers. 
They said morever unto Pha
467,d he that is for David, let him go after Joab. 
And Amasa wallowed in blood in the midst of the highway. And when the man saw that all the people stood still, he removed Amasa out of the highway into the field, and cast a cloth upon him, when he saw that every one that came by him stood still. 
When he was removed out of the highway, all the people went on after Joab, to pursue after Sheba the son of Bichri. 
And he went through all the tribes of Israel unto Abel
540, people, and they said, Why have we done this, that we have let Israel go from serving us? 
And he made ready his chariot, and took his people with him: 
And he took six hundred chosen chariots, and all the chariots of Egypt, and captains over every one of them. 
And the LORD hardened the heart of Pharaoh king of Egypt, and he pursued after the children of Israel: and the children of Israel went out with an high hand. 
But the Egyptians pursued after them, all the horses and chariots of Pharaoh, and his horsemen, and his army, and ove
533,n: but be of good cheer; I have overcome the world. 
These words spake Jesus, and lifted up his eyes to heaven, and said, Father, the hour is come; glorify thy Son, that thy Son also may glorify thee: 
As thou hast given him power over all flesh, that he should give eternal life to as many as thou hast given him. 
And this is life eternal, that they might know thee the only true God, and Jesus Christ, whom thou hast sent. 
I have glorified thee on the earth: I have finished the work which thou gavest me to do. 
And now, O Fathe
425,ourers, whose names are in the book of life. 
Rejoice in the Lord alway: and again I say, Rejoice. 
Let your moderation be known unto all men. The Lord is at hand. 
Be careful for nothing; but in every thing by prayer and supplication with thanksgiving let your requests be made known unto God. 
And the peace of God, which passeth all understanding, shall keep your hearts and minds through Christ Jesus. 
Finally, brethren,
518,alt have a place also without the camp, whither thou shalt go forth abroad: 
And thou shalt have a paddle upon thy weapon; and it shall be, when thou wilt ease thyself abroad, thou shalt dig therewith, and shalt turn back and cover that which cometh from thee: 
For the LORD thy God walketh in the midst of thy camp, to deliver thee, and to give up thine enemies before thee; therefore shall thy camp be holy: that he see no unclean thing in thee, and turn away from thee. 
Thou shalt not deliver unto his master the s
467, the blessing, even life for evermore. 
Behold, bless ye the LORD, all ye servants of the LORD, which by night stand in the house of the LORD. 
Lift up your hands in the sanctuary, and bless the LORD. 
The LORD that made heaven and earth bless thee out of Zion. 
Praise ye the LORD. Praise ye the name of the LORD; praise him, O ye servants of the LORD. 
Ye that stand in the house of the LORD, in the courts of the house of our God. 
Praise the LORD; for the LORD is
473,d fifty years. 
And all the days of Noah were nine hundred and fifty years: and he died. 
Now these are the generations of the sons of Noah, Shem, Ham, and Japheth: and unto them were sons born after the flood. 
The sons of Japheth; Gomer, and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, and Tubal, and Meshech, and Tiras. 
And the sons of Gomer; Ashkenaz, and Riphath, and Togarmah. 
And the sons of Javan; Elishah, and Tarshish, Kittim, and Dodanim. 
By these were the isles of the Gent
440,h Christ crucified, unto the Jews a stumblingblock, and unto the Greeks foolishness; 
But unto them which are called, both Jews and Greeks, Christ the power of God, and the wisdom of God. 
Because the foolishness of God is wiser than men; and the weakness of God is stronger than men. 
For ye see your calling, brethren, how that not many wise men after the flesh, not many mighty, not many noble, are called: 
But God hath chosen the fooli
534,at wanteth understanding, she saith to him, 
Come, eat of my bread, and drink of the wine which I have mingled. 
Forsake the foolish, and live; and go in the way of understanding. 
He that reproveth a scorner getteth to himself shame: and he that rebuketh a wicked man getteth himself a blot. 
Reprove not a scorner, lest he hate thee: rebuke a wise man, and he will love thee. 
Give instruction to a wise man, and he will be yet wiser: teach a just man, and he will increase in learning. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of wis
455,lain of the daughter of my people! 
Oh that I had in the wilderness a lodging place of wayfaring men; that I might leave my people, and go from them! for they be all adulterers, an assembly of treacherous men. 
And they bend their tongues like their bow for lies: but they are not valiant for the truth upon the earth; for they proceed from evil to evil, and they know not me, saith the LORD. 
Take ye heed every one of his neighbour, and trust ye not in 
460, bitterly: therefore shall he leave his blood upon him, and his reproach shall his LORD return unto him. 
When Ephraim spake trembling, he exalted himself in Israel; but when he offended in Baal, he died. 
And now they sin more and more, and have made them molten images of their silver, and idols according to their own understanding, all of it the work of the craftsmen: they say of them, Let the men that sacrifice kiss the calves. 
Therefore they shall be 
582, for they shall not depart. 
For though ye had smitten the whole army of the Chaldeans that fight against you, and there remained but wounded men among them, yet should they rise up every man in his tent, and burn this city with fire. 
And it came to pass, that when the army of the Chaldeans was broken up from Jerusalem for fear of Pharaoh's army, 
Then Jeremiah went forth out of Jerusalem to go into the land of Benjamin, to separate himself thence in the midst of the people. 
And when he was in the gate of Benjamin, a captain of the ward was there, whose name was Irijah, the
532,offer of the sacrifice of the peace offering an offering made by fire unto the LORD; the fat that covereth the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards, 
And the two kidneys, and the fat that is on them, which is by the flanks, and the caul above the liver, with the kidneys, it shall he take away. 
And Aaron's sons shall burn it on the altar upon the burnt sacrifice, which is upon the wood that is on the fire: it is an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And if his offering for a sacrifice of peac
412,y him. 
Then Pilate said unto them, Why, what evil hath he done? And they cried out the more exceedingly, Crucify him. 
And so Pilate, willing to content the people, released Barabbas unto them, and delivered Jesus, when he had scourged him, to be crucified. 
And the soldiers led him away into the hall, called Praetorium; and they call together the whole band. 
And they clothed him with purple, and platted a 
575,o pass, when she pressed him daily with her words, and urged him, so that his soul was vexed unto death; 
That he told her all his heart, and said unto her, There hath not come a razor upon mine head; for I have been a Nazarite unto God from my mother's womb: if I be shaven, then my strength will go from me, and I shall become weak, and be like any other man. 
And when Delilah saw that he had told her all his heart, she sent and called for the lords of the Philistines, saying, Come up this once, for he hath shewed me all his heart. Then the lords of the Philistines cam
453, and the other wing was five cubits also, joining to the wing of the other cherub. 
The wings of these cherubims spread themselves forth twenty cubits: and they stood on their feet, and their faces were inward. 
And he made the vail of blue, and purple, and crimson, and fine linen, and wrought cherubims thereon. 
Also he made before the house two pillars of thirty and five cubits high, and the chapiter that was on the top of each of them was five cu
414,. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, I send thee to the children of Israel, to a rebellious nation that hath rebelled against me: they and their fathers have transgressed against me, even unto this very day. 
For they are impudent children and stiffhearted. I do send thee unto them; and thou shalt say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD. 
And they, whether they will hear, or whether they will forbear, (for they a
533, the LORD the words of this song in the day that the LORD had delivered him out of the hand of all his enemies, and out of the hand of Saul: 
And he said, The LORD is my rock, and my fortress, and my deliverer; 
The God of my rock; in him will I trust: he is my shield, and the horn of my salvation, my high tower, and my refuge, my saviour; thou savest me from violence. 
I will call on the LORD, who is worthy to be praised: so shall I be saved from mine enemies. 
When the waves of death compassed me, the floods of ungodly men ma
528,ll command that they wash the thing wherein the plague is, and he shall shut it up seven days more: 
And the priest shall look on the plague, after that it is washed: and, behold, if the plague have not changed his colour, and the plague be not spread; it is unclean; thou shalt burn it in the fire; it is fret inward, whether it be bare within or without. 
And if the priest look, and, behold, the plague be somewhat dark after the washing of it; then he shall rend it out of the garment, or out of the skin, or out of the warp
427, out of Ephraim, to go home again: wherefore their anger was greatly kindled against Judah, and they returned home in great anger. 
And Amaziah strengthened himself, and led forth his people, and went to the valley of salt, and smote of the children of Seir ten thousand. 
And other ten thousand left alive did the children of Judah carry away captive, and brought them unto the top of the rock, and cast them down from the top
464,aying, 
Come up unto me, and help me, that we may smite Gibeon: for it hath made peace with Joshua and with the children of Israel. 
Therefore the five kings of the Amorites, the king of Jerusalem, the king of Hebron, the king of Jarmuth, the king of Lachish, the king of Eglon, gathered themselves together, and went up, they and all their hosts, and encamped before Gibeon, and made war against it. 
And the men of Gibeon sent unto Joshua to the camp to Gilgal, 
468,saw a publican, named Levi, sitting at the receipt of custom: and he said unto him, Follow me. 
And he left all, rose up, and followed him. 
And Levi made him a great feast in his own house: and there was a great company of publicans and of others that sat down with them. 
But their scribes and Pharisees murmured against his disciples, saying, Why do ye eat and drink with publicans and sinners? 
And Jesus answering said unto them, They that are whole need not a ph
596,ts; for the servant knoweth not what his lord doeth: but I have called you friends; for all things that I have heard of my Father I have made known unto you. 
Ye have not chosen me, but I have chosen you, and ordained you, that ye should go and bring forth fruit, and that your fruit should remain: that whatsoever ye shall ask of the Father in my name, he may give it you. 
These things I command you, that ye love one another. 
If the world hate you, ye know that it hated me before it hated you. 
If ye were of the world, the world would love his own: but because ye are not of the world, but 
430,e LORD an hundred thousand talents of gold, and a thousand thousand talents of silver; and of brass and iron without weight; for it is in abundance: timber also and stone have I prepared; and thou mayest add thereto. 
Moreover there are workmen with thee in abundance, hewers and workers of stone and timber, and all manner of cunning men for every manner of work. 
Of the gold, the silver, and the brass, and the iron, there is n
518,nd they go down quick into the pit; then ye shall understand that these men have provoked the LORD. 
And it came to pass, as he had made an end of speaking all these words, that the ground clave asunder that was under them: 
And the earth opened her mouth, and swallowed them up, and their houses, and all the men that appertained unto Korah, and all their goods. 
They, and all that appertained to them, went down alive into the pit, and the earth closed upon them: and they perished from among the congregation. 
And
416,ed among your generations, that goeth unto the holy things, which the children of Israel hallow unto the LORD, having his uncleanness upon him, that soul shall be cut off from my presence: I am the LORD. 
What man soever of the seed of Aaron is a leper, or hath a running issue; he shall not eat of the holy things, until he be clean. And whoso toucheth any thing that is unclean by the dead, or a man whose seed goe
451,in ourselves to the LORD in a perpetual covenant that shall not be forgotten. 
My people hath been lost sheep: their shepherds have caused them to go astray, they have turned them away on the mountains: they have gone from mountain to hill, they have forgotten their restingplace. 
All that found them have devoured them: and their adversaries said, We offend not, because they have sinned against the LORD, the habitation of justice, even the LORD, t
586,ervant to thee, in serving thee six years: and the LORD thy God shall bless thee in all that thou doest. 
All the firstling males that come of thy herd and of thy flock thou shalt sanctify unto the LORD thy God: thou shalt do no work with the firstling of thy bullock, nor shear the firstling of thy sheep. 
Thou shalt eat it before the LORD thy God year by year in the place which the LORD shall choose, thou and thy household. 
And if there be any blemish therein, as if it be lame, or blind, or have any ill blemish, thou shalt not sacrifice it unto the LORD thy God. 
Thou shalt eat
434,and bring me him up, whom I shall name unto thee. 
And the woman said unto him, Behold, thou knowest what Saul hath done, how he hath cut off those that have familiar spirits, and the wizards, out of the land: wherefore then layest thou a snare for my life, to cause me to die? 
And Saul sware to her by the LORD, saying, As the LORD liveth, there shall no punishment happen to thee for this thing. 
Then said the woman, Whom shall I 
547,that I shall tell thee, 
And say, Hear ye the word of the LORD, O kings of Judah, and inhabitants of Jerusalem; Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will bring evil upon this place, the which whosoever heareth, his ears shall tingle. 
Because they have forsaken me, and have estranged this place, and have burned incense in it unto other gods, whom neither they nor their fathers have known, nor the kings of Judah, and have filled this place with the blood of innocents; 
They have built also the high places of Baal, to bur
490,d in the brim of the water, (for Jordan overfloweth all his banks all the time of harvest,) 
That the waters which came down from above stood and rose up upon an heap very far from the city Adam, that is beside Zaretan: and those that came down toward the sea of the plain, even the salt sea, failed, and were cut off: and the people passed over right against Jericho. 
And the priests that bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD stood firm on dry ground in the midst of Jordan, and all t
551, Lael. 
And the charge of the sons of Gershon in the tabernacle of the congregation shall be the tabernacle, and the tent, the covering thereof, and the hanging for the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, 
And the hangings of the court, and the curtain for the door of the court, which is by the tabernacle, and by the altar round about, and the cords of it for all the service thereof. 
And of Kohath was the family of the Amramites, and the family of the Izeharites, and the family of the Hebronites, and the family of the Uzzielites: these 
593,th thee, that they may be joined unto thee, and minister unto thee: but thou and thy sons with thee shall minister before the tabernacle of witness. 
And they shall keep thy charge, and the charge of all the tabernacle: only they shall not come nigh the vessels of the sanctuary and the altar, that neither they, nor ye also, die. 
And they shall be joined unto thee, and keep the charge of the tabernacle of the congregation, for all the service of the tabernacle: and a stranger shall not come nigh unto you. 
And ye shall keep the charge of the sanctuary, and the charge of the altar: that 
552,Zion, Let not thine hands be slack. 
The LORD thy God in the midst of thee is mighty; he will save, he will rejoice over thee with joy; he will rest in his love, he will joy over thee with singing. 
I will gather them that are sorrowful for the solemn assembly, who are of thee, to whom the reproach of it was a burden. 
Behold, at that time I will undo all that afflict thee: and I will save her that halteth, and gather her that was driven out; and I will get them praise and fame in every land where they have been put to shame. 
At that time will I
542,Then he measured the breadth from the forefront of the lower gate unto the forefront of the inner court without, an hundred cubits eastward and northward. 
And the gate of the outward court that looked toward the north, he measured the length thereof, and the breadth thereof. 
And the little chambers thereof were three on this side and three on that side; and the posts thereof and the arches thereof were after the measure of the first gate: the length thereof was fifty cubits, and the breadth five and twenty cubits. 
And their windows, 
467, you. 
Behold, I have divided unto you by lot these nations that remain, to be an inheritance for your tribes, from Jordan, with all the nations that I have cut off, even unto the great sea westward. 
And the LORD your God, he shall expel them from before you, and drive them from out of your sight; and ye shall possess their land, as the LORD your God hath promised unto you. 
Be ye therefore very courageous to keep and to do all that is written in the book of the
424,se enter into the kingdom of heaven. 
Ye have heard that it was said of them of old time, Thou shalt not kill; and whosoever shall kill shall be in danger of the judgment: 
But I say unto you, That whosoever is angry with his brother without a cause shall be in danger of the judgment: and whosoever shall say to his brother, Raca, shall be in danger of the council: but whosoever shall say, Thou fool, shall be in danger of
543,. 
And when he was demanded of the Pharisees, when the kingdom of God should come, he answered them and said, The kingdom of God cometh not with observation: 
Neither shall they say, Lo here! or, lo there! for, behold, the kingdom of God is within you. 
And he said unto the disciples, The days will come, when ye shall desire to see one of the days of the Son of man, and ye shall not see it. 
And they shall say to you, See here; or, see there: go not after them, nor follow them. 
For as the lightning, that lighteneth out of the one part u
544,et sins in the light of thy countenance. 
For all our days are passed away in thy wrath: we spend our years as a tale that is told. 
The days of our years are threescore years and ten; and if by reason of strength they be fourscore years, yet is their strength labour and sorrow; for it is soon cut off, and we fly away. 
Who knoweth the power of thine anger? even according to thy fear, so is thy wrath. 
So teach us to number our days, that we may apply our hearts unto wisdom. 
Return, O LORD, how long? and let it repent thee concerning thy
498, appearance of the one as the appearance of the other. 
The altar of wood was three cubits high, and the length thereof two cubits; and the corners thereof, and the length thereof, and the walls thereof, were of wood: and he said unto me, This is the table that is before the LORD. 
And the temple and the sanctuary had two doors. 
And the doors had two leaves apiece, two turning leaves; two leaves for the one door, and two leaves for the other door. 
And there were made on them, on the doors of
408, he is your brother;) 
If ye then have dealt truly and sincerely with Jerubbaal and with his house this day, then rejoice ye in Abimelech, and let him also rejoice in you: 
But if not, let fire come out from Abimelech, and devour the men of Shechem, and the house of Millo; and let fire come out from the men of Shechem, and from the house of Millo, and devour Abimelech. 
And Jotham ran away, and fled, and 
490,reth for ever: 
The sun to rule by day: for his mercy endureth for ever: 
The moon and stars to rule by night: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
To him that smote Egypt in their firstborn: for his mercy endureth for ever: 
And brought out Israel from among them: for his mercy endureth for ever: 
With a strong hand, and with a stretched out arm: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
To him which divided the Red sea into parts: for his mercy endureth for ever: 
And made Israel to pass throug
411,y; for the temple of God is holy, which temple ye are. 
Let no man deceive himself. If any man among you seemeth to be wise in this world, let him become a fool, that he may be wise. 
For the wisdom of this world is foolishness with God. For it is written, He taketh the wise in their own craftiness. 
And again, The Lord knoweth the thoughts of the wise, that they are vain. 
Therefore let no man glory in men.
592,ok out of the angel's hand, and ate it up; and it was in my mouth sweet as honey: and as soon as I had eaten it, my belly was bitter. 
And he said unto me, Thou must prophesy again before many peoples, and nations, and tongues, and kings. 
And there was given me a reed like unto a rod: and the angel stood, saying, Rise, and measure the temple of God, and the altar, and them that worship therein. 
But the court which is without the temple leave out, and measure it not; for it is given unto the Gentiles: and the holy city shall they tread under foot forty and two months. 
And I will give
423,that whereof it was full, when I shall smite all them that dwell therein, then shall they know that I am the LORD. 
This is the lamentation wherewith they shall lament her: the daughters of the nations shall lament her: they shall lament for her, even for Egypt, and for all her multitude, saith the Lord GOD. 
It came to pass also in the twelfth year, in the fifteenth day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto
555,eath is corrupt, my days are extinct, the graves are ready for me. 
Are there not mockers with me? and doth not mine eye continue in their provocation? 
Lay down now, put me in a surety with thee; who is he that will strike hands with me? 
For thou hast hid their heart from understanding: therefore shalt thou not exalt them. 
He that speaketh flattery to his friends, even the eyes of his children shall fail. 
He hath made me also a byword of the people; and aforetime I was as a tabret. 
Mine eye also is dim by reason of sorrow, and all my members ar
489,eek David; and David heard of it, and went down to the hold. 
The Philistines also came and spread themselves in the valley of Rephaim. 
And David enquired of the LORD, saying, Shall I go up to the Philistines? wilt thou deliver them into mine hand? And the LORD said unto David, Go up: for I will doubtless deliver the Philistines into thine hand. 
And David came to Baalperazim, and David smote them there, and said, The LORD hath broken forth upon mine enemies before me, as the breach 
569,oneth their hearts alike; he considereth all their works. 
There is no king saved by the multitude of an host: a mighty man is not delivered by much strength. 
An horse is a vain thing for safety: neither shall he deliver any by his great strength. 
Behold, the eye of the LORD is upon them that fear him, upon them that hope in his mercy; 
To deliver their soul from death, and to keep them alive in famine. 
Our soul waiteth for the LORD: he is our help and our shield. 
For our heart shall rejoice in him, because we have trusted in his holy name. 
Let thy mercy, O 
488,njamin, these cities, which are called by their names. 
And the residue of the families of the sons of Kohath had cities of their coasts out of the tribe of Ephraim. 
And they gave unto them, of the cities of refuge, Shechem in mount Ephraim with her suburbs; they gave also Gezer with her suburbs, 
And Jokmeam with her suburbs, and Bethhoron with her suburbs, 
And Aijalon with her suburbs, and Gathrimmon with her suburbs: 
And out of the half tribe of Manasseh; Aner with her suburbs,
502,two thousand chariots, and the king of Maachah and his people; who came and pitched before Medeba. And the children of Ammon gathered themselves together from their cities, and came to battle. 
And when David heard of it, he sent Joab, and all the host of the mighty men. 
And the children of Ammon came out, and put the battle in array before the gate of the city: and the kings that were come were by themselves in the field. 
Now when Joab saw that the battle was set against him before and behind, 
600,ss is great. 
Multitudes, multitudes in the valley of decision: for the day of the LORD is near in the valley of decision. 
The sun and the moon shall be darkened, and the stars shall withdraw their shining. 
The LORD also shall roar out of Zion, and utter his voice from Jerusalem; and the heavens and the earth shall shake: but the LORD will be the hope of his people, and the strength of the children of Israel. 
So shall ye know that I am the LORD your God dwelling in Zion, my holy mountain: then shall Jerusalem be holy, and there shall no strangers pass through her any more. 
And it shall com
435,rael again to his habitation, and he shall feed on Carmel and Bashan, and his soul shall be satisfied upon mount Ephraim and Gilead. 
In those days, and in that time, saith the LORD, the iniquity of Israel shall be sought for, and there shall be none; and the sins of Judah, and they shall not be found: for I will pardon them whom I reserve. 
Go up against the land of Merathaim, even against it, and against the inhabitants of Pekod:
404,hath taught you, ye shall abide in him. 
And now, little children, abide in him; that, when he shall appear, we may have confidence, and not be ashamed before him at his coming. 
If ye know that he is righteous, ye know that every one that doeth righteousness is born of him. 
Behold, what manner of love the Father hath bestowed upon us, that we should be called the sons of God: therefore the world kno
593,ee me, he speaketh vanity: his heart gathereth iniquity to itself; when he goeth abroad, he telleth it. 
All that hate me whisper together against me: against me do they devise my hurt. 
An evil disease, say they, cleaveth fast unto him: and now that he lieth he shall rise up no more. 
Yea, mine own familiar friend, in whom I trusted, which did eat of my bread, hath lifted up his heel against me. 
But thou, O LORD, be merciful unto me, and raise me up, that I may requite them. 
By this I know that thou favourest me, because mine enemy doth not triumph over me. 
And as for me, thou uphol
451,th unto me that is to be ruler in Israel; whose goings forth have been from of old, from everlasting. 
Therefore will he give them up, until the time that she which travaileth hath brought forth: then the remnant of his brethren shall return unto the children of Israel. 
And he shall stand and feed in the strength of the LORD, in the majesty of the name of the LORD his God; and they shall abide: for now shall he be great unto the ends of the earth
509,er bulwarks, consider her palaces; that ye may tell it to the generation following. 
For this God is our God for ever and ever: he will be our guide even unto death. 
Hear this, all ye people; give ear, all ye inhabitants of the world: 
Both low and high, rich and poor, together. 
My mouth shall speak of wisdom; and the meditation of my heart shall be of understanding. 
I will incline mine ear to a parable: I will open my dark saying upon the harp. 
Wherefore should I fear in the days of evil, when the i
505,them; and they shall tremble at every moment, every man for his own life, in the day of thy fall. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; The sword of the king of Babylon shall come upon thee. 
By the swords of the mighty will I cause thy multitude to fall, the terrible of the nations, all of them: and they shall spoil the pomp of Egypt, and all the multitude thereof shall be destroyed. 
I will destroy also all the beasts thereof from beside the great waters; neither shall the foot of man trouble them any more
468,people said unto Joshua, Nay; but we will serve the LORD. 
And Joshua said unto the people, Ye are witnesses against yourselves that ye have chosen you the LORD, to serve him. And they said, We are witnesses. 
Now therefore put away, said he, the strange gods which are among you, and incline your heart unto the LORD God of Israel. 
And the people said unto Joshua, The LORD our God will we serve, and his voice will we obey. 
So Joshua made a covenant with the peopl
425,her brother? and we told him according to the tenor of these words: could we certainly know that he would say, Bring your brother down? 
And Judah said unto Israel his father, Send the lad with me, and we will arise and go; that we may live, and not die, both we, and thou, and also our little ones. 
I will be surety for him; of my hand shalt thou require him: if I bring him not unto thee, and set him before thee, then let
462,very one that is proud in heart is an abomination to the LORD: though hand join in hand, he shall not be unpunished. 
By mercy and truth iniquity is purged: and by the fear of the LORD men depart from evil. 
When a man's ways please the LORD, he maketh even his enemies to be at peace with him. 
Better is a little with righteousness than great revenues without right. 
A man's heart deviseth his way: but the LORD directeth his steps. 
A divine sentence is in t
498,And of the children of Israel's half, thou shalt take one portion of fifty, of the persons, of the beeves, of the asses, and of the flocks, of all manner of beasts, and give them unto the Levites, which keep the charge of the tabernacle of the LORD. 
And Moses and Eleazar the priest did as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the booty, being the rest of the prey which the men of war had caught, was six hundred thousand and seventy thousand and five thousand sheep, 
And threescore and twelve thousan
512, king of Israel. And they turned aside to fight against him: and Jehoshaphat cried out. 
And it came to pass, when the captains of the chariots perceived that it was not the king of Israel, that they turned back from pursuing him. 
And a certain man drew a bow at a venture, and smote the king of Israel between the joints of the harness: wherefore he said unto the driver of his chariot, Turn thine hand, and carry me out of the host; for I am wounded. 
And the battle increased that day: and the king was staye
421,, namely, Gideon, according to all the goodness which he had shewed unto Israel. 
And Abimelech the son of Jerubbaal went to Shechem unto his mother's brethren, and communed with them, and with all the family of the house of his mother's father, saying, 
Speak, I pray you, in the ears of all the men of Shechem, Whether is better for you, either that all the sons of Jerubbaal, which are threescore and ten persons, reig
418,ubdued before them. 
And there remained among the children of Israel seven tribes, which had not yet received their inheritance. 
And Joshua said unto the children of Israel, How long are ye slack to go to possess the land, which the LORD God of your fathers hath given you? 
Give out from among you three men for each tribe: and I will send them, and they shall rise, and go through the land, and describe it accordin
501,ered him, I am as thou art, and my people as thy people; and we will be with thee in the war. 
And Jehoshaphat said unto the king of Israel, Enquire, I pray thee, at the word of the LORD to day. 
Therefore the king of Israel gathered together of prophets four hundred men, and said unto them, Shall we go to Ramothgilead to battle, or shall I forbear? And they said, Go up; for God will deliver it into the king's hand. 
But Jehoshaphat said, Is there not here a prophet of the LORD besides, that we m
490,on. But Benhadad was drinking himself drunk in the pavilions, he and the kings, the thirty and two kings that helped him. 
And the young men of the princes of the provinces went out first; and Benhadad sent out, and they told him, saying, There are men come out of Samaria. 
And he said, Whether they be come out for peace, take them alive; or whether they be come out for war, take them alive. 
So these young men of the princes of the provinces came out of the city, and the army which fo
590,l seasons, filling our hearts with food and gladness. 
And with these sayings scarce restrained they the people, that they had not done sacrifice unto them. 
And there came thither certain Jews from Antioch and Iconium, who persuaded the people, and having stoned Paul, drew him out of the city, supposing he had been dead. 
Howbeit, as the disciples stood round about him, he rose up, and came into the city: and the next day he departed with Barnabas to Derbe. 
And when they had preached the gospel to that city, and had taught many, they returned again to Lystra, and to Iconium, and An
424,mforted concerning Amnon, seeing he was dead. 
Now Joab the son of Zeruiah perceived that the king's heart was toward Absalom. 
And Joab sent to Tekoah, and fetched thence a wise woman, and said unto her, I pray thee, feign thyself to be a mourner, and put on now mourning apparel, and anoint not thyself with oil, but be as a woman that had a long time mourned for the dead: 
And come to the king, and speak on this manner 
554,ther's house. 
And his name shall be called in Israel, The house of him that hath his shoe loosed. 
When men strive together one with another, and the wife of the one draweth near for to deliver her husband out of the hand of him that smiteth him, and putteth forth her hand, and taketh him by the secrets: 
Then thou shalt cut off her hand, thine eye shall not pity her. 
Thou shalt not have in thy bag divers weights, a great and a small. 
Thou shalt not have in thine house divers measures, a great and a small. 
But thou shalt have a perfect and just
491,my commandments and my laws? 
See, for that the LORD hath given you the sabbath, therefore he giveth you on the sixth day the bread of two days; abide ye every man in his place, let no man go out of his place on the seventh day. 
So the people rested on the seventh day. 
And the house of Israel called the name thereof Manna: and it was like coriander seed, white; and the taste of it was like wafers made with honey. 
And Moses said, This is the thing which the LORD commandeth, Fill an om
457,te without man and without beast, even in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem, that are desolate, without man, and without inhabitant, and without beast, 
The voice of joy, and the voice of gladness, the voice of the bridegroom, and the voice of the bride, the voice of them that shall say, Praise the LORD of hosts: for the LORD is good; for his mercy endureth for ever: and of them that shall bring the sacrifice of praise into the house 
564,eath: nevertheless Samuel mourned for Saul: and the LORD repented that he had made Saul king over Israel. 
And the LORD said unto Samuel, How long wilt thou mourn for Saul, seeing I have rejected him from reigning over Israel? fill thine horn with oil, and go, I will send thee to Jesse the Bethlehemite: for I have provided me a king among his sons. 
And Samuel said, How can I go? if Saul hear it, he will kill me. And the LORD said, Take an heifer with thee, and say, I am come to sacrifice to the LORD. 
And call Jesse to the sacrifice, and I will shew thee wh
549,de with hands; 
Neither is worshipped with men's hands, as though he needed any thing, seeing he giveth to all life, and breath, and all things; 
And hath made of one blood all nations of men for to dwell on all the face of the earth, and hath determined the times before appointed, and the bounds of their habitation; 
That they should seek the Lord, if haply they might feel after him, and find him, though he be not far from every one of us: 
For in him we live, and move, and have our being; as certain also of your own poets have said, For we a
580,ing thee down from thence, saith the LORD. 
Also Edom shall be a desolation: every one that goeth by it shall be astonished, and shall hiss at all the plagues thereof. 
As in the overthrow of Sodom and Gomorrah and the neighbour cities thereof, saith the LORD, no man shall abide there, neither shall a son of man dwell in it. 
Behold, he shall come up like a lion from the swelling of Jordan against the habitation of the strong: but I will suddenly make him run away from her: and who is a chosen man, that I may appoint over her? for who is like me? and who will appoint me the
591,ld your peace. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Wherefore criest thou unto me? speak unto the children of Israel, that they go forward: 
But lift thou up thy rod, and stretch out thine hand over the sea, and divide it: and the children of Israel shall go on dry ground through the midst of the sea. 
And I, behold, I will harden the hearts of the Egyptians, and they shall follow them: and I will get me honour upon Pharaoh, and upon all his host, upon his chariots, and upon his horsemen. 
And the Egyptians shall know that I am the LORD, when I have gotten me honour upon Pharaoh, upon his c
573,be done. 
And Hamor communed with them, saying, The soul of my son Shechem longeth for your daughter: I pray you give her him to wife. 
And make ye marriages with us, and give your daughters unto us, and take our daughters unto you. 
And ye shall dwell with us: and the land shall be before you; dwell and trade ye therein, and get you possessions therein. 
And Shechem said unto her father and unto her brethren, Let me find grace in your eyes, and what ye shall say unto me I will give. 
Ask me never so much dowry and gift, and I will give according as ye shall say unto
509,will not give to any of them of the flesh of his children whom he shall eat: because he hath nothing left him in the siege, and in the straitness, wherewith thine enemies shall distress thee in all thy gates. 
The tender and delicate woman among you, which would not adventure to set the sole of her foot upon the ground for delicateness and tenderness, her eye shall be evil toward the husband of her bosom, and toward her son, and toward her daughter, 
And toward her young one that cometh out from between 
475,thou shalt be clear from this my oath: only bring not my son thither again. 
And the servant put his hand under the thigh of Abraham his master, and sware to him concerning that matter. 
And the servant took ten camels of the camels of his master, and departed; for all the goods of his master were in his hand: and he arose, and went to Mesopotamia, unto the city of Nahor. 
And he made his camels to kneel down without the city by a well of water at the time of the evening
465,ruth, and sell it not; also wisdom, and instruction, and understanding. 
The father of the righteous shall greatly rejoice: and he that begetteth a wise child shall have joy of him. 
Thy father and thy mother shall be glad, and she that bare thee shall rejoice. 
My son, give me thine heart, and let thine eyes observe my ways. 
For a whore is a deep ditch; and a strange woman is a narrow pit. 
She also lieth in wait as for a prey, and increaseth the transgressor
590,'s sons that were slain, and put him and his nurse in a bedchamber. So Jehoshabeath, the daughter of king Jehoram, the wife of Jehoiada the priest, (for she was the sister of Ahaziah,) hid him from Athaliah, so that she slew him not. 
And he was with them hid in the house of God six years: and Athaliah reigned over the land. 
And in the seventh year Jehoiada strengthened himself, and took the captains of hundreds, Azariah the son of Jeroham, and Ishmael the son of Jehohanan, and Azariah the son of Obed, and Maaseiah the son of Adaiah, and Elishaphat the son of Zichri, into covenant w
514,d and said, Jesus I know, and Paul I know; but who are ye? 
And the man in whom the evil spirit was leaped on them, and overcame them, and prevailed against them, so that they fled out of that house naked and wounded. 
And this was known to all the Jews and Greeks also dwelling at Ephesus; and fear fell on them all, and the name of the Lord Jesus was magnified. 
And many that believed came, and confessed, and shewed their deeds. 
Many of them also which used curious arts brought their books together, and burn
566,tains of Judah and caused the inhabitants of Jerusalem to commit fornication, and compelled Judah thereto. 
And there came a writing to him from Elijah the prophet, saying, Thus saith the LORD God of David thy father, Because thou hast not walked in the ways of Jehoshaphat thy father, nor in the ways of Asa king of Judah, 
But hast walked in the way of the kings of Israel, and hast made Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem to go a whoring, like to the whoredoms of the house of Ahab, and also hast slain thy brethren of thy father's house, which were better th
505,t of thine own heart. 
For they all made us afraid, saying, Their hands shall be weakened from the work, that it be not done. Now therefore, O God, strengthen my hands. 
Afterward I came unto the house of Shemaiah the son of Delaiah the son of Mehetabeel, who was shut up; and he said, Let us meet together in the house of God, within the temple, and let us shut the doors of the temple: for they will come to slay thee; yea, in the night will they come to slay thee. 
And I said, Should such a man as I f
496,ld kill him. 
And Cain went out from the presence of the LORD, and dwelt in the land of Nod, on the east of Eden. 
And Cain knew his wife; and she conceived, and bare Enoch: and he builded a city, and called the name of the city, after the name of his son, Enoch. 
And unto Enoch was born Irad: and Irad begat Mehujael: and Mehujael begat Methusael: and Methusael begat Lamech. 
And Lamech took unto him two wives: the name of the one was Adah, and the name of the other Zillah. 
And Adah bare Ja
557,ing said unto them, Render to Caesar the things that are Caesar's, and to God the things that are God's. And they marvelled at him. 
Then come unto him the Sadducees, which say there is no resurrection; and they asked him, saying, 
Master, Moses wrote unto us, If a man's brother die, and leave his wife behind him, and leave no children, that his brother should take his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
Now there were seven brethren: and the first took a wife, and dying left no seed. 
And the second took her, and died, neither left he any seed
412,mascus in the name of Jesus. 
And he was with them coming in and going out at Jerusalem. 
And he spake boldly in the name of the Lord Jesus, and disputed against the Grecians: but they went about to slay him. 
Which when the brethren knew, they brought him down to Caesarea, and sent him forth to Tarsus. 
Then had the churches rest throughout all Judaea and Galilee and Samaria, and were edified; and walking in
536, such an high priest, who is set on the right hand of the throne of the Majesty in the heavens; 
A minister of the sanctuary, and of the true tabernacle, which the Lord pitched, and not man. 
For every high priest is ordained to offer gifts and sacrifices: wherefore it is of necessity that this man have somewhat also to offer. 
For if he were on earth, he should not be a priest, seeing that there are priests that offer gifts according to the law: 
Who serve unto the example and shadow of heavenly things, as Moses was admonished of
426,ll be chased away as a vision of the night. 
The eye also which saw him shall see him no more; neither shall his place any more behold him. 
His children shall seek to please the poor, and his hands shall restore their goods. 
His bones are full of the sin of his youth, which shall lie down with him in the dust. 
Though wickedness be sweet in his mouth, though he hide it under his tongue; 
Though he spare it, and forsake i
507,ah were nine hundred sixty and nine years: and he died. 
And Lamech lived an hundred eighty and two years, and begat a son: 
And he called his name Noah, saying, This same shall comfort us concerning our work and toil of our hands, because of the ground which the LORD hath cursed. 
And Lamech lived after he begat Noah five hundred ninety and five years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Lamech were seven hundred seventy and seven years: and he died. 
And Noah was five hundred years old
408,aled them: 
Insomuch that the multitude wondered, when they saw the dumb to speak, the maimed to be whole, the lame to walk, and the blind to see: and they glorified the God of Israel. 
Then Jesus called his disciples unto him, and said, I have compassion on the multitude, because they continue with me now three days, and have nothing to eat: and I will not send them away fasting, lest they faint in the w
548,d and bad: for who is able to judge this thy so great a people? 
And the speech pleased the LORD, that Solomon had asked this thing. 
And God said unto him, Because thou hast asked this thing, and hast not asked for thyself long life; neither hast asked riches for thyself, nor hast asked the life of thine enemies; but hast asked for thyself understanding to discern judgment; 
Behold, I have done according to thy words: lo, I have given thee a wise and an understanding heart; so that there was none like thee before thee, neither after thee sha
536,ch we have heard of him, and declare unto you, that God is light, and in him is no darkness at all. 
If we say that we have fellowship with him, and walk in darkness, we lie, and do not the truth: 
But if we walk in the light, as he is in the light, we have fellowship one with another, and the blood of Jesus Christ his Son cleanseth us from all sin. 
If we say that we have no sin, we deceive ourselves, and the truth is not in us. 
If we confess our sins, he is faithful and just to forgive us our sins, and to cleanse us from all un
566,tention was so sharp between them, that they departed asunder one from the other: and so Barnabas took Mark, and sailed unto Cyprus; 
And Paul chose Silas, and departed, being recommended by the brethren unto the grace of God. 
And he went through Syria and Cilicia, confirming the churches. 
Then came he to Derbe and Lystra: and, behold, a certain disciple was there, named Timotheus, the son of a certain woman, which was a Jewess, and believed; but his father was a Greek: 
Which was well reported of by the brethren that were at Lystra and Iconium. 
Him would P
586, not come to him: and when he sent again the second time, he would not come. 
Therefore he said unto his servants, See, Joab's field is near mine, and he hath barley there; go and set it on fire. And Absalom's servants set the field on fire. 
Then Joab arose, and came to Absalom unto his house, and said unto him, Wherefore have thy servants set my field on fire? 
And Absalom answered Joab, Behold, I sent unto thee, saying, Come hither, that I may send thee to the king, to say, Wherefore am I come from Geshur? it had been good for me to have been there still: now therefore let me 
555,nesses. 
Them that sin rebuke before all, that others also may fear. 
I charge thee before God, and the Lord Jesus Christ, and the elect angels, that thou observe these things without preferring one before another, doing nothing by partiality. 
Lay hands suddenly on no man, neither be partaker of other men's sins: keep thyself pure. 
Drink no longer water, but use a little wine for thy stomach's sake and thine often infirmities. 
Some men's sins are open beforehand, going before to judgment; and some men they follow after. 
Likewise also the good wo
496,O ye dry bones, hear the word of the LORD. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD unto these bones; Behold, I will cause breath to enter into you, and ye shall live: 
And I will lay sinews upon you, and will bring up flesh upon you, and cover you with skin, and put breath in you, and ye shall live; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
So I prophesied as I was commanded: and as I prophesied, there was a noise, and behold a shaking, and the bones came together, bone to his bone. 
And when I beheld, lo, th
555,rd, lamentation, and weeping, and great mourning, Rachel weeping for her children, and would not be comforted, because they are not. 
But when Herod was dead, behold, an angel of the Lord appeareth in a dream to Joseph in Egypt, 
Saying, Arise, and take the young child and his mother, and go into the land of Israel: for they are dead which sought the young child's life. 
And he arose, and took the young child and his mother, and came into the land of Israel. 
But when he heard that Archelaus did reign in Judaea in the room of his father Herod, he wa
521,m that make peace. 
From whence come wars and fightings among you? come they not hence, even of your lusts that war in your members? 
Ye lust, and have not: ye kill, and desire to have, and cannot obtain: ye fight and war, yet ye have not, because ye ask not. 
Ye ask, and receive not, because ye ask amiss, that ye may consume it upon your lusts. 
Ye adulterers and adulteresses, know ye not that the friendship of the world is enmity with God? whosoever therefore will be a friend of the world is the enemy of God. 
Do 
552,he earth; 
Like as a lion that is greedy of his prey, and as it were a young lion lurking in secret places. 
Arise, O LORD, disappoint him, cast him down: deliver my soul from the wicked, which is thy sword: 
From men which are thy hand, O LORD, from men of the world, which have their portion in this life, and whose belly thou fillest with thy hid treasure: they are full of children, and leave the rest of their substance to their babes. 
As for me, I will behold thy face in righteousness: I shall be satisfied, when I awake, with thy likeness. 
I 
417,to eat? for it was well with us in Egypt: therefore the LORD will give you flesh, and ye shall eat. 
Ye shall not eat one day, nor two days, nor five days, neither ten days, nor twenty days; 
But even a whole month, until it come out at your nostrils, and it be loathsome unto you: because that ye have despised the LORD which is among you, and have wept before him, saying, Why came we forth out of Egypt? 
And Moses
503,mrod in the entrances thereof: thus shall he deliver us from the Assyrian, when he cometh into our land, and when he treadeth within our borders. 
And the remnant of Jacob shall be in the midst of many people as a dew from the LORD, as the showers upon the grass, that tarrieth not for man, nor waiteth for the sons of men. 
And the remnant of Jacob shall be among the Gentiles in the midst of many people as a lion among the beasts of the forest, as a young lion among the flocks of sheep: who, if he g
572,gdoms, to pour upon them mine indignation, even all my fierce anger: for all the earth shall be devoured with the fire of my jealousy. 
For then will I turn to the people a pure language, that they may all call upon the name of the LORD, to serve him with one consent. 
From beyond the rivers of Ethiopia my suppliants, even the daughter of my dispersed, shall bring mine offering. 
In that day shalt thou not be ashamed for all thy doings, wherein thou hast transgressed against me: for then I will take away out of the midst of thee them that rejoice in thy pride, and t
505,of the apostles and elders which were at Jerusalem. 
And so were the churches established in the faith, and increased in number daily. 
Now when they had gone throughout Phrygia and the region of Galatia, and were forbidden of the Holy Ghost to preach the word in Asia, 
After they were come to Mysia, they assayed to go into Bithynia: but the Spirit suffered them not. 
And they passing by Mysia came down to Troas. 
And a vision appeared to Paul in the night; There stood a man of Macedonia, and prayed 
424,l his name Mahershalalhashbaz. 
For before the child shall have knowledge to cry, My father, and my mother, the riches of Damascus and the spoil of Samaria shall be taken away before the king of Assyria. 
The LORD spake also unto me again, saying, 
Forasmuch as this people refuseth the waters of Shiloah that go softly, and rejoice in Rezin and Remaliah's son; 
Now therefore, behold, the Lord bringeth up upon them the wat
403,r fire; and cried with a loud cry to him that had the sharp sickle, saying, Thrust in thy sharp sickle, and gather the clusters of the vine of the earth; for her grapes are fully ripe. 
And the angel thrust in his sickle into the earth, and gathered the vine of the earth, and cast it into the great winepress of the wrath of God. 
And the winepress was trodden without the city, and blood came out of t
459,ced his sister Tamar. 
And it came to pass after two full years, that Absalom had sheepshearers in Baalhazor, which is beside Ephraim: and Absalom invited all the king's sons. 
And Absalom came to the king, and said, Behold now, thy servant hath sheepshearers; let the king, I beseech thee, and his servants go with thy servant. 
And the king said to Absalom, Nay, my son, let us not all now go, lest we be chargeable unto thee. And he pressed him: howbeit he
564,border was Helkath, and Hali, and Beten, and Achshaph, 
And Alammelech, and Amad, and Misheal; and reacheth to Carmel westward, and to Shihorlibnath; 
And turneth toward the sunrising to Bethdagon, and reacheth to Zebulun, and to the valley of Jiphthahel toward the north side of Bethemek, and Neiel, and goeth out to Cabul on the left hand, 
And Hebron, and Rehob, and Hammon, and Kanah, even unto great Zidon; 
And then the coast turneth to Ramah, and to the strong city Tyre; and the coast turneth to Hosah; and the outgoings thereof are at the sea from the coa
406,e seek, and thither thou shalt come: 
And thither ye shall bring your burnt offerings, and your sacrifices, and your tithes, and heave offerings of your hand, and your vows, and your freewill offerings, and the firstlings of your herds and of your flocks: 
And there ye shall eat before the LORD your God, and ye shall rejoice in all that ye put your hand unto, ye and your households, wherein the LORD thy
506,to go into the land of Benjamin, to separate himself thence in the midst of the people. 
And when he was in the gate of Benjamin, a captain of the ward was there, whose name was Irijah, the son of Shelemiah, the son of Hananiah; and he took Jeremiah the prophet, saying, Thou fallest away to the Chaldeans. 
Then said Jeremiah, It is false; I fall not away to the Chaldeans. But he hearkened not to him: so Irijah took Jeremiah, and brought him to the princes. 
Wherefore the princes were wroth with Jeremi
459,e whom Jesus loved saith unto Peter, It is the Lord. Now when Simon Peter heard that it was the Lord, he girt his fisher's coat unto him, (for he was naked,) and did cast himself into the sea. 
And the other disciples came in a little ship; (for they were not far from land, but as it were two hundred cubits,) dragging the net with fishes. 
As soon then as they were come to land, they saw a fire of coals there, and fish laid thereon, and bread. 
Jesus sait
418,punishments upon the people; 
To bind their kings with chains, and their nobles with fetters of iron; 
To execute upon them the judgment written: this honour have all his saints. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD. Praise God in his sanctuary: praise him in the firmament of his power. 
Praise him for his mighty acts: praise him according to his excellent greatness. 
Praise him with the sound of the trumpet: pr
479,ce. 
And the priest shall bring her near, and set her before the LORD: 
And the priest shall take holy water in an earthen vessel; and of the dust that is in the floor of the tabernacle the priest shall take, and put it into the water: 
And the priest shall set the woman before the LORD, and uncover the woman's head, and put the offering of memorial in her hands, which is the jealousy offering: and the priest shall have in his hand the bitter water that causeth the curse: 
A
516,side, and the face of a young lion toward the palm tree on the other side: it was made through all the house round about. 
From the ground unto above the door were cherubims and palm trees made, and on the wall of the temple. 
The posts of the temple were squared, and the face of the sanctuary; the appearance of the one as the appearance of the other. 
The altar of wood was three cubits high, and the length thereof two cubits; and the corners thereof, and the length thereof, and the walls thereof, were of wood:
533,ody of Jesus. 
And Pilate marvelled if he were already dead: and calling unto him the centurion, he asked him whether he had been any while dead. 
And when he knew it of the centurion, he gave the body to Joseph. 
And he bought fine linen, and took him down, and wrapped him in the linen, and laid him in a sepulchre which was hewn out of a rock, and rolled a stone unto the door of the sepulchre. 
And Mary Magdalene and Mary the mother of Joses beheld where he was laid. 
And when the sabbath was past, Mary Magdalene, and Mary the
467,threescore and seven priests' garments. 
So the priests, and the Levites, and the porters, and the singers, and some of the people, and the Nethinims, and all Israel, dwelt in their cities; and when the seventh month came, the children of Israel were in their cities. 
And all the people gathered themselves together as one man into the street that was before the water gate; and they spake unto Ezra the scribe to bring the book of the law of Moses, which the LORD h
475,tion he looketh upon all the inhabitants of the earth. 
He fashioneth their hearts alike; he considereth all their works. 
There is no king saved by the multitude of an host: a mighty man is not delivered by much strength. 
An horse is a vain thing for safety: neither shall he deliver any by his great strength. 
Behold, the eye of the LORD is upon them that fear him, upon them that hope in his mercy; 
To deliver their soul from death, and to keep them alive in famine. 
O
480,urned not aside from any thing that he commanded him all the days of his life, save only in the matter of Uriah the Hittite. 
And there was war between Rehoboam and Jeroboam all the days of his life. 
Now the rest of the acts of Abijam, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah? And there was war between Abijam and Jeroboam. 
And Abijam slept with his fathers; and they buried him in the city of David: and Asa his son reigned
510,mer in her hand, and went softly unto him, and smote the nail into his temples, and fastened it into the ground: for he was fast asleep and weary. So he died. 
And, behold, as Barak pursued Sisera, Jael came out to meet him, and said unto him, Come, and I will shew thee the man whom thou seekest. And when he came into her tent, behold, Sisera lay dead, and the nail was in his temples. 
So God subdued on that day Jabin the king of Canaan before the children of Israel. 
And the hand of the children of Israe
445, the parable of the tares of the field. 
He answered and said unto them, He that soweth the good seed is the Son of man; 
The field is the world; the good seed are the children of the kingdom; but the tares are the children of the wicked one; 
The enemy that sowed them is the devil; the harvest is the end of the world; and the reapers are the angels. 
As therefore the tares are gathered and burned in the fire; so shall it be in the end of th
547,
The LORD bringeth the counsel of the heathen to nought: he maketh the devices of the people of none effect. 
The counsel of the LORD standeth for ever, the thoughts of his heart to all generations. 
Blessed is the nation whose God is the LORD; and the people whom he hath chosen for his own inheritance. 
The LORD looketh from heaven; he beholdeth all the sons of men. 
From the place of his habitation he looketh upon all the inhabitants of the earth. 
He fashioneth their hearts alike; he considereth all their works. 
There is no king saved by
516,halt be drawn away, and worship other gods, and serve them; 
I denounce unto you this day, that ye shall surely perish, and that ye shall not prolong your days upon the land, whither thou passest over Jordan to go to possess it. 
I call heaven and earth to record this day against you, that I have set before you life and death, blessing and cursing: therefore choose life, that both thou and thy seed may live: 
That thou mayest love the LORD thy God, and that thou mayest obey his voice, and that thou mayest cleav
500, also shall the Son of man be ashamed, when he cometh in the glory of his Father with the holy angels. 
And he said unto them, Verily I say unto you, That there be some of them that stand here, which shall not taste of death, till they have seen the kingdom of God come with power. 
And after six days Jesus taketh with him Peter, and James, and John, and leadeth them up into an high mountain apart by themselves: and he was transfigured before them. 
And his raiment became shining, exceeding white
500,ORD in the land of Hadrach, and Damascus shall be the rest thereof: when the eyes of man, as of all the tribes of Israel, shall be toward the LORD. 
And Hamath also shall border thereby; Tyrus, and Zidon, though it be very wise. 
And Tyrus did build herself a strong hold, and heaped up silver as the dust, and fine gold as the mire of the streets. 
Behold, the LORD will cast her out, and he will smite her power in the sea; and she shall be devoured with fire. 
Ashkelon shall see it, and fear; Gaz
508,f Tiberias; and on this wise shewed he himself. 
There were together Simon Peter, and Thomas called Didymus, and Nathanael of Cana in Galilee, and the sons of Zebedee, and two other of his disciples. 
Simon Peter saith unto them, I go a fishing. They say unto him, We also go with thee. They went forth, and entered into a ship immediately; and that night they caught nothing. 
But when the morning was now come, Jesus stood on the shore: but the disciples knew not that it was Jesus. 
Then Jesus saith unto 
549, and deliver them: he shall deliver them from the wicked, and save them, because they trust in him. 
O lord, rebuke me not in thy wrath: neither chasten me in thy hot displeasure. 
For thine arrows stick fast in me, and thy hand presseth me sore. 
There is no soundness in my flesh because of thine anger; neither is there any rest in my bones because of my sin. 
For mine iniquities are gone over mine head: as an heavy burden they are too heavy for me. 
My wounds stink and are corrupt because of my foolishness. 
I am troubled; I am bowed down gr
568,ayed there until now: 
And I have oxen, and asses, flocks, and menservants, and womenservants: and I have sent to tell my lord, that I may find grace in thy sight. 
And the messengers returned to Jacob, saying, We came to thy brother Esau, and also he cometh to meet thee, and four hundred men with him. 
Then Jacob was greatly afraid and distressed: and he divided the people that was with him, and the flocks, and herds, and the camels, into two bands; 
And said, If Esau come to the one company, and smite it, then the other company which is left shall escape. 
And
471, also bare a son, and called his name Benammi: the same is the father of the children of Ammon unto this day. 
And Abraham journeyed from thence toward the south country, and dwelled between Kadesh and Shur, and sojourned in Gerar. 
And Abraham said of Sarah his wife, She is my sister: and Abimelech king of Gerar sent, and took Sarah. 
But God came to Abimelech in a dream by night, and said to him, Behold, thou art but a dead man, for the woman which thou hast taken;
440,this city as Tophet: 
And the houses of Jerusalem, and the houses of the kings of Judah, shall be defiled as the place of Tophet, because of all the houses upon whose roofs they have burned incense unto all the host of heaven, and have poured out drink offerings unto other gods. 
Then came Jeremiah from Tophet, whither the LORD had sent him to prophesy; and he stood in the court of the LORD's house; and said to all the people, 
Thus sai
547, of Israel; Behold, I will bring upon this city and upon all her towns all the evil that I have pronounced against it, because they have hardened their necks, that they might not hear my words. 
Now Pashur the son of Immer the priest, who was also chief governor in the house of the LORD, heard that Jeremiah prophesied these things. 
Then Pashur smote Jeremiah the prophet, and put him in the stocks that were in the high gate of Benjamin, which was by the house of the LORD. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that Pashur brought forth Jeremiah
555,an ornament, and bind them on thee, as a bride doeth. 
For thy waste and thy desolate places, and the land of thy destruction, shall even now be too narrow by reason of the inhabitants, and they that swallowed thee up shall be far away. 
The children which thou shalt have, after thou hast lost the other, shall say again in thine ears, The place is too strait for me: give place to me that I may dwell. 
Then shalt thou say in thine heart, Who hath begotten me these, seeing I have lost my children, and am desolate, a captive, and removing to and fro? a
422,n be wakened, and come up to the valley of Jehoshaphat: for there will I sit to judge all the heathen round about. 
Put ye in the sickle, for the harvest is ripe: come, get you down; for the press is full, the fats overflow; for their wickedness is great. 
Multitudes, multitudes in the valley of decision: for the day of the LORD is near in the valley of decision. 
The sun and the moon shall be darkened, and the stars s
485,d acceptable, and perfect, will of God. 
For I say, through the grace given unto me, to every man that is among you, not to think of himself more highly than he ought to think; but to think soberly, according as God hath dealt to every man the measure of faith. 
For as we have many members in one body, and all members have not the same office: 
So we, being many, are one body in Christ, and every one members one of another. 
Having then gifts differing according to the grace that 
578,y man his maidservant, being an Hebrew or an Hebrewess, go free; that none should serve himself of them, to wit, of a Jew his brother. 
Now when all the princes, and all the people, which had entered into the covenant, heard that every one should let his manservant, and every one his maidservant, go free, that none should serve themselves of them any more, then they obeyed, and let them go. 
But afterward they turned, and caused the servants and the handmaids, whom they had let go free, to return, and brought them into subjection for servants and for handmaids. 
Therefore
487,nst her; from thence she shall be taken: their arrows shall be as of a mighty expert man; none shall return in vain. 
And Chaldea shall be a spoil: all that spoil her shall be satisfied, saith the LORD. 
Because ye were glad, because ye rejoiced, O ye destroyers of mine heritage, because ye are grown fat as the heifer at grass, and bellow as bulls; 
Your mother shall be sore confounded; she that bare you shall be ashamed: behold, the hindermost of the nations shall be a wilderness, 
478,t even to the greatest, 
And said unto them, Thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel, unto whom ye sent me to present your supplication before him; 
If ye will still abide in this land, then will I build you, and not pull you down, and I will plant you, and not pluck you up: for I repent me of the evil that I have done unto you. 
Be not afraid of the king of Babylon, of whom ye are afraid; be not afraid of him, saith the LORD: for I am with you to save you, and to deliver yo
571, when Paul had laid his hands upon them, the Holy Ghost came on them; and they spake with tongues, and prophesied. 
And all the men were about twelve. 
And he went into the synagogue, and spake boldly for the space of three months, disputing and persuading the things concerning the kingdom of God. 
But when divers were hardened, and believed not, but spake evil of that way before the multitude, he departed from them, and separated the disciples, disputing daily in the school of one Tyrannus. 
And this continued by the space of two years; so that all they which dwel
539,ough all, and in you all. 
But unto every one of us is given grace according to the measure of the gift of Christ. 
Wherefore he saith, When he ascended up on high, he led captivity captive, and gave gifts unto men. 
(Now that he ascended, what is it but that he also descended first into the lower parts of the earth? 
He that descended is the same also that ascended up far above all heavens, that he might fill all things.) 
And he gave some, apostles; and some, prophets; and some, evangelists; and some, pastors and teachers; 
For the
423,it. 
And his master said unto him, We will not turn aside hither into the city of a stranger, that is not of the children of Israel; we will pass over to Gibeah. 
And he said unto his servant, Come, and let us draw near to one of these places to lodge all night, in Gibeah, or in Ramah. 
And they passed on and went their way; and the sun went down upon them when they were by Gibeah, which belongeth to Benjamin. 
And they
477,w of Jacob's thigh in the sinew that shrank. 
And Jacob lifted up his eyes, and looked, and, behold, Esau came, and with him four hundred men. And he divided the children unto Leah, and unto Rachel, and unto the two handmaids. 
And he put the handmaids and their children foremost, and Leah and her children after, and Rachel and Joseph hindermost. 
And he passed over before them, and bowed himself to the ground seven times, until he came near to his brother. 
And Esau ran t
595,will persuade him, and secure you. 
So they took the money, and did as they were taught: and this saying is commonly reported among the Jews until this day. 
Then the eleven disciples went away into Galilee, into a mountain where Jesus had appointed them. 
And when they saw him, they worshipped him: but some doubted. 
And Jesus came and spake unto them, saying, All power is given unto me in heaven and in earth. 
Go ye therefore, and teach all nations, baptizing them in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Ghost: 
Teaching them to observe all things whatsoever I have com
448,is daughter to wife. 
And it came to pass, as she came unto him, that she moved him to ask of her father a field: and she lighted off her ass; and Caleb said unto her, What wouldest thou? 
Who answered, Give me a blessing; for thou hast given me a south land; give me also springs of water. And he gave her the upper springs, and the nether springs. 
This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Judah according to their families. 
And t
493,ive the vineyard to others. And when they heard it, they said, God forbid. 
And he beheld them, and said, What is this then that is written, The stone which the builders rejected, the same is become the head of the corner? 
Whosoever shall fall upon that stone shall be broken; but on whomsoever it shall fall, it will grind him to powder. 
And the chief priests and the scribes the same hour sought to lay hands on him; and they feared the people: for they perceived that he had spoken this p
559,nt to sit with me in my throne, even as I also overcame, and am set down with my Father in his throne. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches. 
After this I looked, and, behold, a door was opened in heaven: and the first voice which I heard was as it were of a trumpet talking with me; which said, Come up hither, and I will shew thee things which must be hereafter. 
And immediately I was in the spirit: and, behold, a throne was set in heaven, and one sat on the throne. 
And he that sat was to look upon like a jasper an
557,, and with his seed after him. 
And as for Ishmael, I have heard thee: Behold, I have blessed him, and will make him fruitful, and will multiply him exceedingly; twelve princes shall he beget, and I will make him a great nation. 
But my covenant will I establish with Isaac, which Sarah shall bear unto thee at this set time in the next year. 
And he left off talking with him, and God went up from Abraham. 
And Abraham took Ishmael his son, and all that were born in his house, and all that were bought with his money, every male among the men of Abraham'
405,my soul, thou hast trodden down strength. 
Then were the horsehoofs broken by the means of the pransings, the pransings of their mighty ones. 
Curse ye Meroz, said the angel of the LORD, curse ye bitterly the inhabitants thereof; because they came not to the help of the LORD, to the help of the LORD against the mighty. 
Blessed above women shall Jael the wife of Heber the Kenite be, blessed shall she b
419,forth their two wings over the place of the ark, and the cherubims covered the ark and the staves thereof above. 
And they drew out the staves, that the ends of the staves were seen out in the holy place before the oracle, and they were not seen without: and there they are unto this day. 
There was nothing in the ark save the two tables of stone, which Moses put there at Horeb, when the LORD made a covenant with the
442,s? if the LORD be God, follow him: but if Baal, then follow him. And the people answered him not a word. 
Then said Elijah unto the people, I, even I only, remain a prophet of the LORD; but Baal's prophets are four hundred and fifty men. 
Let them therefore give us two bullocks; and let them choose one bullock for themselves, and cut it in pieces, and lay it on wood, and put no fire under: and I will dress the other bullock, and lay it on
480,twenty. 
I smote you with blasting and with mildew and with hail in all the labours of your hands; yet ye turned not to me, saith the LORD. 
Consider now from this day and upward, from the four and twentieth day of the ninth month, even from the day that the foundation of the LORD's temple was laid, consider it. 
Is the seed yet in the barn? yea, as yet the vine, and the fig tree, and the pomegranate, and the olive tree, hath not brought forth: from this day will I bless you.
448,the covenant of thy God to be lacking from thy meat offering: with all thine offerings thou shalt offer salt. 
And if thou offer a meat offering of thy firstfruits unto the LORD, thou shalt offer for the meat offering of thy firstfruits green ears of corn dried by the fire, even corn beaten out of full ears. 
And thou shalt put oil upon it, and lay frankincense thereon: it is a meat offering. 
And the priest shall burn the memorial of it, part 
592,set in gold in their inclosings. 
And the stones shall be with the names of the children of Israel, twelve, according to their names, like the engravings of a signet; every one with his name shall they be according to the twelve tribes. 
And thou shalt make upon the breastplate chains at the ends of wreathen work of pure gold. 
And thou shalt make upon the breastplate two rings of gold, and shalt put the two rings on the two ends of the breastplate. 
And thou shalt put the two wreathen chains of gold in the two rings which are on the ends of the breastplate. 
And the other two ends of 
500,nah, even unto great Zidon; 
And then the coast turneth to Ramah, and to the strong city Tyre; and the coast turneth to Hosah; and the outgoings thereof are at the sea from the coast to Achzib: 
Ummah also, and Aphek, and Rehob: twenty and two cities with their villages. 
This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Asher according to their families, these cities with their villages. 
The sixth lot came out to the children of Naphtali, even for the children of Naphtali according to th
520,m thee, which thou shalt beget, shall they take away; and they shall be eunuchs in the palace of the king of Babylon. 
Then said Hezekiah to Isaiah, Good is the word of the LORD which thou hast spoken. He said moreover, For there shall be peace and truth in my days. 
Comfort ye, comfort ye my people, saith your God. 
Speak ye comfortably to Jerusalem, and cry unto her, that her warfare is accomplished, that her iniquity is pardoned: for she hath received of the LORD's hand double for all her sins. 
The voice of him
583,land: and there builded he an altar unto the LORD, who appeared unto him. 
And he removed from thence unto a mountain on the east of Bethel, and pitched his tent, having Bethel on the west, and Hai on the east: and there he builded an altar unto the LORD, and called upon the name of the LORD. 
And Abram journeyed, going on still toward the south. 
And there was a famine in the land: and Abram went down into Egypt to sojourn there; for the famine was grievous in the land. 
And it came to pass, when he was come near to enter into Egypt, that he said unto Sarai his wife, Behold n
426,ed Moses, all the days of his life. 
And the LORD spake unto Joshua, saying, 
Command the priests that bear the ark of the testimony, that they come up out of Jordan. 
Joshua therefore commanded the priests, saying, Come ye up out of Jordan. 
And it came to pass, when the priests that bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD were come up out of the midst of Jordan, and the soles of the priests' feet were lifted up unto the
574, by the sword; and he that remaineth and is besieged shall die by the famine: thus will I accomplish my fury upon them. 
Then shall ye know that I am the LORD, when their slain men shall be among their idols round about their altars, upon every high hill, in all the tops of the mountains, and under every green tree, and under every thick oak, the place where they did offer sweet savour to all their idols. 
So will I stretch out my hand upon them, and make the land desolate, yea, more desolate than the wilderness toward Diblath, in all their habitations: and they shall
585,ediately all the doors were opened, and every one's bands were loosed. 
And the keeper of the prison awaking out of his sleep, and seeing the prison doors open, he drew out his sword, and would have killed himself, supposing that the prisoners had been fled. 
But Paul cried with a loud voice, saying, Do thyself no harm: for we are all here. 
Then he called for a light, and sprang in, and came trembling, and fell down before Paul and Silas, 
And brought them out, and said, Sirs, what must I do to be saved? 
And they said, Believe on the Lord Jesus Christ, and thou shalt be saved,
483,eaten and be full; 
Then beware lest thou forget the LORD, which brought thee forth out of the land of Egypt, from the house of bondage. 
Thou shalt fear the LORD thy God, and serve him, and shalt swear by his name. 
Ye shall not go after other gods, of the gods of the people which are round about you; 
(For the LORD thy God is a jealous God among you) lest the anger of the LORD thy God be kindled against thee, and destroy thee from off the face of the earth. 
Ye shall not tempt
441, which he commanded you to perform, even ten commandments; and he wrote them upon two tables of stone. 
And the LORD commanded me at that time to teach you statutes and judgments, that ye might do them in the land whither ye go over to possess it. 
Take ye therefore good heed unto yourselves; for ye saw no manner of similitude on the day that the LORD spake unto you in Horeb out of the midst of the fire: 
Lest ye corrupt yourselves, and 
510, a bird of the air shall carry the voice, and that which hath wings shall tell the matter. 
Cast thy bread upon the waters: for thou shalt find it after many days. 
Give a portion to seven, and also to eight; for thou knowest not what evil shall be upon the earth. 
If the clouds be full of rain, they empty themselves upon the earth: and if the tree fall toward the south, or toward the north, in the place where the tree falleth, there it shall be. 
He that observeth the wind shall not sow; and he that rega
447,t, which are crushed before the moth? 
They are destroyed from morning to evening: they perish for ever without any regarding it. 
Doth not their excellency which is in them go away? they die, even without wisdom. 
Call now, if there be any that will answer thee; and to which of the saints wilt thou turn? 
For wrath killeth the foolish man, and envy slayeth the silly one. 
I have seen the foolish taking root: but suddenly I cursed his habitati
459,ays unto the LORD. 
On the first day shall be an holy convocation: ye shall do no servile work therein. 
Seven days ye shall offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD: on the eighth day shall be an holy convocation unto you; and ye shall offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD: it is a solemn assembly; and ye shall do no servile work therein. 
These are the feasts of the LORD, which ye shall proclaim to be holy convocations, to offer an offering m
493,d and man. 
Now in the fifteenth year of the reign of Tiberius Caesar, Pontius Pilate being governor of Judaea, and Herod being tetrarch of Galilee, and his brother Philip tetrarch of Ituraea and of the region of Trachonitis, and Lysanias the tetrarch of Abilene, 
Annas and Caiaphas being the high priests, the word of God came unto John the son of Zacharias in the wilderness. 
And he came into all the country about Jordan, preaching the baptism of repentance for the remission of sins; 
As
521,de it a molten calf: and they said, These be thy gods, O Israel, which brought thee up out of the land of Egypt. 
And when Aaron saw it, he built an altar before it; and Aaron made proclamation, and said, To morrow is a feast to the LORD. 
And they rose up early on the morrow, and offered burnt offerings, and brought peace offerings; and the people sat down to eat and to drink, and rose up to play. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Go, get thee down; for thy people, which thou broughtest out of the land of Egypt, have 
470, shall not make himself unclean for his father, or for his mother, for his brother, or for his sister, when they die: because the consecration of his God is upon his head. 
All the days of his separation he is holy unto the LORD. 
And if any man die very suddenly by him, and he hath defiled the head of his consecration; then he shall shave his head in the day of his cleansing, on the seventh day shall he shave it. 
And on the eighth day he shall bring two turtles, o
439,d ten thousand that bare burdens, and fourscore thousand hewers in the mountains; 
Beside the chief of Solomon's officers which were over the work, three thousand and three hundred, which ruled over the people that wrought in the work. 
And the king commanded, and they brought great stones, costly stones, and hewed stones, to lay the foundation of the house. 
And Solomon's builders and Hiram's builders did hew them, and the stonesquare
495,dren of Israel were gathered together to Mizpeh, the lords of the Philistines went up against Israel. And when the children of Israel heard it, they were afraid of the Philistines. 
And the children of Israel said to Samuel, Cease not to cry unto the LORD our God for us, that he will save us out of the hand of the Philistines. 
And Samuel took a sucking lamb, and offered it for a burnt offering wholly unto the LORD: and Samuel cried unto the LORD for Israel; and the LORD heard him. 
And as 
574,
And the pelican, and the gier eagle, and the cormorant, 
And the stork, and the heron after her kind, and the lapwing, and the bat. 
And every creeping thing that flieth is unclean unto you: they shall not be eaten. 
But of all clean fowls ye may eat. 
Ye shall not eat of anything that dieth of itself: thou shalt give it unto the stranger that is in thy gates, that he may eat it; or thou mayest sell it unto an alien: for thou art an holy people unto the LORD thy God. Thou shalt not seethe a kid in his mother's milk. 
Thou shalt truly tithe all the increase of thy see
477,as willingly offered. 
Also Cyrus the king brought forth the vessels of the house of the LORD, which Nebuchadnezzar had brought forth out of Jerusalem, and had put them in the house of his gods; 
Even those did Cyrus king of Persia bring forth by the hand of Mithredath the treasurer, and numbered them unto Sheshbazzar, the prince of Judah. 
And this is the number of them: thirty chargers of gold, a thousand chargers of silver, nine and twenty knives, 
Thirty basons of gold
457,o be porters: 
And Zadok the priest, and his brethren the priests, before the tabernacle of the LORD in the high place that was at Gibeon, 
To offer burnt offerings unto the LORD upon the altar of the burnt offering continually morning and evening, and to do according to all that is written in the law of the LORD, which he commanded Israel; 
And with them Heman and Jeduthun, and the rest that were chosen, who were expressed by name, to give thanks to th
515, in a book, that it may be for the time to come for ever and ever: 
That this is a rebellious people, lying children, children that will not hear the law of the LORD: 
Which say to the seers, See not; and to the prophets, Prophesy not unto us right things, speak unto us smooth things, prophesy deceits: 
Get you out of the way, turn aside out of the path, cause the Holy One of Israel to cease from before us. 
Wherefore thus saith the Holy One of Israel, Because ye despise this word, and trust in oppression and 
424,ter that he had said before, 
This is the covenant that I will make with them after those days, saith the Lord, I will put my laws into their hearts, and in their minds will I write them; 
And their sins and iniquities will I remember no more. 
Now where remission of these is, there is no more offering for sin. 
Having therefore, brethren, boldness to enter into the holiest by the blood of Jesus, 
By a new and living way
402,ss, but we walk in darkness. 
We grope for the wall like the blind, and we grope as if we had no eyes: we stumble at noon day as in the night; we are in desolate places as dead men. 
We roar all like bears, and mourn sore like doves: we look for judgment, but there is none; for salvation, but it is far off from us. 
For our transgressions are multiplied before thee, and our sins testify against us: 
427,nce of the law which they shall teach thee, and according to the judgment which they shall tell thee, thou shalt do: thou shalt not decline from the sentence which they shall shew thee, to the right hand, nor to the left. 
And the man that will do presumptuously, and will not hearken unto the priest that standeth to minister there before the LORD thy God, or unto the judge, even that man shall die: and thou shalt put away t
449,ce in the garden, and I was afraid, because I was naked; and I hid myself. 
And he said, Who told thee that thou wast naked? Hast thou eaten of the tree, whereof I commanded thee that thou shouldest not eat? 
And the man said, The woman whom thou gavest to be with me, she gave me of the tree, and I did eat. 
And the LORD God said unto the woman, What is this that thou hast done? And the woman said, The serpent beguiled me, and I did eat. 
And th
591,l of the house he made narrowed rests round about, that the beams should not be fastened in the walls of the house. 
And the house, when it was in building, was built of stone made ready before it was brought thither: so that there was neither hammer nor axe nor any tool of iron heard in the house, while it was in building. 
The door for the middle chamber was in the right side of the house: and they went up with winding stairs into the middle chamber, and out of the middle into the third. 
So he built the house, and finished it; and covered the house with beams and boards of cedar. 

402,hall he take away from off all the earth: for the LORD hath spoken it. 
And it shall be said in that day, Lo, this is our God; we have waited for him, and he will save us: this is the LORD; we have waited for him, we will be glad and rejoice in his salvation. 
For in this mountain shall the hand of the LORD rest, and Moab shall be trodden down under him, even as straw is trodden down for the dunghil
513,ren, that they would go before unto you, and make up beforehand your bounty, whereof ye had notice before, that the same might be ready, as a matter of bounty, and not as of covetousness. 
But this I say, He which soweth sparingly shall reap also sparingly; and he which soweth bountifully shall reap also bountifully. 
Every man according as he purposeth in his heart, so let him give; not grudgingly, or of necessity: for God loveth a cheerful giver. 
And God is able to make all grace abound toward you; that y
451,illed with the Spirit; 
Speaking to yourselves in psalms and hymns and spiritual songs, singing and making melody in your heart to the Lord; 
Giving thanks always for all things unto God and the Father in the name of our Lord Jesus Christ; 
Submitting yourselves one to another in the fear of God. 
Wives, submit yourselves unto your own husbands, as unto the Lord. 
For the husband is the head of the wife, even as Christ is the head of the church: a
568,word, and not a doer, he is like unto a man beholding his natural face in a glass: 
For he beholdeth himself, and goeth his way, and straightway forgetteth what manner of man he was. 
But whoso looketh into the perfect law of liberty, and continueth therein, he being not a forgetful hearer, but a doer of the work, this man shall be blessed in his deed. 
If any man among you seem to be religious, and bridleth not his tongue, but deceiveth his own heart, this man's religion is vain. 
Pure religion and undefiled before God and the Father is this, To visit the fathe
552,teousness, and there is a wicked man that prolongeth his life in his wickedness. 
Be not righteous over much; neither make thyself over wise: why shouldest thou destroy thyself ? 
Be not over much wicked, neither be thou foolish: why shouldest thou die before thy time? 
It is good that thou shouldest take hold of this; yea, also from this withdraw not thine hand: for he that feareth God shall come forth of them all. 
Wisdom strengtheneth the wise more than ten mighty men which are in the city. 
For there is not a just man upon earth, that doeth g
533,t remain in this city, and the hands of all the people, in speaking such words unto them: for this man seeketh not the welfare of this people, but the hurt. 
Then Zedekiah the king said, Behold, he is in your hand: for the king is not he that can do any thing against you. 
Then took they Jeremiah, and cast him into the dungeon of Malchiah the son of Hammelech, that was in the court of the prison: and they let down Jeremiah with cords. And in the dungeon there was no water, but mire: so Jeremiah sunk in the mire. 
Now when Ebedm
495,joy to the just to do judgment: but destruction shall be to the workers of iniquity. 
The man that wandereth out of the way of understanding shall remain in the congregation of the dead. 
He that loveth pleasure shall be a poor man: he that loveth wine and oil shall not be rich. 
The wicked shall be a ransom for the righteous, and the transgressor for the upright. 
It is better to dwell in the wilderness, than with a contentious and an angry woman. 
There is treasure to be desired and oil i
561,l be, that thou shalt drink of the brook; and I have commanded the ravens to feed thee there. 
So he went and did according unto the word of the LORD: for he went and dwelt by the brook Cherith, that is before Jordan. 
And the ravens brought him bread and flesh in the morning, and bread and flesh in the evening; and he drank of the brook. 
And it came to pass after a while, that the brook dried up, because there had been no rain in the land. 
And the word of the LORD came unto him, saying, 
Arise, get thee to Zarephath, which belongeth to Zidon, and dwell
411,elds; thou shalt not be brought together, nor gathered: I have given thee for meat to the beasts of the field and to the fowls of the heaven. 
And all the inhabitants of Egypt shall know that I am the LORD, because they have been a staff of reed to the house of Israel. 
When they took hold of thee by thy hand, thou didst break, and rend all their shoulder: and when they leaned upon thee, thou brakest, and ma
575,en, but in the power of God. 
Howbeit we speak wisdom among them that are perfect: yet not the wisdom of this world, nor of the princes of this world, that come to nought: 
But we speak the wisdom of God in a mystery, even the hidden wisdom, which God ordained before the world unto our glory: 
Which none of the princes of this world knew: for had they known it, they would not have crucified the Lord of glory. 
But as it is written, Eye hath not seen, nor ear heard, neither have entered into the heart of man, the things which God hath prepared for them that love him. 
B
448,time I had not set up the doors upon the gates;) 
That Sanballat and Geshem sent unto me, saying, Come, let us meet together in some one of the villages in the plain of Ono. But they thought to do me mischief. 
And I sent messengers unto them, saying, I am doing a great work, so that I cannot come down: why should the work cease, whilst I leave it, and come down to you? 
Yet they sent unto me four times after this sort; and I answered them afte
476,ich had accused Daniel, and they cast them into the den of lions, them, their children, and their wives; and the lions had the mastery of them, and brake all their bones in pieces or ever they came at the bottom of the den. 
Then king Darius wrote unto all people, nations, and languages, that dwell in all the earth; Peace be multiplied unto you. 
I make a decree, That in every dominion of my kingdom men tremble and fear before the God of Daniel: for he is the living God, 
457, away your horses; and I have made the stink of your camps to come up unto your nostrils: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
I have overthrown some of you, as God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah, and ye were as a firebrand plucked out of the burning: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
Therefore thus will I do unto thee, O Israel: and because I will do this unto thee, prepare to meet thy God, O Israel. 
For, lo, he that forme
443,as for the stork, the fir trees are her house. 
The high hills are a refuge for the wild goats; and the rocks for the conies. 
He appointed the moon for seasons: the sun knoweth his going down. 
Thou makest darkness, and it is night: wherein all the beasts of the forest do creep forth. 
The young lions roar after their prey, and seek their meat from God. 
The sun ariseth, they gather themselves together, and lay them down in their dens. 
M
439,it shall stop the noses of the passengers: and there shall they bury Gog and all his multitude: and they shall call it The valley of Hamongog. 
And seven months shall the house of Israel be burying of them, that they may cleanse the land. 
Yea, all the people of the land shall bury them; and it shall be to them a renown the day that I shall be glorified, saith the Lord GOD. 
And they shall sever out men of continual employment, passing
553, build you up, and to give you an inheritance among all them which are sanctified. 
I have coveted no man's silver, or gold, or apparel. 
Yea, ye yourselves know, that these hands have ministered unto my necessities, and to them that were with me. 
I have shewed you all things, how that so labouring ye ought to support the weak, and to remember the words of the Lord Jesus, how he said, It is more blessed to give than to receive. 
And when he had thus spoken, he kneeled down, and prayed with them all. 
And they all wept sore, and fell on Paul's nec
584,old, my son, which came forth of my bowels, seeketh my life: how much more now may this Benjamite do it? let him alone, and let him curse; for the LORD hath bidden him. 
It may be that the LORD will look on mine affliction, and that the LORD will requite me good for his cursing this day. 
And as David and his men went by the way, Shimei went along on the hill's side over against him, and cursed as he went, and threw stones at him, and cast dust. 
And the king, and all the people that were with him, came weary, and refreshed themselves there. 
And Absalom, and all the people the
486,here. And he said, I will not destroy it for twenty's sake. 
And he said, Oh let not the LORD be angry, and I will speak yet but this once: Peradventure ten shall be found there. And he said, I will not destroy it for ten's sake. 
And the LORD went his way, as soon as he had left communing with Abraham: and Abraham returned unto his place. 
And there came two angels to Sodom at even; and Lot sat in the gate of Sodom: and Lot seeing them rose up to meet them; and he bowed himself wi
599,ho is the sword of thy excellency! and thine enemies shall be found liars unto thee; and thou shalt tread upon their high places. 
And Moses went up from the plains of Moab unto the mountain of Nebo, to the top of Pisgah, that is over against Jericho. And the LORD shewed him all the land of Gilead, unto Dan, 
And all Naphtali, and the land of Ephraim, and Manasseh, and all the land of Judah, unto the utmost sea, 
And the south, and the plain of the valley of Jericho, the city of palm trees, unto Zoar. 
And the LORD said unto him, This is the land which I sware unto Abraham, unto Isaac, and un
457,ast done, in that thou art a comfort unto them. 
When thy sisters, Sodom and her daughters, shall return to their former estate, and Samaria and her daughters shall return to their former estate, then thou and thy daughters shall return to your former estate. 
For thy sister Sodom was not mentioned by thy mouth in the day of thy pride, 
Before thy wickedness was discovered, as at the time of thy reproach of the daughters of Syria, and all that are round
409,ur and suffer reproach, because we trust in the living God, who is the Saviour of all men, specially of those that believe. 
These things command and teach. 
Let no man despise thy youth; but be thou an example of the believers, in word, in conversation, in charity, in spirit, in faith, in purity. 
Till I come, give attendance to reading, to exhortation, to doctrine. 
Neglect not the gift that is in thee, 
497,l went every man unto his inheritance to possess the land. 
And the people served the LORD all the days of Joshua, and all the days of the elders that outlived Joshua, who had seen all the great works of the LORD, that he did for Israel. 
And Joshua the son of Nun, the servant of the LORD, died, being an hundred and ten years old. 
And they buried him in the border of his inheritance in Timnathheres, in the mount of Ephraim, on the north side of the hill Gaash. 
And also all that generation w
446,him up: who then is able to stand before me? 
Who hath prevented me, that I should repay him? whatsoever is under the whole heaven is mine. 
I will not conceal his parts, nor his power, nor his comely proportion. 
Who can discover the face of his garment? or who can come to him with his double bridle? 
Who can open the doors of his face? his teeth are terrible round about. 
His scales are his pride, shut up together as with a close seal. 
One
576, for they said, He is beside himself. 
And the scribes which came down from Jerusalem said, He hath Beelzebub, and by the prince of the devils casteth he out devils. 
And he called them unto him, and said unto them in parables, How can Satan cast out Satan? 
And if a kingdom be divided against itself, that kingdom cannot stand. 
And if a house be divided against itself, that house cannot stand. 
And if Satan rise up against himself, and be divided, he cannot stand, but hath an end. 
No man can enter into a strong man's house, and spoil his goods, except he will first bi
475,e, saith the LORD, that this place shall no more be called Tophet, nor The valley of the son of Hinnom, but The valley of slaughter. 
And I will make void the counsel of Judah and Jerusalem in this place; and I will cause them to fall by the sword before their enemies, and by the hands of them that seek their lives: and their carcases will I give to be meat for the fowls of the heaven, and for the beasts of the earth. 
And I will make this city desolate, and an hissing; 
484,salem be pleasant unto the LORD, as in the days of old, and as in former years. 
And I will come near to you to judgment; and I will be a swift witness against the sorcerers, and against the adulterers, and against false swearers, and against those that oppress the hireling in his wages, the widow, and the fatherless, and that turn aside the stranger from his right, and fear not me, saith the LORD of hosts. 
For I am the LORD, I change not; therefore ye sons of Jacob are not cons
500,. 
Ishbosheth Saul's son was forty years old when he began to reign over Israel, and reigned two years. But the house of Judah followed David. 
And the time that David was king in Hebron over the house of Judah was seven years and six months. 
And Abner the son of Ner, and the servants of Ishbosheth the son of Saul, went out from Mahanaim to Gibeon. 
And Joab the son of Zeruiah, and the servants of David, went out, and met together by the pool of Gibeon: and they sat down, the one on the one sid
523,e unclean spirit is gone out of a man, he walketh through dry places, seeking rest, and findeth none. 
Then he saith, I will return into my house from whence I came out; and when he is come, he findeth it empty, swept, and garnished. 
Then goeth he, and taketh with himself seven other spirits more wicked than himself, and they enter in and dwell there: and the last state of that man is worse than the first. Even so shall it be also unto this wicked generation. 
While he yet talked to the people, behold, his mother and
412,he vine do yield their strength. 
Be glad then, ye children of Zion, and rejoice in the LORD your God: for he hath given you the former rain moderately, and he will cause to come down for you the rain, the former rain, and the latter rain in the first month. 
And the floors shall be full of wheat, and the vats shall overflow with wine and oil. 
And I will restore to you the years that the locust hath eaten, t
412,, when the vilest men are exalted. 
How long wilt thou forget me, O LORD? for ever? how long wilt thou hide thy face from me? 
How long shall I take counsel in my soul, having sorrow in my heart daily? how long shall mine enemy be exalted over me? 
Consider and hear me, O LORD my God: lighten mine eyes, lest I sleep the sleep of death; 
Lest mine enemy say, I have prevailed against him; and those that trouble
499,the sea; and the whole multitude was by the sea on the land. 
And he taught them many things by parables, and said unto them in his doctrine, 
Hearken; Behold, there went out a sower to sow: 
And it came to pass, as he sowed, some fell by the way side, and the fowls of the air came and devoured it up. 
And some fell on stony ground, where it had not much earth; and immediately it sprang up, because it had no depth of earth: 
But when the sun was up, it was scorched; and because it had no root, 
594,h forth their wings on high, covering the mercy seat with their wings, and their faces shall look one to another; toward the mercy seat shall the faces of the cherubims be. 
And thou shalt put the mercy seat above upon the ark; and in the ark thou shalt put the testimony that I shall give thee. 
And there I will meet with thee, and I will commune with thee from above the mercy seat, from between the two cherubims which are upon the ark of the testimony, of all things which I will give thee in commandment unto the children of Israel. 
Thou shalt also make a table of shittim wood: two cubi
530,not the rich in thy bedchamber: for a bird of the air shall carry the voice, and that which hath wings shall tell the matter. 
Cast thy bread upon the waters: for thou shalt find it after many days. 
Give a portion to seven, and also to eight; for thou knowest not what evil shall be upon the earth. 
If the clouds be full of rain, they empty themselves upon the earth: and if the tree fall toward the south, or toward the north, in the place where the tree falleth, there it shall be. 
He that observeth the wind shall not sow; a
418,n chests of rich apparel, bound with cords, and made of cedar, among thy merchandise. 
The ships of Tarshish did sing of thee in thy market: and thou wast replenished, and made very glorious in the midst of the seas. 
Thy rowers have brought thee into great waters: the east wind hath broken thee in the midst of the seas. 
Thy riches, and thy fairs, thy merchandise, thy mariners, and thy pilots, thy calkers, and the
433,e bones till the morrow. 
Her prophets are light and treacherous persons: her priests have polluted the sanctuary, they have done violence to the law. 
The just LORD is in the midst thereof; he will not do iniquity: every morning doth he bring his judgment to light, he faileth not; but the unjust knoweth no shame. 
I have cut off the nations: their towers are desolate; I made their streets waste, that none passeth by: their citie
579,eneath: there is none else. 
Thou shalt keep therefore his statutes, and his commandments, which I command thee this day, that it may go well with thee, and with thy children after thee, and that thou mayest prolong thy days upon the earth, which the LORD thy God giveth thee, for ever. 
Then Moses severed three cities on this side Jordan toward the sunrising; 
That the slayer might flee thither, which should kill his neighbour unawares, and hated him not in times past; and that fleeing unto one of these cities he might live: 
Namely, Bezer in the wilderness, in the plain c
414,e to the house of my master's brethren. 
And the damsel ran, and told them of her mother's house these things. 
And Rebekah had a brother, and his name was Laban: and Laban ran out unto the man, unto the well. 
And it came to pass, when he saw the earring and bracelets upon his sister's hands, and when he heard the words of Rebekah his sister, saying, Thus spake the man unto me; that he came unto the man; and, 
447,to every man the measure of faith. 
For as we have many members in one body, and all members have not the same office: 
So we, being many, are one body in Christ, and every one members one of another. 
Having then gifts differing according to the grace that is given to us, whether prophecy, let us prophesy according to the proportion of faith; 
Or ministry, let us wait on our ministering: or he that teacheth, on teaching; 
Or he that exhorteth
482,to thee than all the evil that befell thee from thy youth until now. 
Then the king arose, and sat in the gate. And they told unto all the people, saying, Behold, the king doth sit in the gate. And all the people came before the king: for Israel had fled every man to his tent. 
And all the people were at strife throughout all the tribes of Israel, saying, The king saved us out of the hand of our enemies, and he delivered us out of the hand of the Philistines; and now he is fled
468,st out, that old serpent, called the Devil, and Satan, which deceiveth the whole world: he was cast out into the earth, and his angels were cast out with him. 
And I heard a loud voice saying in heaven, Now is come salvation, and strength, and the kingdom of our God, and the power of his Christ: for the accuser of our brethren is cast down, which accused them before our God day and night. 
And they overcame him by the blood of the Lamb, and by the word of their te
523,clean. 
And on the eighth day she shall take unto her two turtles, or two young pigeons, and bring them unto the priest, to the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And the priest shall offer the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering; and the priest shall make an atonement for her before the LORD for the issue of her uncleanness. 
Thus shall ye separate the children of Israel from their uncleanness; that they die not in their uncleanness, when they defile my tabernacle that is among them. 
580,ss I withdrew mine hand, and wrought for my name's sake, that it should not be polluted in the sight of the heathen, in whose sight I brought them forth. 
I lifted up mine hand unto them also in the wilderness, that I would scatter them among the heathen, and disperse them through the countries; 
Because they had not executed my judgments, but had despised my statutes, and had polluted my sabbaths, and their eyes were after their fathers' idols. 
Wherefore I gave them also statutes that were not good, and judgments whereby they should not live; 
And I polluted them in their
461, the generations of old. Art thou not it that hath cut Rahab, and wounded the dragon? 
Art thou not it which hath dried the sea, the waters of the great deep; that hath made the depths of the sea a way for the ransomed to pass over? 
Therefore the redeemed of the LORD shall return, and come with singing unto Zion; and everlasting joy shall be upon their head: they shall obtain gladness and joy; and sorrow and mourning shall flee away. 
I, even I, am he that
529,t put off my sackcloth, and girded me with gladness; 
To the end that my glory may sing praise to thee, and not be silent. O LORD my God, I will give thanks unto thee for ever. 
In thee, O LORD, do I put my trust; let me never be ashamed: deliver me in thy righteousness. 
Bow down thine ear to me; deliver me speedily: be thou my strong rock, for an house of defence to save me. 
For thou art my rock and my fortress; therefore for thy name's sake lead me, and guide me. 
Pull me out of the net that they have laid privily for m
417, Malchiah the son of Rechab, the ruler of part of Bethhaccerem; he built it, and set up the doors thereof, the locks thereof, and the bars thereof. 
But the gate of the fountain repaired Shallun the son of Colhozeh, the ruler of part of Mizpah; he built it, and covered it, and set up the doors thereof, the locks thereof, and the bars thereof, and the wall of the pool of Siloah by the king's garden, and unto the st
424,n again till they were consumed. 
I have wounded them that they were not able to rise: they are fallen under my feet. 
For thou hast girded me with strength unto the battle: thou hast subdued under me those that rose up against me. 
Thou hast also given me the necks of mine enemies; that I might destroy them that hate me. 
They cried, but there was none to save them: even unto the LORD, but he answered them not. 
Then di
456, every one had four faces, and every one had four wings. 
And their feet were straight feet; and the sole of their feet was like the sole of a calf's foot: and they sparkled like the colour of burnished brass. 
And they had the hands of a man under their wings on their four sides; and they four had their faces and their wings. 
Their wings were joined one to another; they turned not when they went; they went every one straight forward. 
As for the like
550,have both straw and provender enough, and room to lodge in. 
And the man bowed down his head, and worshipped the LORD. 
And he said, Blessed be the LORD God of my master Abraham, who hath not left destitute my master of his mercy and his truth: I being in the way, the LORD led me to the house of my master's brethren. 
And the damsel ran, and told them of her mother's house these things. 
And Rebekah had a brother, and his name was Laban: and Laban ran out unto the man, unto the well. 
And it came to pass, when he saw the earring and bracelets u
598,in two rows, when it was cast. 
It stood upon twelve oxen, three looking toward the north, and three looking toward the west, and three looking toward the south, and three looking toward the east: and the sea was set above upon them, and all their hinder parts were inward. 
And it was an hand breadth thick, and the brim thereof was wrought like the brim of a cup, with flowers of lilies: it contained two thousand baths. 
And he made ten bases of brass; four cubits was the length of one base, and four cubits the breadth thereof, and three cubits the height of it. 
And the work of the bases was
514,nts of Ishbosheth the son of Saul, went out from Mahanaim to Gibeon. 
And Joab the son of Zeruiah, and the servants of David, went out, and met together by the pool of Gibeon: and they sat down, the one on the one side of the pool, and the other on the other side of the pool. 
And Abner said to Joab, Let the young men now arise, and play before us. And Joab said, Let them arise. 
Then there arose and went over by number twelve of Benjamin, which pertained to Ishbosheth the son of Saul, and twelve of the serva
593,d the decree was given at Shushan the palace. 
And Mordecai went out from the presence of the king in royal apparel of blue and white, and with a great crown of gold, and with a garment of fine linen and purple: and the city of Shushan rejoiced and was glad. 
The Jews had light, and gladness, and joy, and honour. 
And in every province, and in every city, whithersoever the king's commandment and his decree came, the Jews had joy and gladness, a feast and a good day. And many of the people of the land became Jews; for the fear of the Jews fell upon them. 
Now in the twelfth month, that i
422,y persecute him whom thou hast smitten; and they talk to the grief of those whom thou hast wounded. 
Add iniquity unto their iniquity: and let them not come into thy righteousness. 
Let them be blotted out of the book of the living, and not be written with the righteous. 
But I am poor and sorrowful: let thy salvation, O God, set me up on high. 
I will praise the name of God with a song, and will magnify him with thank
517,y the footsteps of the flock, and feed thy kids beside the shepherds' tents. 
I have compared thee, O my love, to a company of horses in Pharaoh's chariots. 
Thy cheeks are comely with rows of jewels, thy neck with chains of gold. 
We will make thee borders of gold with studs of silver. 
While the king sitteth at his table, my spikenard sendeth forth the smell thereof. 
A bundle of myrrh is my well-beloved unto me; he shall lie all night betwixt my breasts. 
My beloved is unto me as a cluster of camphire in the 
467,kam: and Ishmael the son of Nethaniah carried them away captive, and departed to go over to the Ammonites. 
But when Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were with him, heard of all the evil that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah had done, 
Then they took all the men, and went to fight with Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and found him by the great waters that are in Gibeon. 
Now it came to pass, that when all the people which were with Ish
442,eir hands on him, and took him. 
And one of them that stood by drew a sword, and smote a servant of the high priest, and cut off his ear. 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, Are ye come out, as against a thief, with swords and with staves to take me? 
I was daily with you in the temple teaching, and ye took me not: but the scriptures must be fulfilled. 
And they all forsook him, and fled. 
And there followed him a certain young man, h
506,e, when thou doest well to thyself. 
He shall go to the generation of his fathers; they shall never see light. 
Man that is in honour, and understandeth not, is like the beasts that perish. 
The mighty God, even the LORD, hath spoken, and called the earth from the rising of the sun unto the going down thereof. 
Out of Zion, the perfection of beauty, God hath shined. 
Our God shall come, and shall not keep silence: a fire shall devour before him, and it shall be very tempestuous round about him. 
He sh
587,hing of skin; 
Then the priest shall command that they wash the thing wherein the plague is, and he shall shut it up seven days more: 
And the priest shall look on the plague, after that it is washed: and, behold, if the plague have not changed his colour, and the plague be not spread; it is unclean; thou shalt burn it in the fire; it is fret inward, whether it be bare within or without. 
And if the priest look, and, behold, the plague be somewhat dark after the washing of it; then he shall rend it out of the garment, or out of the skin, or out of the warp, or out of the woof: 
An
538,se eight Milcah did bear to Nahor, Abraham's brother. 
And his concubine, whose name was Reumah, she bare also Tebah, and Gaham, and Thahash, and Maachah. 
And Sarah was an hundred and seven and twenty years old: these were the years of the life of Sarah. 
And Sarah died in Kirjatharba; the same is Hebron in the land of Canaan: and Abraham came to mourn for Sarah, and to weep for her. 
And Abraham stood up from before his dead, and spake unto the sons of Heth, saying, 
I am a stranger and a sojourner with you: give me a possession o
538,rds, and cut off their garments in the middle, even to their buttocks, and sent them away. 
When they told it unto David, he sent to meet them, because the men were greatly ashamed: and the king said, Tarry at Jericho until your beards be grown, and then return. 
And when the children of Ammon saw that they stank before David, the children of Ammon sent and hired the Syrians of Bethrehob and the Syrians of Zoba, twenty thousand footmen, and of king Maacah a thousand men, and of Ishtob twelve thousand men. 
And when David heard of it
420,, the judges, the treasurers, the counsellors, the sheriffs, and all the rulers of the provinces, to come to the dedication of the image which Nebuchadnezzar the king had set up. 
Then the princes, the governors, and captains, the judges, the treasurers, the counsellors, the sheriffs, and all the rulers of the provinces, were gathered together unto the dedication of the image that Nebuchadnezzar the king had set up; 
407,r therefore shall break one of these least commandments, and shall teach men so, he shall be called the least in the kingdom of heaven: but whosoever shall do and teach them, the same shall be called great in the kingdom of heaven. 
For I say unto you, That except your righteousness shall exceed the righteousness of the scribes and Pharisees, ye shall in no case enter into the kingdom of heaven. 
Ye have
422,departed: and Jonathan went into the city. 
Then came David to Nob to Ahimelech the priest: and Ahimelech was afraid at the meeting of David, and said unto him, Why art thou alone, and no man with thee? 
And David said unto Ahimelech the priest, The king hath commanded me a business, and hath said unto me, Let no man know any thing of the business whereabout I send thee, and what I have commanded thee: and I have appoi
563,ust, neither doth trouble spring out of the ground; 
Yet man is born unto trouble, as the sparks fly upward. 
I would seek unto God, and unto God would I commit my cause: 
Which doeth great things and unsearchable; marvellous things without number: 
Who giveth rain upon the earth, and sendeth waters upon the fields: 
To set up on high those that be low; that those which mourn may be exalted to safety. 
He disappointeth the devices of the crafty, so that their hands cannot perform their enterprise. 
He taketh the wise in their own craftiness: and the counsel
400,f judgment: because as he is, so are we in this world. 
There is no fear in love; but perfect love casteth out fear: because fear hath torment. He that feareth is not made perfect in love. 
We love him, because he first loved us. 
If a man say, I love God, and hateth his brother, he is a liar: for he that loveth not his brother whom he hath seen, how can he love God whom he hath not seen? 
And thi
489,ad taken out of the temple which was in Jerusalem; that the king, and his princes, his wives, and his concubines, might drink therein. 
Then they brought the golden vessels that were taken out of the temple of the house of God which was at Jerusalem; and the king, and his princes, his wives, and his concubines, drank in them. 
They drank wine, and praised the gods of gold, and of silver, of brass, of iron, of wood, and of stone. 
In the same hour came forth fingers of a man's hand, an
540,h a just man, and he will increase in learning. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of wisdom: and the knowledge of the holy is understanding. 
For by me thy days shall be multiplied, and the years of thy life shall be increased. 
If thou be wise, thou shalt be wise for thyself: but if thou scornest, thou alone shalt bear it. 
A foolish woman is clamorous: she is simple, and knoweth nothing. 
For she sitteth at the door of her house, on a seat in the high places of the city, 
To call passengers who go right on their ways: 
Whoso is
507,, nine hundred twenty and eight. 
And Joel the son of Zichri was their overseer: and Judah the son of Senuah was second over the city. 
Of the priests: Jedaiah the son of Joiarib, Jachin. 
Seraiah the son of Hilkiah, the son of Meshullam, the son of Zadok, the son of Meraioth, the son of Ahitub, was the ruler of the house of God. 
And their brethren that did the work of the house were eight hundred twenty and two: and Adaiah the son of Jeroham, the son of Pelaliah, the son of Amzi, the son of Zechariah
487,n of Ner: 
Let it rest on the head of Joab, and on all his father's house; and let there not fail from the house of Joab one that hath an issue, or that is a leper, or that leaneth on a staff, or that falleth on the sword, or that lacketh bread. 
So Joab, and Abishai his brother slew Abner, because he had slain their brother Asahel at Gibeon in the battle. 
And David said to Joab, and to all the people that were with him, Rend your clothes, and gird you with sackcloth, and mourn bef
582,ded the multitude to sit down on the ground. 
And he took the seven loaves and the fishes, and gave thanks, and brake them, and gave to his disciples, and the disciples to the multitude. 
And they did all eat, and were filled: and they took up of the broken meat that was left seven baskets full. 
And they that did eat were four thousand men, beside women and children. 
And he sent away the multitude, and took ship, and came into the coasts of Magdala. 
The Pharisees also with the Sadducees came, and tempting desired him that he would shew them a sign from heaven. 
He answered
573, he be wise in his own conceit. 
He that sendeth a message by the hand of a fool cutteth off the feet, and drinketh damage. 
The legs of the lame are not equal: so is a parable in the mouth of fools. 
As he that bindeth a stone in a sling, so is he that giveth honour to a fool. 
As a thorn goeth up into the hand of a drunkard, so is a parable in the mouths of fools. 
The great God that formed all things both rewardeth the fool, and rewardeth transgressors. 
As a dog returneth to his vomit, so a fool returneth to his folly. 
Seest thou a man wise in his own conceit? t
589,ng unto my master, the LORD's anointed, to stretch forth mine hand against him, seeing he is the anointed of the LORD. 
So David stayed his servants with these words, and suffered them not to rise against Saul. But Saul rose up out of the cave, and went on his way. 
David also arose afterward, and went out of the cave, and cried after Saul, saying, My lord the king. And when Saul looked behind him, David stooped with his face to the earth, and bowed himself. 
And David said to Saul, Wherefore hearest thou men's words, saying, Behold, David seeketh thy hurt? 
Behold, this day thine e
538,According as we hearkened unto Moses in all things, so will we hearken unto thee: only the LORD thy God be with thee, as he was with Moses. 
Whosoever he be that doth rebel against thy commandment, and will not hearken unto thy words in all that thou commandest him, he shall be put to death: only be strong and of a good courage. 
And Joshua the son of Nun sent out of Shittim two men to spy secretly, saying, Go view the land, even Jericho. And they went, and came into an harlot's house, named Rahab, and lodged there. 
And it was told
515,heir stead, them Joshua circumcised: for they were uncircumcised, because they had not circumcised them by the way. 
And it came to pass, when they had done circumcising all the people, that they abode in their places in the camp, till they were whole. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, This day have I rolled away the reproach of Egypt from off you. Wherefore the name of the place is called Gilgal unto this day. 
And the children of Israel encamped in Gilgal, and kept the passover on the fourteenth day of the mon
522,nd Israel. 
And the LORD said unto me, Take unto thee yet the instruments of a foolish shepherd. 
For, lo, I will raise up a shepherd in the land, which shall not visit those that be cut off, neither shall seek the young one, nor heal that that is broken, nor feed that that standeth still: but he shall eat the flesh of the fat, and tear their claws in pieces. 
Woe to the idol shepherd that leaveth the flock! the sword shall be upon his arm, and upon his right eye: his arm shall be clean dried up, and his right eye sh
492, ever: and serve the LORD your God, that the fierceness of his wrath may turn away from you. 
For if ye turn again unto the LORD, your brethren and your children shall find compassion before them that lead them captive, so that they shall come again into this land: for the LORD your God is gracious and merciful, and will not turn away his face from you, if ye return unto him. 
So the posts passed from city to city through the country of Ephraim and Manasseh even unto Zebulun: but they la
558,his prey, when a multitude of shepherds is called forth against him, he will not be afraid of their voice, nor abase himself for the noise of them: so shall the LORD of hosts come down to fight for mount Zion, and for the hill thereof. 
As birds flying, so will the LORD of hosts defend Jerusalem; defending also he will deliver it; and passing over he will preserve it. 
Turn ye unto him from whom the children of Israel have deeply revolted. 
For in that day every man shall cast away his idols of silver, and his idols of gold, which your own hands have m
537, her, Thou shalt abide for me many days; thou shalt not play the harlot, and thou shalt not be for another man: so will I also be for thee. 
For the children of Israel shall abide many days without a king, and without a prince, and without a sacrifice, and without an image, and without an ephod, and without teraphim: 
Afterward shall the children of Israel return, and seek the LORD their God, and David their king; and shall fear the LORD and his goodness in the latter days. 
Hear the word of the LORD, ye children of Israel: for the
463,, the brother of Joab, the son of Zeruiah, was chief among three. And he lifted up his spear against three hundred, and slew them, and had the name among three. 
Was he not most honourable of three? therefore he was their captain: howbeit he attained not unto the first three. 
And Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, the son of a valiant man, of Kabzeel, who had done many acts, he slew two lionlike men of Moab: he went down also and slew a lion in the midst of a pit 
451,nswered and said unto her, Whosoever drinketh of this water shall thirst again: 
But whosoever drinketh of the water that I shall give him shall never thirst; but the water that I shall give him shall be in him a well of water springing up into everlasting life. 
The woman saith unto him, Sir, give me this water, that I thirst not, neither come hither to draw. 
Jesus saith unto her, Go, call thy husband, and come hither. 
The woman answered and sa
458, 
Seest thou not what they do in the cities of Judah and in the streets of Jerusalem? 
The children gather wood, and the fathers kindle the fire, and the women knead their dough, to make cakes to the queen of heaven, and to pour out drink offerings unto other gods, that they may provoke me to anger. 
Do they provoke me to anger? saith the LORD: do they not provoke themselves to the confusion of their own faces? 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold,
478,ken? for ye shall speak into the air. 
There are, it may be, so many kinds of voices in the world, and none of them is without signification. 
Therefore if I know not the meaning of the voice, I shall be unto him that speaketh a barbarian, and he that speaketh shall be a barbarian unto me. 
Even so ye, forasmuch as ye are zealous of spiritual gifts, seek that ye may excel to the edifying of the church. 
Wherefore let him that speaketh in an unknown tongue pray that he may i
571,he priests, and found there none of the sons of Levi. 
Then sent I for Eliezer, for Ariel, for Shemaiah, and for Elnathan, and for Jarib, and for Elnathan, and for Nathan, and for Zechariah, and for Meshullam, chief men; also for Joiarib, and for Elnathan, men of understanding. 
And I sent them with commandment unto Iddo the chief at the place Casiphia, and I told them what they should say unto Iddo, and to his brethren the Nethinims, at the place Casiphia, that they should bring unto us ministers for the house of our God. 
And by the good hand of our God upon us t
509,d the God of Abraham, and the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob. 
For he is not a God of the dead, but of the living: for all live unto him. 
Then certain of the scribes answering said, Master, thou hast well said. 
And after that they durst not ask him any question at all. 
And he said unto them, How say they that Christ is David's son? 
And David himself saith in the book of Psalms, The LORD said unto my Lord, Sit thou on my right hand, 
Till I make thine enemies thy footstool. 
David therefore callet
407, before thee with all their hearts: 
Thou which hast kept with thy servant David my father that which thou hast promised him; and spakest with thy mouth, and hast fulfilled it with thine hand, as it is this day. 
Now therefore, O LORD God of Israel, keep with thy servant David my father that which thou hast promised him, saying, There shall not fail thee a man in my sight to sit upon the throne of Israel
512,s, which are yet to sound! 
And the fifth angel sounded, and I saw a star fall from heaven unto the earth: and to him was given the key of the bottomless pit. 
And he opened the bottomless pit; and there arose a smoke out of the pit, as the smoke of a great furnace; and the sun and the air were darkened by reason of the smoke of the pit. 
And there came out of the smoke locusts upon the earth: and unto them was given power, as the scorpions of the earth have power. 
And it was commanded them that they shoul
413,ent and perfume rejoice the heart: so doth the sweetness of a man's friend by hearty counsel. 
Thine own friend, and thy father's friend, forsake not; neither go into thy brother's house in the day of thy calamity: for better is a neighbour that is near than a brother far off. 
My son, be wise, and make my heart glad, that I may answer him that reproacheth me. 
A prudent man foreseeth the evil, and hideth hims
409, also. 
And it came to pass through the lightness of her whoredom, that she defiled the land, and committed adultery with stones and with stocks. 
And yet for all this her treacherous sister Judah hath not turned unto me with her whole heart, but feignedly, saith the LORD. 
And the LORD said unto me, The backsliding Israel hath justified herself more than treacherous Judah. 
Go and proclaim these words tow
526,ath not spoken. 
The people of the land have used oppression, and exercised robbery, and have vexed the poor and needy: yea, they have oppressed the stranger wrongfully. 
And I sought for a man among them, that should make up the hedge, and stand in the gap before me for the land, that I should not destroy it: but I found none. 
Therefore have I poured out mine indignation upon them; I have consumed them with the fire of my wrath: their own way have I recompensed upon their heads, saith the Lord GOD. 
The word of the LOR
527,e first face was the face of a cherub, and the second face was the face of a man, and the third the face of a lion, and the fourth the face of an eagle. 
And the cherubims were lifted up. This is the living creature that I saw by the river of Chebar. 
And when the cherubims went, the wheels went by them: and when the cherubims lifted up their wings to mount up from the earth, the same wheels also turned not from beside them. 
When they stood, these stood; and when they were lifted up, these lifted up themselves also: for 
526,d many days. 
And it came to pass after these things, that God did tempt Abraham, and said unto him, Abraham: and he said, Behold, here I am. 
And he said, Take now thy son, thine only son Isaac, whom thou lovest, and get thee into the land of Moriah; and offer him there for a burnt offering upon one of the mountains which I will tell thee of. 
And Abraham rose up early in the morning, and saddled his ass, and took two of his young men with him, and Isaac his son, and clave the wood for the burnt offering, and rose up, a
590,ckedness, saith the LORD. 
Wherefore their way shall be unto them as slippery ways in the darkness: they shall be driven on, and fall therein: for I will bring evil upon them, even the year of their visitation, saith the LORD. 
And I have seen folly in the prophets of Samaria; they prophesied in Baal, and caused my people Israel to err. 
I have seen also in the prophets of Jerusalem an horrible thing: they commit adultery, and walk in lies: they strengthen also the hands of evildoers, that none doth return from his wickedness; they are all of them unto me as Sodom, and the inhabitant
569, 
Before she travailed, she brought forth; before her pain came, she was delivered of a man child. 
Who hath heard such a thing? who hath seen such things? Shall the earth be made to bring forth in one day? or shall a nation be born at once? for as soon as Zion travailed, she brought forth her children. 
Shall I bring to the birth, and not cause to bring forth? saith the LORD: shall I cause to bring forth, and shut the womb? saith thy God. 
Rejoice ye with Jerusalem, and be glad with her, all ye that love her: rejoice for joy with her, all ye that mourn for her: 
564,he sword, that our wives and our children should be a prey? were it not better for us to return into Egypt? 
And they said one to another, Let us make a captain, and let us return into Egypt. 
Then Moses and Aaron fell on their faces before all the assembly of the congregation of the children of Israel. 
And Joshua the son of Nun, and Caleb the son of Jephunneh, which were of them that searched the land, rent their clothes: 
And they spake unto all the company of the children of Israel, saying, The land, which we passed through to search it, is an exceeding 
424,ed five pounds. 
And he said likewise to him, Be thou also over five cities. 
And another came, saying, Lord, behold, here is thy pound, which I have kept laid up in a napkin: 
For I feared thee, because thou art an austere man: thou takest up that thou layedst not down, and reapest that thou didst not sow. 
And he saith unto him, Out of thine own mouth will I judge thee, thou wicked servant. Thou knewest that I was an a
445,, and go over all his banks: 
And he shall pass through Judah; he shall overflow and go over, he shall reach even to the neck; and the stretching out of his wings shall fill the breadth of thy land, O Immanuel. 
Associate yourselves, O ye people, and ye shall be broken in pieces; and give ear, all ye of far countries: gird yourselves, and ye shall be broken in pieces; gird yourselves, and ye shall be broken in pieces. 
Take counsel together,
505,uel in his ear a day before Saul came, saying, 
To morrow about this time I will send thee a man out of the land of Benjamin, and thou shalt anoint him to be captain over my people Israel, that he may save my people out of the hand of the Philistines: for I have looked upon my people, because their cry is come unto me. 
And when Samuel saw Saul, the LORD said unto him, Behold the man whom I spake to thee of! this same shall reign over my people. 
Then Saul drew near to Samuel in the gate, and said, T
580, appoint a place for my people Israel, and will plant them, that they may dwell in a place of their own, and move no more; neither shall the children of wickedness afflict them any more, as beforetime, 
And as since the time that I commanded judges to be over my people Israel, and have caused thee to rest from all thine enemies. Also the LORD telleth thee that he will make thee an house. 
And when thy days be fulfilled, and thou shalt sleep with thy fathers, I will set up thy seed after thee, which shall proceed out of thy bowels, and I will establish his kingdom. 
He shall
457,h as heard whether there be any Holy Ghost. 
And he said unto them, Unto what then were ye baptized? And they said, Unto John's baptism. 
Then said Paul, John verily baptized with the baptism of repentance, saying unto the people, that they should believe on him which should come after him, that is, on Christ Jesus. 
When they heard this, they were baptized in the name of the Lord Jesus. 
And when Paul had laid his hands upon them, the Holy Ghost came o
484,ing womb and dry breasts. 
All their wickedness is in Gilgal: for there I hated them: for the wickedness of their doings I will drive them out of mine house, I will love them no more: all their princes are revolters. 
Ephraim is smitten, their root is dried up, they shall bear no fruit: yea, though they bring forth, yet will I slay even the beloved fruit of their womb. 
My God will cast them away, because they did not hearken unto him: and they shall be wanderers among the nation
479,overlaid them with gold, to bear the table. 
And he made the vessels which were upon the table, his dishes, and his spoons, and his bowls, and his covers to cover withal, of pure gold. 
And he made the candlestick of pure gold: of beaten work made he the candlestick; his shaft, and his branch, his bowls, his knops, and his flowers, were of the same: 
And six branches going out of the sides thereof; three branches of the candlestick out of the one side thereof, and three bran
595,d lose thy sweet words. 
Speak not in the ears of a fool: for he will despise the wisdom of thy words. 
Remove not the old landmark; and enter not into the fields of the fatherless: 
For their redeemer is mighty; he shall plead their cause with thee. 
Apply thine heart unto instruction, and thine ears to the words of knowledge. 
Withhold not correction from the child: for if thou beatest him with the rod, he shall not die. 
Thou shalt beat him with the rod, and shalt deliver his soul from hell. 
My son, if thine heart be wise, my heart shall rejoice, even mine. 
Yea, my reins shall rejoic
547,nd the sons of Jacob answered Shechem and Hamor his father deceitfully, and said, because he had defiled Dinah their sister: 
And they said unto them, We cannot do this thing, to give our sister to one that is uncircumcised; for that were a reproach unto us: 
But in this will we consent unto you: If ye will be as we be, that every male of you be circumcised; 
Then will we give our daughters unto you, and we will take your daughters to us, and we will dwell with you, and we will become one people. 
But if ye will not hearken unto us, to be ci
595, with the sacrifice of thanksgiving of his peace offerings. 
And of it he shall offer one out of the whole oblation for an heave offering unto the LORD, and it shall be the priest's that sprinkleth the blood of the peace offerings. 
And the flesh of the sacrifice of his peace offerings for thanksgiving shall be eaten the same day that it is offered; he shall not leave any of it until the morning. 
But if the sacrifice of his offering be a vow, or a voluntary offering, it shall be eaten the same day that he offereth his sacrifice: and on the morrow also the remainder of it shall be eaten: 
427,ves do roar like great waters, a noise of their voice is uttered: 
Because the spoiler is come upon her, even upon Babylon, and her mighty men are taken, every one of their bows is broken: for the LORD God of recompences shall surely requite. 
And I will make drunk her princes, and her wise men, her captains, and her rulers, and her mighty men: and they shall sleep a perpetual sleep, and not wake, saith the King, whose name
471,se that are appointed to die; 
And render unto our neighbours sevenfold into their bosom their reproach, wherewith they have reproached thee, O Lord. 
So we thy people and sheep of thy pasture will give thee thanks for ever: we will shew forth thy praise to all generations. 
Give ear, O Shepherd of Israel, thou that leadest Joseph like a flock; thou that dwellest between the cherubims, shine forth. 
Before Ephraim and Benjamin and Manasseh stir up thy strength, and c
490,richo, saying, 
Command the children of Israel, that they give unto the Levites of the inheritance of their possession cities to dwell in; and ye shall give also unto the Levites suburbs for the cities round about them. 
And the cities shall they have to dwell in; and the suburbs of them shall be for their cattle, and for their goods, and for all their beasts. 
And the suburbs of the cities, which ye shall give unto the Levites, shall reach from the wall of the city and outward a thous
538,off from the land of the living, that his name may be no more remembered. 
But, O LORD of hosts, that judgest righteously, that triest the reins and the heart, let me see thy vengeance on them: for unto thee have I revealed my cause. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of the men of Anathoth, that seek thy life, saying, Prophesy not in the name of the LORD, that thou die not by our hand: 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts, Behold, I will punish them: the young men shall die by the sword; their sons and their daughters shall die by f
587,ogue, Be not afraid, only believe. 
And he suffered no man to follow him, save Peter, and James, and John the brother of James. 
And he cometh to the house of the ruler of the synagogue, and seeth the tumult, and them that wept and wailed greatly. 
And when he was come in, he saith unto them, Why make ye this ado, and weep? the damsel is not dead, but sleepeth. 
And they laughed him to scorn. But when he had put them all out, he taketh the father and the mother of the damsel, and them that were with him, and entereth in where the damsel was lying. 
And he took the damsel by the ha
439,heir lands; every one after his tongue, after their families, in their nations. 
And the sons of Ham; Cush, and Mizraim, and Phut, and Canaan. 
And the sons of Cush; Seba, and Havilah, and Sabtah, and Raamah, and Sabtechah: and the sons of Raamah; Sheba, and Dedan. 
And Cush begat Nimrod: he began to be a mighty one in the earth. 
He was a mighty hunter before the LORD: wherefore it is said, Even as Nimrod the mighty hunter before the 
466,e which when a man hath found, he hideth, and for joy thereof goeth and selleth all that he hath, and buyeth that field. 
Again, the kingdom of heaven is like unto a merchant man, seeking goodly pearls: 
Who, when he had found one pearl of great price, went and sold all that he had, and bought it. 
Again, the kingdom of heaven is like unto a net, that was cast into the sea, and gathered of every kind: 
Which, when it was full, they drew to shore, and sat down, a
544,have compassion on us, and help us. 
Jesus said unto him, If thou canst believe, all things are possible to him that believeth. 
And straightway the father of the child cried out, and said with tears, Lord, I believe; help thou mine unbelief. 
When Jesus saw that the people came running together, he rebuked the foul spirit, saying unto him, Thou dumb and deaf spirit, I charge thee, come out of him, and enter no more into him. 
And the spirit cried, and rent him sore, and came out of him: and he was as one dead; insomuch that many said, He
507,ow with Ephraim, and raised up thy sons, O Zion, against thy sons, O Greece, and made thee as the sword of a mighty man. 
And the LORD shall be seen over them, and his arrow shall go forth as the lightning: and the LORD God shall blow the trumpet, and shall go with whirlwinds of the south. 
The LORD of hosts shall defend them; and they shall devour, and subdue with sling stones; and they shall drink, and make a noise as through wine; and they shall be filled like bowls, and as the corners of the altar.
548,rethren; Maaseiah, and Eliezer, and Jarib, and Gedaliah. 
And they gave their hands that they would put away their wives; and being guilty, they offered a ram of the flock for their trespass. 
And of the sons of Immer; Hanani, and Zebadiah. 
And of the sons of Harim; Maaseiah, and Elijah, and Shemaiah, and Jehiel, and Uzziah. 
And of the sons of Pashur; Elioenai, Maaseiah, Ishmael, Nethaneel, Jozabad, and Elasah. 
Also of the Levites; Jozabad, and Shimei, and Kelaiah, (the same is Kelita,) Pethahiah, Judah, and Eliezer. 
Of the singers also; 
562,t I may be delivered from them that do not believe in Judaea; and that my service which I have for Jerusalem may be accepted of the saints; 
That I may come unto you with joy by the will of God, and may with you be refreshed. 
Now the God of peace be with you all. Amen. 
I commend unto you Phebe our sister, which is a servant of the church which is at Cenchrea: 
That ye receive her in the Lord, as becometh saints, and that ye assist her in whatsoever business she hath need of you: for she hath been a succourer of many, and of myself also. 
Greet Priscilla 
579,walk in them; and I will be their God, and they shall be my people. 
Wherefore come out from among them, and be ye separate, saith the Lord, and touch not the unclean thing; and I will receive you. 
And will be a Father unto you, and ye shall be my sons and daughters, saith the Lord Almighty. 
Having therefore these promises, dearly beloved, let us cleanse ourselves from all filthiness of the flesh and spirit, perfecting holiness in the fear of God. 
Receive us; we have wronged no man, we have corrupted no man, we have defrauded no man. 
I speak not this to condemn you: fo
477,it. 
And the LORD shall smite Egypt: he shall smite and heal it: and they shall return even to the LORD, and he shall be intreated of them, and shall heal them. 
In that day shall there be a highway out of Egypt to Assyria, and the Assyrian shall come into Egypt, and the Egyptian into Assyria, and the Egyptians shall serve with the Assyrians. 
In that day shall Israel be the third with Egypt and with Assyria, even a blessing in the midst of the land: 
Whom the LORD of host
484,weapons of war: and they have laid their swords under their heads, but their iniquities shall be upon their bones, though they were the terror of the mighty in the land of the living. 
Yea, thou shalt be broken in the midst of the uncircumcised, and shalt lie with them that are slain with the sword. 
There is Edom, her kings, and all her princes, which with their might are laid by them that were slain by the sword: they shall lie with the uncircumcised, and with them that go down
477,k his head, and gat them away through the plain all night. 
And they brought the head of Ishbosheth unto David to Hebron, and said to the king, Behold the head of Ishbosheth the son of Saul thine enemy, which sought thy life; and the LORD hath avenged my lord the king this day of Saul, and of his seed. 
And David answered Rechab and Baanah his brother, the sons of Rimmon the Beerothite, and said unto them, As the LORD liveth, who hath redeemed my soul out of all adversity,
447,; none shall return in vain. 
And Chaldea shall be a spoil: all that spoil her shall be satisfied, saith the LORD. 
Because ye were glad, because ye rejoiced, O ye destroyers of mine heritage, because ye are grown fat as the heifer at grass, and bellow as bulls; 
Your mother shall be sore confounded; she that bare you shall be ashamed: behold, the hindermost of the nations shall be a wilderness, a dry land, and a desert. 
Because of the wrath 
549,in time to come, that we may say again, Behold the pattern of the altar of the LORD, which our fathers made, not for burnt offerings, nor for sacrifices; but it is a witness between us and you. 
God forbid that we should rebel against the LORD, and turn this day from following the LORD, to build an altar for burnt offerings, for meat offerings, or for sacrifices, beside the altar of the LORD our God that is before his tabernacle. 
And when Phinehas the priest, and the princes of the congregation and heads of the thousands of Israel which were 
407,n to be spoken by the Lord, and was confirmed unto us by them that heard him; 
God also bearing them witness, both with signs and wonders, and with divers miracles, and gifts of the Holy Ghost, according to his own will? 
For unto the angels hath he not put in subjection the world to come, whereof we speak. 
But one in a certain place testified, saying, What is man, that thou art mindful of him? or the s
528,anded them not, neither came it into my heart. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that it shall no more be called Tophet, nor the valley of the son of Hinnom, but the valley of slaughter: for they shall bury in Tophet, till there be no place. 
And the carcases of this people shall be meat for the fowls of the heaven, and for the beasts of the earth; and none shall fray them away. 
Then will I cause to cease from the cities of Judah, and from the streets of Jerusalem, the voice of mirth, and the voice of gla
446,alked in their own counsels. 
Oh that my people had hearkened unto me, and Israel had walked in my ways! 
I should soon have subdued their enemies, and turned my hand against their adversaries. 
The haters of the LORD should have submitted themselves unto him: but their time should have endured for ever. 
He should have fed them also with the finest of the wheat: and with honey out of the rock should I have satisfied thee. 
God standeth in th
547,, and Joab the son of Zeruiah, had dedicated; and whosoever had dedicated any thing, it was under the hand of Shelomith, and of his brethren. 
Of the Izharites, Chenaniah and his sons were for the outward business over Israel, for officers and judges. 
And of the Hebronites, Hashabiah and his brethren, men of valour, a thousand and seven hundred, were officers among them of Israel on this side Jordan westward in all the business of the LORD, and in the service of the king. 
Among the Hebronites was Jerijah the chief, even among the Hebronite
576,th us than with him: 
With him is an arm of flesh; but with us is the LORD our God to help us, and to fight our battles. And the people rested themselves upon the words of Hezekiah king of Judah. 
After this did Sennacherib king of Assyria send his servants to Jerusalem, (but he himself laid siege against Lachish, and all his power with him,) unto Hezekiah king of Judah, and unto all Judah that were at Jerusalem, saying, 
Thus saith Sennacherib king of Assyria, Whereon do ye trust, that ye abide in the siege in Jerusalem? 
Doth not Hezekiah persuade you to give over you
470,isciples, If any man will come after me, let him deny himself, and take up his cross, and follow me. 
For whosoever will save his life shall lose it: and whosoever will lose his life for my sake shall find it. 
For what is a man profited, if he shall gain the whole world, and lose his own soul? or what shall a man give in exchange for his soul? 
For the Son of man shall come in the glory of his Father with his angels; and then he shall reward every man according to 
484,d follow me. 
And he went out, and followed him; and wist not that it was true which was done by the angel; but thought he saw a vision. 
When they were past the first and the second ward, they came unto the iron gate that leadeth unto the city; which opened to them of his own accord: and they went out, and passed on through one street; and forthwith the angel departed from him. 
And when Peter was come to himself, he said, Now I know of a surety, that the LORD hath sent his ange
441, went a sharp twoedged sword: and his countenance was as the sun shineth in his strength. 
And when I saw him, I fell at his feet as dead. And he laid his right hand upon me, saying unto me, Fear not; I am the first and the last: 
I am he that liveth, and was dead; and, behold, I am alive for evermore, Amen; and have the keys of hell and of death. 
Write the things which thou hast seen, and the things which are, and the things which shal
491,rchandise is good: her candle goeth not out by night. 
She layeth her hands to the spindle, and her hands hold the distaff. 
She stretcheth out her hand to the poor; yea, she reacheth forth her hands to the needy. 
She is not afraid of the snow for her household: for all her household are clothed with scarlet. 
She maketh herself coverings of tapestry; her clothing is silk and purple. 
Her husband is known in the gates, when he sitteth among the elders of the land. 
She maketh fine line
563,And whosoever shall not receive you, nor hear you, when ye depart thence, shake off the dust under your feet for a testimony against them. Verily I say unto you, It shall be more tolerable for Sodom and Gomorrha in the day of judgment, than for that city. 
And they went out, and preached that men should repent. 
And they cast out many devils, and anointed with oil many that were sick, and healed them. 
And king Herod heard of him; (for his name was spread abroad:) and he said, That John the Baptist was risen from the dead, and therefore mighty works do shew
545, the LORD came, and stood, and called as at other times, Samuel, Samuel. Then Samuel answered, Speak; for thy servant heareth. 
And the LORD said to Samuel, Behold, I will do a thing in Israel, at which both the ears of every one that heareth it shall tingle. 
In that day I will perform against Eli all things which I have spoken concerning his house: when I begin, I will also make an end. 
For I have told him that I will judge his house for ever for the iniquity which he knoweth; because his sons made themselves vile, and he restrained the
593,Thus saith the LORD of hosts, Hearken not unto the words of the prophets that prophesy unto you: they make you vain: they speak a vision of their own heart, and not out of the mouth of the LORD. 
They say still unto them that despise me, The LORD hath said, Ye shall have peace; and they say unto every one that walketh after the imagination of his own heart, No evil shall come upon you. 
For who hath stood in the counsel of the LORD, and hath perceived and heard his word? who hath marked his word, and heard it? 
Behold, a whirlwind of the LORD is gone forth in fury, even a grievous whirl
414,Zion spreadeth forth her hands, and there is none to comfort her: the LORD hath commanded concerning Jacob, that his adversaries should be round about him: Jerusalem is as a menstruous woman among them. 
The LORD is righteous; for I have rebelled against his commandment: hear, I pray you, all people, and behold my sorrow: my virgins and my young men are gone into captivity. 
I called for my lovers, but they dec
506, his hire. 
And if a man entice a maid that is not betrothed, and lie with her, he shall surely endow her to be his wife. 
If her father utterly refuse to give her unto him, he shall pay money according to the dowry of virgins. 
Thou shalt not suffer a witch to live. 
Whosoever lieth with a beast shall surely be put to death. 
He that sacrificeth unto any god, save unto the LORD only, he shall be utterly destroyed. 
Thou shalt neither vex a stranger, nor oppress him: for ye were strangers in the land 
573,een cities with their villages: 
Libnah, and Ether, and Ashan, 
And Jiphtah, and Ashnah, and Nezib, 
And Keilah, and Achzib, and Mareshah; nine cities with their villages: 
Ekron, with her towns and her villages: 
From Ekron even unto the sea, all that lay near Ashdod, with their villages: 
Ashdod with her towns and her villages, Gaza with her towns and her villages, unto the river of Egypt, and the great sea, and the border thereof: 
And in the mountains, Shamir, and Jattir, and Socoh, 
And Dannah, and Kirjathsannah, which is Debir, 
And Anab, and Eshtemoh, and Anim
479,n the multitude, because they have now been with me three days, and have nothing to eat: 
And if I send them away fasting to their own houses, they will faint by the way: for divers of them came from far. 
And his disciples answered him, From whence can a man satisfy these men with bread here in the wilderness? 
And he asked them, How many loaves have ye? And they said, Seven. 
And he commanded the people to sit down on the ground: and he took the seven loaves, and gave than
443,yrrh, going to carry it down to Egypt. 
And Judah said unto his brethren, What profit is it if we slay our brother, and conceal his blood? 
Come, and let us sell him to the Ishmeelites, and let not our hand be upon him; for he is our brother and our flesh. And his brethren were content. 
Then there passed by Midianites merchantmen; and they drew and lifted up Joseph out of the pit, and sold Joseph to the Ishmeelites for twenty pieces of si
425, that he should touch them: and his disciples rebuked those that brought them. 
But when Jesus saw it, he was much displeased, and said unto them, Suffer the little children to come unto me, and forbid them not: for of such is the kingdom of God. 
Verily I say unto you, Whosoever shall not receive the kingdom of God as a little child, he shall not enter therein. 
And he took them up in his arms, put his hands upon them, a
421,ing, and his drink offering. 
And on the sixth day eight bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish: 
And their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the seventh 
425,nd fro throughout the whole earth, to shew himself strong in the behalf of them whose heart is perfect toward him. Herein thou hast done foolishly: therefore from henceforth thou shalt have wars. 
Then Asa was wroth with the seer, and put him in a prison house; for he was in a rage with him because of this thing. And Asa oppressed some of the people the same time. 
And, behold, the acts of Asa, first and last, lo, they ar
485,rn to your former estate. 
For thy sister Sodom was not mentioned by thy mouth in the day of thy pride, 
Before thy wickedness was discovered, as at the time of thy reproach of the daughters of Syria, and all that are round about her, the daughters of the Philistines, which despise thee round about. 
Thou hast borne thy lewdness and thine abominations, saith the LORD. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; I will even deal with thee as thou hast done, which hast despised the oath in breaki
515,y she shall take unto her two turtles, or two young pigeons, and bring them unto the priest, to the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And the priest shall offer the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering; and the priest shall make an atonement for her before the LORD for the issue of her uncleanness. 
Thus shall ye separate the children of Israel from their uncleanness; that they die not in their uncleanness, when they defile my tabernacle that is among them. 
This is the law of 
574,eventh day: wherefore the LORD blessed the sabbath day, and hallowed it. 
Honour thy father and thy mother: that thy days may be long upon the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee. 
Thou shalt not kill. 
Thou shalt not commit adultery. 
Thou shalt not steal. 
Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbour. 
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbour's house, thou shalt not covet thy neighbour's wife, nor his manservant, nor his maidservant, nor his ox, nor his ass, nor any thing that is thy neighbour's. 
And all the people saw the thunderings, and the lightnings, 
501,ver against mount Gerizim, and half of them over against mount Ebal; as Moses the servant of the LORD had commanded before, that they should bless the people of Israel. 
And afterward he read all the words of the law, the blessings and cursings, according to all that is written in the book of the law. 
There was not a word of all that Moses commanded, which Joshua read not before all the congregation of Israel, with the women, and the little ones, and the strangers that were conversant among them
459,, about four hundred men, and said unto them, Shall I go against Ramothgilead to battle, or shall I forbear? And they said, Go up; for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand of the king. 
And Jehoshaphat said, Is there not here a prophet of the LORD besides, that we might enquire of him? 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, There is yet one man, Micaiah the son of Imlah, by whom we may enquire of the LORD: but I hate him; for he doth not prophe
534,nd when he had gathered all the chief priests and scribes of the people together, he demanded of them where Christ should be born. 
And they said unto him, In Bethlehem of Judaea: for thus it is written by the prophet, 
And thou Bethlehem, in the land of Juda, art not the least among the princes of Juda: for out of thee shall come a Governor, that shall rule my people Israel. 
Then Herod, when he had privily called the wise men, enquired of them diligently what time the star appeared. 
And he sent them to Bethlehem, and said, Go
453, Daniel to deliver him: and he laboured till the going down of the sun to deliver him. 
Then these men assembled unto the king, and said unto the king, Know, O king, that the law of the Medes and Persians is, That no decree nor statute which the king establisheth may be changed. 
Then the king commanded, and they brought Daniel, and cast him into the den of lions. Now the king spake and said unto Daniel, Thy God whom thou servest continually, he wil
582,not to circumcise their children, neither to walk after the customs. 
What is it therefore? the multitude must needs come together: for they will hear that thou art come. 
Do therefore this that we say to thee: We have four men which have a vow on them; 
Them take, and purify thyself with them, and be at charges with them, that they may shave their heads: and all may know that those things, whereof they were informed concerning thee, are nothing; but that thou thyself also walkest orderly, and keepest the law. 
As touching the Gentiles which believe, we have written and concl
595,t. 
And now I have this day declared it to you; but ye have not obeyed the voice of the LORD your God, nor any thing for the which he hath sent me unto you. 
Now therefore know certainly that ye shall die by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence, in the place whither ye desire to go and to sojourn. 
And it came to pass, that when Jeremiah had made an end of speaking unto all the people all the words of the LORD their God, for which the LORD their God had sent him to them, even all these words, 
Then spake Azariah the son of Hoshaiah, and Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the pr
428, am not worthy of the least of all the mercies, and of all the truth, which thou hast shewed unto thy servant; for with my staff I passed over this Jordan; and now I am become two bands. 
Deliver me, I pray thee, from the hand of my brother, from the hand of Esau: for I fear him, lest he will come and smite me, and the mother with the children. 
And thou saidst, I will surely do thee good, and make thy seed as the sand of th
442,re no balm in Gilead; is there no physician there? why then is not the health of the daughter of my people recovered? 
Oh that my head were waters, and mine eyes a fountain of tears, that I might weep day and night for the slain of the daughter of my people! 
Oh that I had in the wilderness a lodging place of wayfaring men; that I might leave my people, and go from them! for they be all adulterers, an assembly of treacherous men. 
And the
598,go up to the mountain of the LORD, and to the house of the God of Jacob; and he will teach us of his ways, and we will walk in his paths: for the law shall go forth of Zion, and the word of the LORD from Jerusalem. 
And he shall judge among many people, and rebuke strong nations afar off; and they shall beat their swords into plowshares, and their spears into pruninghooks: nation shall not lift up a sword against nation, neither shall they learn war any more. 
But they shall sit every man under his vine and under his fig tree; and none shall make them afraid: for the mouth of the LORD of hos
414, hath believed our report? and to whom is the arm of the LORD revealed? 
For he shall grow up before him as a tender plant, and as a root out of a dry ground: he hath no form nor comeliness; and when we shall see him, there is no beauty that we should desire him. 
He is despised and rejected of men; a man of sorrows, and acquainted with grief: and we hid as it were our faces from him; he was despised, and we es
474,hat floweth with milk and honey. 
Hear, O Israel: The LORD our God is one LORD: 
And thou shalt love the LORD thy God with all thine heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy might. 
And these words, which I command thee this day, shall be in thine heart: 
And thou shalt teach them diligently unto thy children, and shalt talk of them when thou sittest in thine house, and when thou walkest by the way, and when thou liest down, and when thou risest up. 
And thou shal
495,hou sayest. Then I called the priests, and took an oath of them, that they should do according to this promise. 
Also I shook my lap, and said, So God shake out every man from his house, and from his labour, that performeth not this promise, even thus be he shaken out, and emptied. And all the congregation said, Amen, and praised the LORD. And the people did according to this promise. 
Moreover from the time that I was appointed to be their governor in the land of Judah, from the twentieth 
582,d with a garment; 
He that hath not given forth upon usury, neither hath taken any increase, that hath withdrawn his hand from iniquity, hath executed true judgment between man and man, 
Hath walked in my statutes, and hath kept my judgments, to deal truly; he is just, he shall surely live, saith the Lord GOD. 
If he beget a son that is a robber, a shedder of blood, and that doeth the like to any one of these things, 
And that doeth not any of those duties, but even hath eaten upon the mountains, and defiled his neighbour's wife, 
Hath oppressed the poor and needy, hath spoil
546, heart: I know that this is with thee. 
If I sin, then thou markest me, and thou wilt not acquit me from mine iniquity. 
If I be wicked, woe unto me; and if I be righteous, yet will I not lift up my head. I am full of confusion; therefore see thou mine affliction; 
For it increaseth. Thou huntest me as a fierce lion: and again thou shewest thyself marvellous upon me. 
Thou renewest thy witnesses against me, and increasest thine indignation upon me; changes and war are against me. 
Wherefore then hast thou brought me forth out of the womb? O
449,nd Zadok begat Shallum, 
And Shallum begat Hilkiah, and Hilkiah begat Azariah, 
And Azariah begat Seraiah, and Seraiah begat Jehozadak, 
And Jehozadak went into captivity, when the LORD carried away Judah and Jerusalem by the hand of Nebuchadnezzar. 
The sons of Levi; Gershom, Kohath, and Merari. 
And these be the names of the sons of Gershom; Libni, and Shimei. 
And the sons of Kohath were, Amram, and Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel. 
The sons of
502,Hebron for an inheritance. 
Hebron therefore became the inheritance of Caleb the son of Jephunneh the Kenezite unto this day, because that he wholly followed the LORD God of Israel. 
And the name of Hebron before was Kirjatharba; which Arba was a great man among the Anakims. And the land had rest from war. 
This then was the lot of the tribe of the children of Judah by their families; even to the border of Edom the wilderness of Zin southward was the uttermost part of the south coast. 
And their s
533, all. 
And he took a child, and set him in the midst of them: and when he had taken him in his arms, he said unto them, 
Whosoever shall receive one of such children in my name, receiveth me: and whosoever shall receive me, receiveth not me, but him that sent me. 
And John answered him, saying, Master, we saw one casting out devils in thy name, and he followeth not us: and we forbad him, because he followeth not us. 
But Jesus said, Forbid him not: for there is no man which shall do a miracle in my name, that can lightly speak 
513,one Spirit are we all baptized into one body, whether we be Jews or Gentiles, whether we be bond or free; and have been all made to drink into one Spirit. 
For the body is not one member, but many. 
If the foot shall say, Because I am not the hand, I am not of the body; is it therefore not of the body? 
And if the ear shall say, Because I am not the eye, I am not of the body; is it therefore not of the body? 
If the whole body were an eye, where were the hearing? If the whole were hearing, where were the sme
465,nd Israel his dominion. 
The sea saw it, and fled: Jordan was driven back. 
The mountains skipped like rams, and the little hills like lambs. 
What ailed thee, O thou sea, that thou fleddest? thou Jordan, that thou wast driven back? 
Ye mountains, that ye skipped like rams; and ye little hills, like lambs? 
Tremble, thou earth, at the presence of the Lord, at the presence of the God of Jacob; 
Which turned the rock into a standing water, the flint into a founta
542,tles of Christ. 
But we were gentle among you, even as a nurse cherisheth her children: 
So being affectionately desirous of you, we were willing to have imparted unto you, not the gospel of God only, but also our own souls, because ye were dear unto us. 
For ye remember, brethren, our labour and travail: for labouring night and day, because we would not be chargeable unto any of you, we preached unto you the gospel of God. 
Ye are witnesses, and God also, how holily and justly and unblameably we behaved ourselves among you that believe
584,e beginning of the word of the LORD by Hosea. And the LORD said to Hosea, Go, take unto thee a wife of whoredoms and children of whoredoms: for the land hath committed great whoredom, departing from the LORD. 
So he went and took Gomer the daughter of Diblaim; which conceived, and bare him a son. 
And the LORD said unto him, Call his name Jezreel; for yet a little while, and I will avenge the blood of Jezreel upon the house of Jehu, and will cause to cease the kingdom of the house of Israel. 
And it shall come to pass at that day, that I will break the bow of Israel, in the val
484,the den of lions. Now the king spake and said unto Daniel, Thy God whom thou servest continually, he will deliver thee. 
And a stone was brought, and laid upon the mouth of the den; and the king sealed it with his own signet, and with the signet of his lords; that the purpose might not be changed concerning Daniel. 
Then the king went to his palace, and passed the night fasting: neither were instruments of musick brought before him: and his sleep went from him. 
Then the king aro
403,himself seven other spirits more wicked than himself, and they enter in and dwell there: and the last state of that man is worse than the first. Even so shall it be also unto this wicked generation. 
While he yet talked to the people, behold, his mother and his brethren stood without, desiring to speak with him. 
Then one said unto him, Behold, thy mother and thy brethren stand without, desiring to s
419,e with you all. Amen. 
Paul, an apostle, (not of men, neither by man, but by Jesus Christ, and God the Father, who raised him from the dead;) 
And all the brethren which are with me, unto the churches of Galatia: 
Grace be to you and peace from God the Father, and from our Lord Jesus Christ, 
Who gave himself for our sins, that he might deliver us from this present evil world, according to the will of God and our Fa
561,ters that were upon the top, with pomegranates: and so did he for the other chapiter. 
And the chapiters that were upon the top of the pillars were of lily work in the porch, four cubits. 
And the chapiters upon the two pillars had pomegranates also above, over against the belly which was by the network: and the pomegranates were two hundred in rows round about upon the other chapiter. 
And he set up the pillars in the porch of the temple: and he set up the right pillar, and called the name thereof Jachin: and he set up the left pillar, and called the nam
574,fter him, to commit whoredom with Molech, from among their people. 
And the soul that turneth after such as have familiar spirits, and after wizards, to go a whoring after them, I will even set my face against that soul, and will cut him off from among his people. 
Sanctify yourselves therefore, and be ye holy: for I am the LORD your God. 
And ye shall keep my statutes, and do them: I am the LORD which sanctify you. 
For every one that curseth his father or his mother shall be surely put to death: he hath cursed his father or his mother; his blood shall be upon him. 

569,hat brought thee out of Ur of the Chaldees, to give thee this land to inherit it. 
And he said, LORD God, whereby shall I know that I shall inherit it? 
And he said unto him, Take me an heifer of three years old, and a she goat of three years old, and a ram of three years old, and a turtledove, and a young pigeon. 
And he took unto him all these, and divided them in the midst, and laid each piece one against another: but the birds divided he not. 
And when the fowls came down upon the carcases, Abram drove them away. 
And when the sun was going down, a deep sleep
435,rom Geba to Rimmon south of Jerusalem: and it shall be lifted up, and inhabited in her place, from Benjamin's gate unto the place of the first gate, unto the corner gate, and from the tower of Hananeel unto the king's winepresses. 
And men shall dwell in it, and there shall be no more utter destruction; but Jerusalem shall be safely inhabited. 
And this shall be the plague wherewith the LORD will smite all the people that have foug
599,unto Ahab, As the LORD God of Israel liveth, before whom I stand, there shall not be dew nor rain these years, but according to my word. 
And the word of the LORD came unto him, saying, 
Get thee hence, and turn thee eastward, and hide thyself by the brook Cherith, that is before Jordan. 
And it shall be, that thou shalt drink of the brook; and I have commanded the ravens to feed thee there. 
So he went and did according unto the word of the LORD: for he went and dwelt by the brook Cherith, that is before Jordan. 
And the ravens brought him bread and flesh in the morning, and bread and flesh 
546,hat sojourneth among them, for a statute for ever. 
He that toucheth the dead body of any man shall be unclean seven days. 
He shall purify himself with it on the third day, and on the seventh day he shall be clean: but if he purify not himself the third day, then the seventh day he shall not be clean. 
Whosoever toucheth the dead body of any man that is dead, and purifieth not himself, defileth the tabernacle of the LORD; and that soul shall be cut off from Israel: because the water of separation was not sprinkled upon him, he shall be unc
449,r. 
But Zerubbabel, and Jeshua, and the rest of the chief of the fathers of Israel, said unto them, Ye have nothing to do with us to build an house unto our God; but we ourselves together will build unto the LORD God of Israel, as king Cyrus the king of Persia hath commanded us. 
Then the people of the land weakened the hands of the people of Judah, and troubled them in building, 
And hired counsellors against them, to frustrate their purpose, a
547,ng to have imparted unto you, not the gospel of God only, but also our own souls, because ye were dear unto us. 
For ye remember, brethren, our labour and travail: for labouring night and day, because we would not be chargeable unto any of you, we preached unto you the gospel of God. 
Ye are witnesses, and God also, how holily and justly and unblameably we behaved ourselves among you that believe: 
As ye know how we exhorted and comforted and charged every one of you, as a father doth his children, 
That ye would walk worthy of God, who hath
560, 
Because ye have said, The LORD hath raised us up prophets in Babylon; 
Know that thus saith the LORD of the king that sitteth upon the throne of David, and of all the people that dwelleth in this city, and of your brethren that are not gone forth with you into captivity; 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Behold, I will send upon them the sword, the famine, and the pestilence, and will make them like vile figs, that cannot be eaten, they are so evil. 
And I will persecute them with the sword, with the famine, and with the pestilence, and will deliver them 
599,give me more than twelve legions of angels? 
But how then shall the scriptures be fulfilled, that thus it must be? 
In that same hour said Jesus to the multitudes, Are ye come out as against a thief with swords and staves for to take me? I sat daily with you teaching in the temple, and ye laid no hold on me. 
But all this was done, that the scriptures of the prophets might be fulfilled. Then all the disciples forsook him, and fled. 
And they that had laid hold on Jesus led him away to Caiaphas the high priest, where the scribes and the elders were assembled. 
But Peter followed him afar off u
577, their families. 
And their border was Helkath, and Hali, and Beten, and Achshaph, 
And Alammelech, and Amad, and Misheal; and reacheth to Carmel westward, and to Shihorlibnath; 
And turneth toward the sunrising to Bethdagon, and reacheth to Zebulun, and to the valley of Jiphthahel toward the north side of Bethemek, and Neiel, and goeth out to Cabul on the left hand, 
And Hebron, and Rehob, and Hammon, and Kanah, even unto great Zidon; 
And then the coast turneth to Ramah, and to the strong city Tyre; and the coast turneth to Hosah; and the outgoings thereof are at the s
421,e sent and called Barak the son of Abinoam out of Kedeshnaphtali, and said unto him, Hath not the LORD God of Israel commanded, saying, Go and draw toward mount Tabor, and take with thee ten thousand men of the children of Naphtali and of the children of Zebulun? 
And I will draw unto thee to the river Kishon Sisera, the captain of Jabin's army, with his chariots and his multitude; and I will deliver him into thine ha
426,atter into all the winds. 
Wherefore, as I live, saith the Lord GOD; Surely, because thou hast defiled my sanctuary with all thy detestable things, and with all thine abominations, therefore will I also diminish thee; neither shall mine eye spare, neither will I have any pity. 
A third part of thee shall die with the pestilence, and with famine shall they be consumed in the midst of thee: and a third part shall fall by the
472,ltitude of people; and will give this land to thy seed after thee for an everlasting possession. 
And now thy two sons, Ephraim and Manasseh, which were born unto thee in the land of Egypt before I came unto thee into Egypt, are mine; as Reuben and Simeon, they shall be mine. 
And thy issue, which thou begettest after them, shall be thine, and shall be called after the name of their brethren in their inheritance. 
And as for me, when I came from Padan, Rachel died by 
582,because ye have sinned against the LORD, and have not obeyed his voice, therefore this thing is come upon you. 
And now, behold, I loose thee this day from the chains which were upon thine hand. If it seem good unto thee to come with me into Babylon, come; and I will look well unto thee: but if it seem ill unto thee to come with me into Babylon, forbear: behold, all the land is before thee: whither it seemeth good and convenient for thee to go, thither go. 
Now while he was not yet gone back, he said, Go back also to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan, whom the kin
530, and have sent me away from you? 
And they said, We saw certainly that the LORD was with thee: and we said, Let there be now an oath betwixt us, even betwixt us and thee, and let us make a covenant with thee; 
That thou wilt do us no hurt, as we have not touched thee, and as we have done unto thee nothing but good, and have sent thee away in peace: thou art now the blessed of the LORD. 
And he made them a feast, and they did eat and drink. 
And they rose up betimes in the morning, and sware one to another: and Isaac sent the
576,thee; but the wind shall carry them all away; vanity shall take them: but he that putteth his trust in me shall possess the land, and shall inherit my holy mountain; 
And shall say, Cast ye up, cast ye up, prepare the way, take up the stumblingblock out of the way of my people. 
For thus saith the high and lofty One that inhabiteth eternity, whose name is Holy; I dwell in the high and holy place, with him also that is of a contrite and humble spirit, to revive the spirit of the humble, and to revive the heart of the contrite ones. 
For I will not contend for ever, neith
478,y of five shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary, which is twenty gerahs. 
But the firstling of a cow, or the firstling of a sheep, or the firstling of a goat, thou shalt not redeem; they are holy: thou shalt sprinkle their blood upon the altar, and shalt burn their fat for an offering made by fire, for a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And the flesh of them shall be thine, as the wave breast and as the right shoulder are thine. 
All the heave offerings of the holy things,
523,th child by their father. 
And the first born bare a son, and called his name Moab: the same is the father of the Moabites unto this day. 
And the younger, she also bare a son, and called his name Benammi: the same is the father of the children of Ammon unto this day. 
And Abraham journeyed from thence toward the south country, and dwelled between Kadesh and Shur, and sojourned in Gerar. 
And Abraham said of Sarah his wife, She is my sister: and Abimelech king of Gerar sent, and took Sarah. 
But God came to Abimelech 
494,ecessity, but willingly. 
For perhaps he therefore departed for a season, that thou shouldest receive him for ever; 
Not now as a servant, but above a servant, a brother beloved, specially to me, but how much more unto thee, both in the flesh, and in the Lord? 
If thou count me therefore a partner, receive him as myself. 
If he hath wronged thee, or oweth thee ought, put that on mine account; 
I Paul have written it with mine own hand, I will repay it: albeit I do not say to thee how thou 
443,hen I was in distress; have mercy upon me, and hear my prayer. 
O ye sons of men, how long will ye turn my glory into shame? how long will ye love vanity, and seek after leasing? Selah. 
But know that the LORD hath set apart him that is godly for himself: the LORD will hear when I call unto him. 
Stand in awe, and sin not: commune with your own heart upon your bed, and be still. Selah. 
Offer the sacrifices of righteousness, and put your t
469, O Daniel, a man greatly beloved, understand the words that I speak unto thee, and stand upright: for unto thee am I now sent. And when he had spoken this word unto me, I stood trembling. 
Then said he unto me, Fear not, Daniel: for from the first day that thou didst set thine heart to understand, and to chasten thyself before thy God, thy words were heard, and I am come for thy words. 
But the prince of the kingdom of Persia withstood me one and twenty days: but, 
438,e priest, who numbered the children of Israel in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho. 
But among these there was not a man of them whom Moses and Aaron the priest numbered, when they numbered the children of Israel in the wilderness of Sinai. 
For the LORD had said of them, They shall surely die in the wilderness. And there was not left a man of them, save Caleb the son of Jephunneh, and Joshua the son of Nun. 
Then came the dau
423,f the innocent. 
The earth is given into the hand of the wicked: he covereth the faces of the judges thereof; if not, where, and who is he? 
Now my days are swifter than a post: they flee away, they see no good. 
They are passed away as the swift ships: as the eagle that hasteth to the prey. 
If I say, I will forget my complaint, I will leave off my heaviness, and comfort myself: 
I am afraid of all my sorrows, I know t
425,e unto Lehi, the Philistines shouted against him: and the Spirit of the LORD came mightily upon him, and the cords that were upon his arms became as flax that was burnt with fire, and his bands loosed from off his hands. 
And he found a new jawbone of an ass, and put forth his hand, and took it, and slew a thousand men therewith. 
And Samson said, With the jawbone of an ass, heaps upon heaps, with the jaw of an ass have I
421, aged, and now also a prisoner of Jesus Christ. 
I beseech thee for my son Onesimus, whom I have begotten in my bonds: 
Which in time past was to thee unprofitable, but now profitable to thee and to me: 
Whom I have sent again: thou therefore receive him, that is, mine own bowels: 
Whom I would have retained with me, that in thy stead he might have ministered unto me in the bonds of the gospel: 
But without thy mind w
562,sight, as they that go forth into captivity. 
Dig thou through the wall in their sight, and carry out thereby. 
In their sight shalt thou bear it upon thy shoulders, and carry it forth in the twilight: thou shalt cover thy face, that thou see not the ground: for I have set thee for a sign unto the house of Israel. 
And I did so as I was commanded: I brought forth my stuff by day, as stuff for captivity, and in the even I digged through the wall with mine hand; I brought it forth in the twilight, and I bare it upon my shoulder in their sight. 
And in the mo
462,gel that talked with me went forth, and another angel went out to meet him, 
And said unto him, Run, speak to this young man, saying, Jerusalem shall be inhabited as towns without walls for the multitude of men and cattle therein: 
For I, saith the LORD, will be unto her a wall of fire round about, and will be the glory in the midst of her. 
Ho, ho, come forth, and flee from the land of the north, saith the LORD: for I have spread you abroad as the four wind
499,d up for me against the workers of iniquity? 
Unless the LORD had been my help, my soul had almost dwelt in silence. 
When I said, My foot slippeth; thy mercy, O LORD, held me up. 
In the multitude of my thoughts within me thy comforts delight my soul. 
Shall the throne of iniquity have fellowship with thee, which frameth mischief by a law? 
They gather themselves together against the soul of the righteous, and condemn the innocent blood. 
But the LORD is my defence; and my God is the rock of m
517,gave them drink as out of the great depths. 
He brought streams also out of the rock, and caused waters to run down like rivers. 
And they sinned yet more against him by provoking the most High in the wilderness. 
And they tempted God in their heart by asking meat for their lust. 
Yea, they spake against God; they said, Can God furnish a table in the wilderness? 
Behold, he smote the rock, that the waters gushed out, and the streams overflowed; can he give bread also? can he provide flesh for his people? 
Theref
476,
And Moses said unto Aaron, Take a censer, and put fire therein from off the altar, and put on incense, and go quickly unto the congregation, and make an atonement for them: for there is wrath gone out from the LORD; the plague is begun. 
And Aaron took as Moses commanded, and ran into the midst of the congregation; and, behold, the plague was begun among the people: and he put on incense, and made an atonement for the people. 
And he stood between the dead and the living
523, eat with unwashen hands defileth not a man. 
Then Jesus went thence, and departed into the coasts of Tyre and Sidon. 
And, behold, a woman of Canaan came out of the same coasts, and cried unto him, saying, Have mercy on me, O Lord, thou son of David; my daughter is grievously vexed with a devil. 
But he answered her not a word. And his disciples came and besought him, saying, Send her away; for she crieth after us. 
But he answered and said, I am not sent but unto the lost sheep of the house of Israel. 
Then came she
500,trength, and the kingdom of our God, and the power of his Christ: for the accuser of our brethren is cast down, which accused them before our God day and night. 
And they overcame him by the blood of the Lamb, and by the word of their testimony; and they loved not their lives unto the death. 
Therefore rejoice, ye heavens, and ye that dwell in them. Woe to the inhabiters of the earth and of the sea! for the devil is come down unto you, having great wrath, because he knoweth that he hath but a sh
597,atutes of life, without committing iniquity; he shall surely live, he shall not die. 
None of his sins that he hath committed shall be mentioned unto him: he hath done that which is lawful and right; he shall surely live. 
Yet the children of thy people say, The way of the Lord is not equal: but as for them, their way is not equal. 
When the righteous turneth from his righteousness, and committeth iniquity, he shall even die thereby. 
But if the wicked turn from his wickedness, and do that which is lawful and right, he shall live thereby. 
Yet ye say, The way of the Lord is not equal. O ye 
413,ty: 
Thou shalt furnish him liberally out of thy flock, and out of thy floor, and out of thy winepress: of that wherewith the LORD thy God hath blessed thee thou shalt give unto him. 
And thou shalt remember that thou wast a bondman in the land of Egypt, and the LORD thy God redeemed thee: therefore I command thee this thing to day. 
And it shall be, if he say unto thee, I will not go away from thee; because h
595,d not unto them; as the LORD had said. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Pharaoh's heart is hardened, he refuseth to let the people go. 
Get thee unto Pharaoh in the morning; lo, he goeth out unto the water; and thou shalt stand by the river's brink against he come; and the rod which was turned to a serpent shalt thou take in thine hand. 
And thou shalt say unto him, The LORD God of the Hebrews hath sent me unto thee, saying, Let my people go, that they may serve me in the wilderness: and, behold, hitherto thou wouldest not hear. 
Thus saith the LORD, In this thou shalt know that I am the LO
430,servants with the edge of the sword; and I only am escaped alone to tell thee. 
While he was yet speaking, there came also another, and said, The fire of God is fallen from heaven, and hath burned up the sheep, and the servants, and consumed them; and I only am escaped alone to tell thee. 
While he was yet speaking, there came also another, and said, The Chaldeans made out three bands, and fell upon the camels, and have carrie
498,his young man thrust him through, and he died. 
And when the men of Israel saw that Abimelech was dead, they departed every man unto his place. 
Thus God rendered the wickedness of Abimelech, which he did unto his father, in slaying his seventy brethren: 
And all the evil of the men of Shechem did God render upon their heads: and upon them came the curse of Jotham the son of Jerubbaal. 
And after Abimelech there arose to defend Israel Tola the son of Puah, the son of Dodo, a man of Issachar; a
428,rnacle, and called Aaron and Miriam: and they both came forth. 
And he said, Hear now my words: If there be a prophet among you, I the LORD will make myself known unto him in a vision, and will speak unto him in a dream. 
My servant Moses is not so, who is faithful in all mine house. 
With him will I speak mouth to mouth, even apparently, and not in dark speeches; and the similitude of the LORD shall he behold: wherefore the
465,also another, and said, Thy sons and thy daughters were eating and drinking wine in their eldest brother's house: 
And, behold, there came a great wind from the wilderness, and smote the four corners of the house, and it fell upon the young men, and they are dead; and I only am escaped alone to tell thee. 
Then Job arose, and rent his mantle, and shaved his head, and fell down upon the ground, and worshipped, 
And said, Naked came I out of my mother's womb, and
543,
Then said Jonathan unto David, Whatsoever thy soul desireth, I will even do it for thee. 
And David said unto Jonathan, Behold, to morrow is the new moon, and I should not fail to sit with the king at meat: but let me go, that I may hide myself in the field unto the third day at even. 
If thy father at all miss me, then say, David earnestly asked leave of me that he might run to Bethlehem his city: for there is a yearly sacrifice there for all the family. 
If he say thus, It is well; thy servant shall have peace: but if he be very wroth
556, of Egypt, them they had not circumcised. 
For the children of Israel walked forty years in the wilderness, till all the people that were men of war, which came out of Egypt, were consumed, because they obeyed not the voice of the LORD: unto whom the LORD sware that he would not shew them the land, which the LORD sware unto their fathers that he would give us, a land that floweth with milk and honey. 
And their children, whom he raised up in their stead, them Joshua circumcised: for they were uncircumcised, because they had not circumcised them by th
430,Forsaken; neither shall thy land any more be termed Desolate: but thou shalt be called Hephzibah, and thy land Beulah: for the LORD delighteth in thee, and thy land shall be married. 
For as a young man marrieth a virgin, so shall thy sons marry thee: and as the bridegroom rejoiceth over the bride, so shall thy God rejoice over thee. 
I have set watchmen upon thy walls, O Jerusalem, which shall never hold their peace day nor n
592, that none should serve themselves of them any more, then they obeyed, and let them go. 
But afterward they turned, and caused the servants and the handmaids, whom they had let go free, to return, and brought them into subjection for servants and for handmaids. 
Therefore the word of the LORD came to Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel; I made a covenant with your fathers in the day that I brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, out of the house of bondmen, saying, 
At the end of seven years let ye go every man his brother an Hebrew, which hath 
452, LORD came unto me, saying, 
Take of them of the captivity, even of Heldai, of Tobijah, and of Jedaiah, which are come from Babylon, and come thou the same day, and go into the house of Josiah the son of Zephaniah; 
Then take silver and gold, and make crowns, and set them upon the head of Joshua the son of Josedech, the high priest; 
And speak unto him, saying, Thus speaketh the LORD of hosts, saying, Behold the man whose name is The BRANCH; and he
459, 
And if they will learn any thing, let them ask their husbands at home: for it is a shame for women to speak in the church. 
What? came the word of God out from you? or came it unto you only? 
If any man think himself to be a prophet, or spiritual, let him acknowledge that the things that I write unto you are the commandments of the Lord. 
But if any man be ignorant, let him be ignorant. 
Wherefore, brethren, covet to prophesy, and forbid not to speak wi
505,way captive, and pray unto thee toward their land, which thou gavest unto their fathers, the city which thou hast chosen, and the house which I have built for thy name: 
Then hear thou their prayer and their supplication in heaven thy dwelling place, and maintain their cause, 
And forgive thy people that have sinned against thee, and all their transgressions wherein they have transgressed against thee, and give them compassion before them who carried them captive, that they may have compassion on the
580,: and the sons of Elah, even Kenaz. 
And the sons of Jehaleleel; Ziph, and Ziphah, Tiria, and Asareel. 
And the sons of Ezra were, Jether, and Mered, and Epher, and Jalon: and she bare Miriam, and Shammai, and Ishbah the father of Eshtemoa. 
And his wife Jehudijah bare Jered the father of Gedor, and Heber the father of Socho, and Jekuthiel the father of Zanoah. And these are the sons of Bithiah the daughter of Pharaoh, which Mered took. 
And the sons of his wife Hodiah the sister of Naham, the father of Keilah the Garmite, and Eshtemoa the Maachathite. 
And the sons of Shim
483,eeping for her children refused to be comforted for her children, because they were not. 
Thus saith the LORD; Refrain thy voice from weeping, and thine eyes from tears: for thy work shall be rewarded, saith the LORD; and they shall come again from the land of the enemy. 
And there is hope in thine end, saith the LORD, that thy children shall come again to their own border. 
I have surely heard Ephraim bemoaning himself thus; Thou hast chastised me, and I was chastised, as a bul
478,t thou, my son? 
And Jacob said unto his father, I am Esau thy first born; I have done according as thou badest me: arise, I pray thee, sit and eat of my venison, that thy soul may bless me. 
And Isaac said unto his son, How is it that thou hast found it so quickly, my son? And he said, Because the LORD thy God brought it to me. 
And Isaac said unto Jacob, Come near, I pray thee, that I may feel thee, my son, whether thou be my very son Esau or not. 
And Jacob went near unt
567,ce and possession of the king, and of his sons, with the officers, and with the mighty men, and with all the valiant men, unto Jerusalem. 
Then David the king stood up upon his feet, and said, Hear me, my brethren, and my people: As for me, I had in mine heart to build an house of rest for the ark of the covenant of the LORD, and for the footstool of our God, and had made ready for the building: 
But God said unto me, Thou shalt not build an house for my name, because thou hast been a man of war, and hast shed blood. 
Howbeit the LORD God of Israel chose me bef
503,, the LORD our God hath shewed us his glory and his greatness, and we have heard his voice out of the midst of the fire: we have seen this day that God doth talk with man, and he liveth. 
Now therefore why should we die? for this great fire will consume us: if we hear the voice of the LORD our God any more, then we shall die. 
For who is there of all flesh, that hath heard the voice of the living God speaking out of the midst of the fire, as we have, and lived? 
Go thou near, and hear all that the 
485, days to come shall all be forgotten. And how dieth the wise man? as the fool. 
Therefore I hated life; because the work that is wrought under the sun is grievous unto me: for all is vanity and vexation of spirit. 
Yea, I hated all my labour which I had taken under the sun: because I should leave it unto the man that shall be after me. 
And who knoweth whether he shall be a wise man or a fool? yet shall he have rule over all my labour wherein I have laboured, and wherein I have sh
465,imed, or having a wen, or scurvy, or scabbed, ye shall not offer these unto the LORD, nor make an offering by fire of them upon the altar unto the LORD. 
Either a bullock or a lamb that hath any thing superfluous or lacking in his parts, that mayest thou offer for a freewill offering; but for a vow it shall not be accepted. 
Ye shall not offer unto the LORD that which is bruised, or crushed, or broken, or cut; neither shall ye make any offering thereof in your 
473,ople; and aforetime I was as a tabret. 
Mine eye also is dim by reason of sorrow, and all my members are as a shadow. 
Upright men shall be astonied at this, and the innocent shall stir up himself against the hypocrite. 
The righteous also shall hold on his way, and he that hath clean hands shall be stronger and stronger. 
But as for you all, do ye return, and come now: for I cannot find one wise man among you. 
My days are past, my purposes are broken off, even the th
467, take counsel together. 
Then I sent unto him, saying, There are no such things done as thou sayest, but thou feignest them out of thine own heart. 
For they all made us afraid, saying, Their hands shall be weakened from the work, that it be not done. Now therefore, O God, strengthen my hands. 
Afterward I came unto the house of Shemaiah the son of Delaiah the son of Mehetabeel, who was shut up; and he said, Let us meet together in the house of God, within the te
467,nd the Egyptian had a spear in his hand; but he went down to him with a staff, and plucked the spear out of the Egyptian's hand, and slew him with his own spear. 
These things did Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and had the name among three mighty men. 
He was more honourable than the thirty, but he attained not to the first three. And David set him over his guard. 
Asahel the brother of Joab was one of the thirty; Elhanan the son of Dodo of Bethlehem, 
Shammah the 
420,he midst of the waters, and let it divide the waters from the waters. 
And God made the firmament, and divided the waters which were under the firmament from the waters which were above the firmament: and it was so. 
And God called the firmament Heaven. And the evening and the morning were the second day. 
And God said, Let the waters under the heaven be gathered together unto one place, and let the dry land appear: 
591,the law am dead to the law, that I might live unto God. 
I am crucified with Christ: neverthless I live; yet not I, but Christ liveth in me: and the life which I now live in the flesh I live by the faith of the Son of God, who loved me, and gave himself for me. 
I do not frustrate the grace of God: for if righteousness come by the law, then Christ is dead in vain. 
O foolish Galatians, who hath bewitched you, that ye should not obey the truth, before whose eyes Jesus Christ hath been evidently set forth, crucified among you? 
This only would I learn of you, Received ye the Spirit by t
526,first: that the princes might give accounts unto them, and the king should have no damage. 
Then this Daniel was preferred above the presidents and princes, because an excellent spirit was in him; and the king thought to set him over the whole realm. 
Then the presidents and princes sought to find occasion against Daniel concerning the kingdom; but they could find none occasion nor fault; forasmuch as he was faithful, neither was there any error or fault found in him. 
Then said these men, We shall not find any occasion 
470,uirest after mine iniquity, and searchest after my sin? 
Thou knowest that I am not wicked; and there is none that can deliver out of thine hand. 
Thine hands have made me and fashioned me together round about; yet thou dost destroy me. 
Remember, I beseech thee, that thou hast made me as the clay; and wilt thou bring me into dust again? 
Hast thou not poured me out as milk, and curdled me like cheese? 
Thou hast clothed me with skin and flesh, and hast fenced me wi
571, And the woman said unto Joab, Behold, his head shall be thrown to thee over the wall. 
Then the woman went unto all the people in her wisdom. And they cut off the head of Sheba the son of Bichri, and cast it out to Joab. And he blew a trumpet, and they retired from the city, every man to his tent. And Joab returned to Jerusalem unto the king. 
Now Joab was over all the host of Israel: and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada was over the Cherethites and over the Pelethites: 
And Adoram was over the tribute: and Jehoshaphat the son of Ahilud was recorder: 
And Sheva was scr
468,shech, and Tiras. 
And the sons of Gomer; Ashchenaz, and Riphath, and Togarmah. 
And the sons of Javan; Elishah, and Tarshish, Kittim, and Dodanim. 
The sons of Ham; Cush, and Mizraim, Put, and Canaan. 
And the sons of Cush; Seba, and Havilah, and Sabta, and Raamah, and Sabtecha. And the sons of Raamah; Sheba, and Dedan. 
And Cush begat Nimrod: he began to be mighty upon the earth. 
And Mizraim begat Ludim, and Anamim, and Lehabim, and Naphtuhim, 
And Pathrusim, a
479,en were plowing, and the asses feeding beside them: 
And the Sabeans fell upon them, and took them away; yea, they have slain the servants with the edge of the sword; and I only am escaped alone to tell thee. 
While he was yet speaking, there came also another, and said, The fire of God is fallen from heaven, and hath burned up the sheep, and the servants, and consumed them; and I only am escaped alone to tell thee. 
While he was yet speaking, there came also another, and sa
476, by weight he gave gold for the tables of shewbread, for every table; and likewise silver for the tables of silver: 
Also pure gold for the fleshhooks, and the bowls, and the cups: and for the golden basons he gave gold by weight for every bason; and likewise silver by weight for every bason of silver: 
And for the altar of incense refined gold by weight; and gold for the pattern of the chariot of the cherubims, that spread out their wings, and covered the ark of the cove
598,ays be few; and let another take his office. 
Let his children be fatherless, and his wife a widow. 
Let his children be continually vagabonds, and beg: let them seek their bread also out of their desolate places. 
Let the extortioner catch all that he hath; and let the strangers spoil his labour. 
Let there be none to extend mercy unto him: neither let there be any to favour his fatherless children. 
Let his posterity be cut off; and in the generation following let their name be blotted out. 
Let the iniquity of his fathers be remembered with the LORD; and let not the sin of his mother be b
579,and being fervent in the spirit, he spake and taught diligently the things of the Lord, knowing only the baptism of John. 
And he began to speak boldly in the synagogue: whom when Aquila and Priscilla had heard, they took him unto them, and expounded unto him the way of God more perfectly. 
And when he was disposed to pass into Achaia, the brethren wrote, exhorting the disciples to receive him: who, when he was come, helped them much which had believed through grace: 
For he mightily convinced the Jews, and that publickly, shewing by the scriptures that Jesus was Christ. 

589,enjamin on the third day, and put themselves in array against Gibeah, as at other times. 
And the children of Benjamin went out against the people, and were drawn away from the city; and they began to smite of the people, and kill, as at other times, in the highways, of which one goeth up to the house of God, and the other to Gibeah in the field, about thirty men of Israel. 
And the children of Benjamin said, They are smitten down before us, as at the first. But the children of Israel said, Let us flee, and draw them from the city unto the highways. 
And all the men of Israel rose u
402, and Gedaliah. 
And they gave their hands that they would put away their wives; and being guilty, they offered a ram of the flock for their trespass. 
And of the sons of Immer; Hanani, and Zebadiah. 
And of the sons of Harim; Maaseiah, and Elijah, and Shemaiah, and Jehiel, and Uzziah. 
And of the sons of Pashur; Elioenai, Maaseiah, Ishmael, Nethaneel, Jozabad, and Elasah. 
Also of the Levites; Jozab
477,etch my knowledge from afar, and will ascribe righteousness to my Maker. 
For truly my words shall not be false: he that is perfect in knowledge is with thee. 
Behold, God is mighty, and despiseth not any: he is mighty in strength and wisdom. 
He preserveth not the life of the wicked: but giveth right to the poor. 
He withdraweth not his eyes from the righteous: but with kings are they on the throne; yea, he doth establish them for ever, and they are exalted. 
And if they 
484,e him afraid. 
For I am with thee, saith the LORD, to save thee: though I make a full end of all nations whither I have scattered thee, yet I will not make a full end of thee: but I will correct thee in measure, and will not leave thee altogether unpunished. 
For thus saith the LORD, Thy bruise is incurable, and thy wound is grievous. 
There is none to plead thy cause, that thou mayest be bound up: thou hast no healing medicines. 
All thy lovers have forgotten thee; they seek the
541, taken up between the heaven and the earth; and the mule that was under him went away. 
And a certain man saw it, and told Joab, and said, Behold, I saw Absalom hanged in an oak. 
And Joab said unto the man that told him, And, behold, thou sawest him, and why didst thou not smite him there to the ground? and I would have given thee ten shekels of silver, and a girdle. 
And the man said unto Joab, Though I should receive a thousand shekels of silver in mine hand, yet would I not put forth mine hand against the king's son: for in our hea
567,, and that he had spoken these things unto her. 
Then the same day at evening, being the first day of the week, when the doors were shut where the disciples were assembled for fear of the Jews, came Jesus and stood in the midst, and saith unto them, Peace be unto you. 
And when he had so said, he shewed unto them his hands and his side. Then were the disciples glad, when they saw the LORD. 
Then said Jesus to them again, Peace be unto you: as my Father hath sent me, even so send I you. 
And when he had said this, he breathed on them, and saith unto them, Receiv
599,el, southward; and the border descended to Atarothadar, near the hill that lieth on the south side of the nether Bethhoron. 
And the border was drawn thence, and compassed the corner of the sea southward, from the hill that lieth before Bethhoron southward; and the goings out thereof were at Kirjathbaal, which is Kirjathjearim, a city of the children of Judah: this was the west quarter. 
And the south quarter was from the end of Kirjathjearim, and the border went out on the west, and went out to the well of waters of Nephtoah: 
And the border came down to the end of the mountain that lieth be
523,came out of the throne, saying, Praise our God, all ye his servants, and ye that fear him, both small and great. 
And I heard as it were the voice of a great multitude, and as the voice of many waters, and as the voice of mighty thunderings, saying, Alleluia: for the Lord God omnipotent reigneth. 
Let us be glad and rejoice, and give honour to him: for the marriage of the Lamb is come, and his wife hath made herself ready. 
And to her was granted that she should be arrayed in fine linen, clean and white: for the fine 
550, shall never hunger; and he that believeth on me shall never thirst. 
But I said unto you, That ye also have seen me, and believe not. 
All that the Father giveth me shall come to me; and him that cometh to me I will in no wise cast out. 
For I came down from heaven, not to do mine own will, but the will of him that sent me. 
And this is the Father's will which hath sent me, that of all which he hath given me I should lose nothing, but should raise it up again at the last day. 
And this is the will of him that sent me, that every one which seet
409,; even so now yield your members servants to righteousness unto holiness. 
For when ye were the servants of sin, ye were free from righteousness. 
What fruit had ye then in those things whereof ye are now ashamed? for the end of those things is death. 
But now being made free from sin, and become servants to God, ye have your fruit unto holiness, and the end everlasting life. 
For the wages of sin is death
417,l confess to thee among the Gentiles, and sing unto thy name. 
And again he saith, Rejoice, ye Gentiles, with his people. 
And again, Praise the Lord, all ye Gentiles; and laud him, all ye people. 
And again, Esaias saith, There shall be a root of Jesse, and he that shall rise to reign over the Gentiles; in him shall the Gentiles trust. 
Now the God of hope fill you with all joy and peace in believing, that ye may
420,counsel: 
But lusted exceedingly in the wilderness, and tempted God in the desert. 
And he gave them their request; but sent leanness into their soul. 
They envied Moses also in the camp, and Aaron the saint of the LORD. 
The earth opened and swallowed up Dathan and covered the company of Abiram. 
And a fire was kindled in their company; the flame burned up the wicked. 
They made a calf in Horeb, and worshipped the m
579, gold, and vessels of brass: 
Which also king David did dedicate unto the LORD, with the silver and gold that he had dedicated of all nations which he subdued; 
Of Syria, and of Moab, and of the children of Ammon, and of the Philistines, and of Amalek, and of the spoil of Hadadezer, son of Rehob, king of Zobah. 
And David gat him a name when he returned from smiting of the Syrians in the valley of salt, being eighteen thousand men. 
And he put garrisons in Edom; throughout all Edom put he garrisons, and all they of Edom became David's servants. And the LORD preserved David
554,e answer of the tongue, is from the LORD. 
All the ways of a man are clean in his own eyes; but the LORD weigheth the spirits. 
Commit thy works unto the LORD, and thy thoughts shall be established. 
The LORD hath made all things for himself: yea, even the wicked for the day of evil. 
Every one that is proud in heart is an abomination to the LORD: though hand join in hand, he shall not be unpunished. 
By mercy and truth iniquity is purged: and by the fear of the LORD men depart from evil. 
When a man's ways please the LORD, he maketh even his enemi
488,oice, harden not your hearts, as in the provocation. 
For some, when they had heard, did provoke: howbeit not all that came out of Egypt by Moses. 
But with whom was he grieved forty years? was it not with them that had sinned, whose carcases fell in the wilderness? 
And to whom sware he that they should not enter into his rest, but to them that believed not? 
So we see that they could not enter in because of unbelief. 
Let us therefore fear, lest, a promise being left us of entering
577,cks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the fifth day nine bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first year without spot: 
And their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, and his dri
496,and the dam sitting upon the young, or upon the eggs, thou shalt not take the dam with the young: 
But thou shalt in any wise let the dam go, and take the young to thee; that it may be well with thee, and that thou mayest prolong thy days. 
When thou buildest a new house, then thou shalt make a battlement for thy roof, that thou bring not blood upon thine house, if any man fall from thence. 
Thou shalt not sow thy vineyard with divers seeds: lest the fruit of thy seed which thou hast sown, a
430, 
Who goeth a warfare any time at his own charges? who planteth a vineyard, and eateth not of the fruit thereof? or who feedeth a flock, and eateth not of the milk of the flock? 
Say I these things as a man? or saith not the law the same also? 
For it is written in the law of Moses, thou shalt not muzzle the mouth of the ox that treadeth out the corn. Doth God take care for oxen? 
Or saith he it altogether for our sakes? For o
504,el may enjoy every man the inheritance of his fathers. 
Neither shall the inheritance remove from one tribe to another tribe; but every one of the tribes of the children of Israel shall keep himself to his own inheritance. 
Even as the LORD commanded Moses, so did the daughters of Zelophehad: 
For Mahlah, Tirzah, and Hoglah, and Milcah, and Noah, the daughters of Zelophehad, were married unto their fathers brothers' sons: 
And they were married into the families of the sons of Manasseh the son of Jo
516,the three hundred men that lapped will I save you, and deliver the Midianites into thine hand: and let all the other people go every man unto his place. 
So the people took victuals in their hand, and their trumpets: and he sent all the rest of Israel every man unto his tent, and retained those three hundred men: and the host of Midian was beneath him in the valley. 
And it came to pass the same night, that the LORD said unto him, Arise, get thee down unto the host; for I have delivered it into thine hand. 
But
414,hese servants to be called unto him, to whom he had given the money, that he might know how much every man had gained by trading. 
Then came the first, saying, Lord, thy pound hath gained ten pounds. 
And he said unto him, Well, thou good servant: because thou hast been faithful in a very little, have thou authority over ten cities. 
And the second came, saying, Lord, thy pound hath gained five pounds. 
And he 
556,old. 
When the Almighty scattered kings in it, it was white as snow in Salmon. 
The hill of God is as the hill of Bashan; an high hill as the hill of Bashan. 
Why leap ye, ye high hills? this is the hill which God desireth to dwell in; yea, the LORD will dwell in it for ever. 
The chariots of God are twenty thousand, even thousands of angels: the Lord is among them, as in Sinai, in the holy place. 
Thou hast ascended on high, thou hast led captivity captive: thou hast received gifts for men; yea, for the rebellious also, that the LORD God might dwell
541,nce: redeem thou my right to thyself; for I cannot redeem it. 
Now this was the manner in former time in Israel concerning redeeming and concerning changing, for to confirm all things; a man plucked off his shoe, and gave it to his neighbour: and this was a testimony in Israel. 
Therefore the kinsman said unto Boaz, Buy it for thee. So he drew off his shoe. 
And Boaz said unto the elders, and unto all the people, Ye are witnesses this day, that I have bought all that was Elimelech's, and all that was Chilion's and Mahlon's, of the hand
437,th the LORD GOD;) 
That thou hast also built unto thee an eminent place, and hast made thee an high place in every street. 
Thou hast built thy high place at every head of the way, and hast made thy beauty to be abhorred, and hast opened thy feet to every one that passed by, and multiplied thy whoredoms. 
Thou hast also committed fornication with the Egyptians thy neighbours, great of flesh; and hast increased thy whoredoms, to provo
571,ken the yoke of the king of Babylon. 
Within two full years will I bring again into this place all the vessels of the LORD's house, that Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon took away from this place, and carried them to Babylon: 
And I will bring again to this place Jeconiah the son of Jehoiakim king of Judah, with all the captives of Judah, that went into Babylon, saith the LORD: for I will break the yoke of the king of Babylon. 
Then the prophet Jeremiah said unto the prophet Hananiah in the presence of the priests, and in the presence of all the people that stood in 
561, he might redeem us from all iniquity, and purify unto himself a peculiar people, zealous of good works. 
These things speak, and exhort, and rebuke with all authority. Let no man despise thee. 
Put them in mind to be subject to principalities and powers, to obey magistrates, to be ready to every good work, 
To speak evil of no man, to be no brawlers, but gentle, shewing all meekness unto all men. 
For we ourselves also were sometimes foolish, disobedient, deceived, serving divers lusts and pleasures, living in malice and envy, hateful, and hating one ano
524,thiopia: 
That sendeth ambassadors by the sea, even in vessels of bulrushes upon the waters, saying, Go, ye swift messengers, to a nation scattered and peeled, to a people terrible from their beginning hitherto; a nation meted out and trodden down, whose land the rivers have spoiled! 
All ye inhabitants of the world, and dwellers on the earth, see ye, when he lifteth up an ensign on the mountains; and when he bloweth a trumpet, hear ye. 
For so the LORD said unto me, I will take my rest, and I will consider in my dwell
434,her. 
And Samson said concerning them, Now shall I be more blameless than the Philistines, though I do them a displeasure. 
And Samson went and caught three hundred foxes, and took firebrands, and turned tail to tail, and put a firebrand in the midst between two tails. 
And when he had set the brands on fire, he let them go into the standing corn of the Philistines, and burnt up both the shocks, and also the standing corn, with th
426,ey of the house of Togarmah traded in thy fairs with horses and horsemen and mules. 
The men of Dedan were thy merchants; many isles were the merchandise of thine hand: they brought thee for a present horns of ivory and ebony. 
Syria was thy merchant by reason of the multitude of the wares of thy making: they occupied in thy fairs with emeralds, purple, and broidered work, and fine linen, and coral, and agate. 
Judah, and 
578,fied it: because that in it he had rested from all his work which God created and made. 
These are the generations of the heavens and of the earth when they were created, in the day that the LORD God made the earth and the heavens, 
And every plant of the field before it was in the earth, and every herb of the field before it grew: for the LORD God had not caused it to rain upon the earth, and there was not a man to till the ground. 
But there went up a mist from the earth, and watered the whole face of the ground. 
And the LORD God formed man of the dust of the ground, a
419,bour. 
He coveteth greedily all the day long: but the righteous giveth and spareth not. 
The sacrifice of the wicked is abomination: how much more, when he bringeth it with a wicked mind? 
A false witness shall perish: but the man that heareth speaketh constantly. 
A wicked man hardeneth his face: but as for the upright, he directeth his way. 
There is no wisdom nor understanding nor counsel against the LORD. 
The h
440,d him on the other side of the sea, they said unto him, Rabbi, when camest thou hither? 
Jesus answered them and said, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Ye seek me, not because ye saw the miracles, but because ye did eat of the loaves, and were filled. 
Labour not for the meat which perisheth, but for that meat which endureth unto everlasting life, which the Son of man shall give unto you: for him hath God the Father sealed. 
Then said th
433,es: Hashabiah, Sherebiah, and Jeshua the son of Kadmiel, with their brethren over against them, to praise and to give thanks, according to the commandment of David the man of God, ward over against ward. 
Mattaniah, and Bakbukiah, Obadiah, Meshullam, Talmon, Akkub, were porters keeping the ward at the thresholds of the gates. 
These were in the days of Joiakim the son of Jeshua, the son of Jozadak, and in the days of Nehemiah the
437, cubit the breadth thereof, and a cubit and a half the height thereof. 
And thou shalt overlay it with pure gold, and make thereto a crown of gold round about. 
And thou shalt make unto it a border of an hand breadth round about, and thou shalt make a golden crown to the border thereof round about. 
And thou shalt make for it four rings of gold, and put the rings in the four corners that are on the four feet thereof. 
Over against th
584,d, I will make thee fruitful, and multiply thee, and I will make of thee a multitude of people; and will give this land to thy seed after thee for an everlasting possession. 
And now thy two sons, Ephraim and Manasseh, which were born unto thee in the land of Egypt before I came unto thee into Egypt, are mine; as Reuben and Simeon, they shall be mine. 
And thy issue, which thou begettest after them, shall be thine, and shall be called after the name of their brethren in their inheritance. 
And as for me, when I came from Padan, Rachel died by me in the land of Canaan in the way
533,n is perfect. 
Take heed that ye do not your alms before men, to be seen of them: otherwise ye have no reward of your Father which is in heaven. 
Therefore when thou doest thine alms, do not sound a trumpet before thee, as the hypocrites do in the synagogues and in the streets, that they may have glory of men. Verily I say unto you, They have their reward. 
But when thou doest alms, let not thy left hand know what thy right hand doeth: 
That thine alms may be in secret: and thy Father which seeth in secret himself shall reward 
537,nigh unto him, which hath had no husband; for her may he be defiled. 
But he shall not defile himself, being a chief man among his people, to profane himself. 
They shall not make baldness upon their head, neither shall they shave off the corner of their beard, nor make any cuttings in their flesh. 
They shall be holy unto their God, and not profane the name of their God: for the offerings of the LORD made by fire, and the bread of their God, they do offer: therefore they shall be holy. 
They shall not take a wife that is a whore, 
511,eof: for I have broken Moab like a vessel wherein is no pleasure, saith the LORD. 
They shall howl, saying, How is it broken down! how hath Moab turned the back with shame! so shall Moab be a derision and a dismaying to all them about him. 
For thus saith the LORD; Behold, he shall fly as an eagle, and shall spread his wings over Moab. 
Kerioth is taken, and the strong holds are surprised, and the mighty men's hearts in Moab at that day shall be as the heart of a woman in her pangs. 
And Moab shall be dest
517,lam, a thousand two hundred fifty and four. 
The children of Harim, three hundred and twenty. 
The children of Jericho, three hundred forty and five. 
The children of Lod, Hadid, and Ono, seven hundred twenty and one. 
The children of Senaah, three thousand nine hundred and thirty. 
The priests: the children of Jedaiah, of the house of Jeshua, nine hundred seventy and three. 
The children of Immer, a thousand fifty and two. 
The children of Pashur, a thousand two hundred forty and seven. 
The children of Harim, 
467,k offering. 
On the eighth day ye shall have a solemn assembly: ye shall do no servile work therein: 
But ye shall offer a burnt offering, a sacrifice made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD: one bullock, one ram, seven lambs of the first year without blemish: 
Their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullock, for the ram, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the conti
595,s speaketh the LORD God of Israel, saying, Write thee all the words that I have spoken unto thee in a book. 
For, lo, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will bring again the captivity of my people Israel and Judah, saith the LORD: and I will cause them to return to the land that I gave to their fathers, and they shall possess it. 
And these are the words that the LORD spake concerning Israel and concerning Judah. 
For thus saith the LORD; We have heard a voice of trembling, of fear, and not of peace. 
Ask ye now, and see whether a man doth travail with child? wherefore do I see every m
425,t though our outward man perish, yet the inward man is renewed day by day. 
For our light affliction, which is but for a moment, worketh for us a far more exceeding and eternal weight of glory; 
While we look not at the things which are seen, but at the things which are not seen: for the things which are seen are temporal; but the things which are not seen are eternal. 
For we know that if our earthly house of this tabern
558,e. 
Then the king sent to call Ahimelech the priest, the son of Ahitub, and all his father's house, the priests that were in Nob: and they came all of them to the king. 
And Saul said, Hear now, thou son of Ahitub. And he answered, Here I am, my lord. 
And Saul said unto him, Why have ye conspired against me, thou and the son of Jesse, in that thou hast given him bread, and a sword, and hast enquired of God for him, that he should rise against me, to lie in wait, as at this day? 
Then Ahimelech answered the king, and said, And who is so faithful among 
520,say to the mountains, Cover us; and to the hills, Fall on us. 
O Israel, thou hast sinned from the days of Gibeah: there they stood: the battle in Gibeah against the children of iniquity did not overtake them. 
It is in my desire that I should chastise them; and the people shall be gathered against them, when they shall bind themselves in their two furrows. 
And Ephraim is as an heifer that is taught, and loveth to tread out the corn; but I passed over upon her fair neck: I will make Ephraim to ride; Judah shall pl
547, from off the threshold of the house, and stood over the cherubims. 
And the cherubims lifted up their wings, and mounted up from the earth in my sight: when they went out, the wheels also were beside them, and every one stood at the door of the east gate of the LORD's house; and the glory of the God of Israel was over them above. 
This is the living creature that I saw under the God of Israel by the river of Chebar; and I knew that they were the cherubims. 
Every one had four faces apiece, and every one four wings; and the likeness of the h
548, instant I shall speak concerning a nation, and concerning a kingdom, to pluck up, and to pull down, and to destroy it; 
If that nation, against whom I have pronounced, turn from their evil, I will repent of the evil that I thought to do unto them. 
And at what instant I shall speak concerning a nation, and concerning a kingdom, to build and to plant it; 
If it do evil in my sight, that it obey not my voice, then I will repent of the good, wherewith I said I would benefit them. 
Now therefore go to, speak to the men of Judah, and to the inhab
401, for a rock of offence to both the houses of Israel, for a gin and for a snare to the inhabitants of Jerusalem. 
And many among them shall stumble, and fall, and be broken, and be snared, and be taken. 
Bind up the testimony, seal the law among my disciples. 
And I will wait upon the LORD, that hideth his face from the house of Jacob, and I will look for him. 
Behold, I and the children whom the LO
431,should do this abomination, to cause Judah to sin. 
And now therefore thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel, concerning this city, whereof ye say, It shall be delivered into the hand of the king of Babylon by the sword, and by the famine, and by the pestilence; 
Behold, I will gather them out of all countries, whither I have driven them in mine anger, and in my fury, and in great wrath; and I will bring them again unto this pl
408,nning: and the watchman called unto the porter, and said, Behold another man running alone. And the king said, He also bringeth tidings. 
And the watchman said, Me thinketh the running of the foremost is like the running of Ahimaaz the son of Zadok. And the king said, He is a good man, and cometh with good tidings. 
And Ahimaaz called, and said unto the king, All is well. And he fell down to the earth upo
523,ase thee, for the sword devoureth one as well as another: make thy battle more strong against the city, and overthrow it: and encourage thou him. 
And when the wife of Uriah heard that Uriah her husband was dead, she mourned for her husband. 
And when the mourning was past, David sent and fetched her to his house, and she became his wife, and bare him a son. But the thing that David had done displeased the LORD. 
And the LORD sent Nathan unto David. And he came unto him, and said unto him, There were two men in one ci
522,cians, that ye might remove them far from their border. 
Behold, I will raise them out of the place whither ye have sold them, and will return your recompence upon your own head: 
And I will sell your sons and your daughters into the hand of the children of Judah, and they shall sell them to the Sabeans, to a people far off: for the LORD hath spoken it. 
Proclaim ye this among the Gentiles; Prepare war, wake up the mighty men, let all the men of war draw near; let them come up: 
Beat your plowshares into swords and y
491, say they, I will fetch wine, and we will fill ourselves with strong drink; and to morrow shall be as this day, and much more abundant. 
The righteous perisheth, and no man layeth it to heart: and merciful men are taken away, none considering that the righteous is taken away from the evil to come. 
He shall enter into peace: they shall rest in their beds, each one walking in his uprightness. 
But draw near hither, ye sons of the sorceress, the seed of the adulterer and the whore. 
Again
543, they shall not satisfy their souls, neither fill their bowels: because it is the stumblingblock of their iniquity. 
As for the beauty of his ornament, he set it in majesty: but they made the images of their abominations and of their detestable things therein: therefore have I set it far from them. 
And I will give it into the hands of the strangers for a prey, and to the wicked of the earth for a spoil; and they shall pollute it. 
My face will I turn also from them, and they shall pollute my secret place: for the robbers shall enter int
435,od gave them up unto vile affections: for even their women did change the natural use into that which is against nature: 
And likewise also the men, leaving the natural use of the woman, burned in their lust one toward another; men with men working that which is unseemly, and receiving in themselves that recompence of their error which was meet. 
And even as they did not like to retain God in their knowledge, God gave them over to 
550,ecause the ark of God was taken, and because of her father in law and her husband. 
And she said, The glory is departed from Israel: for the ark of God is taken. 
And the Philistines took the ark of God, and brought it from Ebenezer unto Ashdod. 
When the Philistines took the ark of God, they brought it into the house of Dagon, and set it by Dagon. 
And when they of Ashdod arose early on the morrow, behold, Dagon was fallen upon his face to the earth before the ark of the LORD. And they took Dagon, and set him in his place again. 
And when they
497, such as love thy salvation say continually, The LORD be magnified. 
But I am poor and needy; yet the Lord thinketh upon me: thou art my help and my deliverer; make no tarrying, O my God. 
Blessed is he that considereth the poor: the LORD will deliver him in time of trouble. 
The LORD will preserve him, and keep him alive; and he shall be blessed upon the earth: and thou wilt not deliver him unto the will of his enemies. 
The LORD will strengthen him upon the bed of languishing: thou wilt mak
430,, O ye house of Israel, have ye offered to me slain beasts and sacrifices by the space of forty years in the wilderness? 
Yea, ye took up the tabernacle of Moloch, and the star of your god Remphan, figures which ye made to worship them: and I will carry you away beyond Babylon. 
Our fathers had the tabernacle of witness in the wilderness, as he had appointed, speaking unto Moses, that he should make it according to the fashion
562, spake unto me, saying, This is the word of the LORD unto Zerubbabel, saying, Not by might, nor by power, but by my spirit, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Who art thou, O great mountain? before Zerubbabel thou shalt become a plain: and he shall bring forth the headstone thereof with shoutings, crying, Grace, grace unto it. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
The hands of Zerubbabel have laid the foundation of this house; his hands shall also finish it; and thou shalt know that the LORD of hosts hath sent me unto you. 
For who hath despised the
481,what I shall choose I wot not. 
For I am in a strait betwixt two, having a desire to depart, and to be with Christ; which is far better: 
Nevertheless to abide in the flesh is more needful for you. 
And having this confidence, I know that I shall abide and continue with you all for your furtherance and joy of faith; 
That your rejoicing may be more abundant in Jesus Christ for me by my coming to you again. 
Only let your conversation be as it becometh the gospel of Christ: tha
472,e destroyer. 
Hold up my goings in thy paths, that my footsteps slip not. 
I have called upon thee, for thou wilt hear me, O God: incline thine ear unto me, and hear my speech. 
Shew thy marvellous lovingkindness, O thou that savest by thy right hand them which put their trust in thee from those that rise up against them. 
Keep me as the apple of the eye, hide me under the shadow of thy wings, 
From the wicked that oppress me, from my deadly enemies, who compass me ab
578, great strength lieth, and wherewith thou mightest be bound to afflict thee. 
And Samson said unto her, If they bind me with seven green withs that were never dried, then shall I be weak, and be as another man. 
Then the lords of the Philistines brought up to her seven green withs which had not been dried, and she bound him with them. 
Now there were men lying in wait, abiding with her in the chamber. And she said unto him, The Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And he brake the withs, as a thread of tow is broken when it toucheth the fire. So his strength was not known. 

493,ooseth the prisoners: 
The LORD openeth the eyes of the blind: the LORD raiseth them that are bowed down: the LORD loveth the righteous: 
The LORD preserveth the strangers; he relieveth the fatherless and widow: but the way of the wicked he turneth upside down. 
The LORD shall reign for ever, even thy God, O Zion, unto all generations. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD: for it is good to sing praises unto our God; for it is pleasant; and praise is comely. 
The LORD doth build up Jer
559,ir glory for that which doth not profit. 
Be astonished, O ye heavens, at this, and be horribly afraid, be ye very desolate, saith the LORD. 
For my people have committed two evils; they have forsaken me the fountain of living waters, and hewed them out cisterns, broken cisterns, that can hold no water. 
Is Israel a servant? is he a homeborn slave? why is he spoiled? 
The young lions roared upon him, and yelled, and they made his land waste: his cities are burned without inhabitant. 
Also the children of Noph and Tahapanes have broken the crown of thy h
565,ght hand of the LORD doeth valiantly. 
The right hand of the LORD is exalted: the right hand of the LORD doeth valiantly. 
I shall not die, but live, and declare the works of the LORD. 
The LORD hath chastened me sore: but he hath not given me over unto death. 
Open to me the gates of righteousness: I will go into them, and I will praise the LORD: 
This gate of the LORD, into which the righteous shall enter. 
I will praise thee: for thou hast heard me, and art become my salvation. 
The stone which the builders refused is become the head stone of the corner. 

493,hich the LORD shall lay upon him, it shall be with tabrets and harps: and in battles of shaking will he fight with it. 
For Tophet is ordained of old; yea, for the king it is prepared; he hath made it deep and large: the pile thereof is fire and much wood; the breath of the LORD, like a stream of brimstone, doth kindle it. 
Woe to them that go down to Egypt for help; and stay on horses, and trust in chariots, because they are many; and in horsemen, because they are very strong; but they l
459,eft of her two sons and her husband. 
Then she arose with her daughters in law, that she might return from the country of Moab: for she had heard in the country of Moab how that the LORD had visited his people in giving them bread. 
Wherefore she went forth out of the place where she was, and her two daughters in law with her; and they went on the way to return unto the land of Judah. 
And Naomi said unto her two daughters in law, Go, return each to her m
442,to him, I am the way, the truth, and the life: no man cometh unto the Father, but by me. 
If ye had known me, ye should have known my Father also: and from henceforth ye know him, and have seen him. 
Philip saith unto him, Lord, shew us the Father, and it sufficeth us. 
Jesus saith unto him, Have I been so long time with you, and yet hast thou not known me, Philip? he that hath seen me hath seen the Father; and how sayest thou then, Shew 
423,ey do. And they parted his raiment, and cast lots. 
And the people stood beholding. And the rulers also with them derided him, saying, He saved others; let him save himself, if he be Christ, the chosen of God. 
And the soldiers also mocked him, coming to him, and offering him vinegar, 
And saying, If thou be the king of the Jews, save thyself. 
And a superscription also was written over him in letters of Greek, and Lati
502,ars of marble: the beds were of gold and silver, upon a pavement of red, and blue, and white, and black, marble. 
And they gave them drink in vessels of gold, (the vessels being diverse one from another,) and royal wine in abundance, according to the state of the king. 
And the drinking was according to the law; none did compel: for so the king had appointed to all the officers of his house, that they should do according to every man's pleasure. 
Also Vashti the queen made a feast for the women in
545,ats should take away sins. 
Wherefore when he cometh into the world, he saith, Sacrifice and offering thou wouldest not, but a body hast thou prepared me: 
In burnt offerings and sacrifices for sin thou hast had no pleasure. 
Then said I, Lo, I come (in the volume of the book it is written of me,) to do thy will, O God. 
Above when he said, Sacrifice and offering and burnt offerings and offering for sin thou wouldest not, neither hadst pleasure therein; which are offered by the law; 
Then said he, Lo, I come to do thy will, O God. He taket
461,ine eyes have seen all that the LORD your God hath done unto these two kings: so shall the LORD do unto all the kingdoms whither thou passest. 
Ye shall not fear them: for the LORD your God he shall fight for you. 
And I besought the LORD at that time, saying, 
O Lord GOD, thou hast begun to shew thy servant thy greatness, and thy mighty hand: for what God is there in heaven or in earth, that can do according to thy works, and according to thy might? 
I pra
495,Saul upon the top of the house. 
And they arose early: and it came to pass about the spring of the day, that Samuel called Saul to the top of the house, saying, Up, that I may send thee away. And Saul arose, and they went out both of them, he and Samuel, abroad. 
And as they were going down to the end of the city, Samuel said to Saul, Bid the servant pass on before us, (and he passed on), but stand thou still a while, that I may shew thee the word of God. 
Then Samuel took a vial of oil, an
463, the cloud stood over the door of the tabernacle. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Behold, thou shalt sleep with thy fathers; and this people will rise up, and go a whoring after the gods of the strangers of the land, whither they go to be among them, and will forsake me, and break my covenant which I have made with them. 
Then my anger shall be kindled against them in that day, and I will forsake them, and I will hide my face from them, and they shall be devou
430,light in it. 
Their bows also shall dash the young men to pieces; and they shall have no pity on the fruit of the womb; their eyes shall not spare children. 
And Babylon, the glory of kingdoms, the beauty of the Chaldees' excellency, shall be as when God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah. 
It shall never be inhabited, neither shall it be dwelt in from generation to generation: neither shall the Arabian pitch tent there; neither sha
487,g you. 
And those which remain shall hear, and fear, and shall henceforth commit no more any such evil among you. 
And thine eye shall not pity; but life shall go for life, eye for eye, tooth for tooth, hand for hand, foot for foot. 
When thou goest out to battle against thine enemies, and seest horses, and chariots, and a people more than thou, be not afraid of them: for the LORD thy God is with thee, which brought thee up out of the land of Egypt. 
And it shall be, when ye are com
421,
But there is a spirit in man: and the inspiration of the Almighty giveth them understanding. 
Great men are not always wise: neither do the aged understand judgment. 
Therefore I said, Hearken to me; I also will shew mine opinion. 
Behold, I waited for your words; I gave ear to your reasons, whilst ye searched out what to say. 
Yea, I attended unto you, and, behold, there was none of you that convinced Job, or that a
